MILITARY JOURNAL 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 



Carlisle, Mmj \8t, 1781. — The Pennsylvania Line, 
after the revolt and discharge of the men, last winter, 
were reduced to six regiments; the officers ordered to 
diiferent towns within the State to recruit. An appoint- 
ment of ensign in the 7th had been obtained for me in 
August last; the 7th and 4th were incorporated, and 
under command of Lt.-Col. Comt. William Butler, ren- 
dezvoused at this place — companies now about half full. 
The effective men were formed into four companies, and 
marched to Little York ; I was arranged to one of the 
marching companies, Samuel Montgomery, captain, and 
George Bluer, lieutenant. All the recruits fit for service, 
from the different stations, were brought to York, formed 
into two regiments of eight companies each, destined for 
the State of Virginia. A few days spent in equipping, 
&c., and for the trial of soldiers charged with mutiny, 
General Anthony Wayne, the commanding officer, in- 
fluenced, no doubt, by experience of the revolt last 

(237) 



238 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

winter, ex^^resses a determination to punish, with the 
utmost rigor, every case of mutiny or disobedience. A 
general court martial continued sitting several days; 
twenty odd prisoners brought before them ; seven were 
sentenced to die. The regiments paraded in the evening 
earlier than usual ; orders passed to the officers along 
the line to put to death instantly any man who stirred 
from his rank. In fi'ont of the parade the ground rose 
and descended again, and at the distance of about three 
hundred yards over this rising ground, the prisoners 
were escorted by a captain's guard ; heard the fire of one 
platoon and immediately a smaller one, Avhen the regi- 
ments wheeled by companies and marched round by the 
place of execution. This was an awful exhibition. The 
seven objects were seen by the troops just as they had 
sunk or fell under the fire. The sight must have made 
an impression on the men; it was designed with that 
view. 

York, May Wth. — Provision for transporting bag- 
gage, &c., and other necessary preparation. Com- 
menced our march for Virginia ; the weather pleasant 
and roads tolerably good. Passed through Frederick 
Town (Maryland), where were some British prisoners 
quartered ; they turned out to see us. Kext day reached 
the Potomac ; here we were detained for want of craft — 
boats few and in bad condition. The artillery passed 
over first (a battalion of artillery accompanied the 
brigade) . The second fiat-boat had left the shore about 
forty yards, when the whole sunk. Several women were 
on board ; but as hundreds of men were on the bank, 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 239 

relief soon reached them ; none were lost — got all over. 
Proceeded a few miles and encamped. Struck our tents 
every morning before day. About eight or nine o'clock, 
as we found water, a short halt was made, the water-call 
beat ; parties, six or eight from each company, conducted 
by a non-commissioned officer, with canteens, fetched 
water. Seldom allowed to eat until twelve o'clock, when 
the arms were stacked, knapsacks taken off, and water 
sent for by parties as before. Officers of a company gen- 
erally messed together, sometimes more; one of their 
servants carried cooked provisions for the day ; no cook- 
ing until night. Not acquainted with the country on 
our route, but understood that Ave were marching much 
about — very circuitous — keeping off the Blue Ridge 
close on our right. This to avoid the enemy and secure 
our junction with the Marquis Lafayette. 

June \Sth. — Joined the troops under command of 
Lafayette. The Marquis had marched two or three 
days to meet us. His men look as if they were fit for 
business. They are chiefly all light infantry, dressed in 
frocks and over-alls of linen. One day spent in washing 
and refreshing — in fixing arms, carriages, &c., and served 
out ammunition. Move toward Richmond, where Lord 
Cornwallis with the British army lay. Heard that his 
lordship was employed burning and destroying ware- 
houses of tobacco, all the i)ublic store-houses, &c. Passed 
through Richmond toward Williamsburg after the ene- 
my — joined by Baron Steuben with some new levies. 
Near Bacon's Bridge the British turned upon us ; our 
advance pressed them too close. The army was formed 



240 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

for a fight — they did not come on. General Wayne 
very anxious to do something. Colonel Simcoe, who 
commands the British legion (horse and mounted in- 
fantry), is constantly committing some depredation 
abroad, and foraging for their army. Wayne hears of 
him — our brigade leave their tents and baggage, march 
at dark, with piece of white paper in each man's hat — 
flints taken out. At day-light reach place called the 
Bowling Green, where Simcoe had been the evening be- 
fore. This was a severe march for me — found myself 
asleep more than once on the route. Keturned and met 
the baggage. A detachment from the brigade put under 
command of Colonel Richard Butler. After a variety 
of marching and counter-marching, Butler at length in- 
tercepts Simcoe ; a smart skirmish takes place ; Wayne 
supports Butler, and Simcoe retreats. Here for the first 
time saw wounded men; feelings not A^ery agreeable; 
endeavor to conquer this disposition or weakness; the 
sight sickened me. This little engagement within six 
miles of Williamsburg, where the enemy were encamped. 
Pennsylvania troops retreat — advance again. See the 
Marquis' light troops but seldom — ^know they are not far 
off. Kept constantly on the move. Hear that the enemy 
have decamped and preparing to cross James river at 
Jamestown. Our brigade move down ; lay on arms all 
night about nine miles from the enemy. At day-light 
move on ; middle of the afternoon of the 6th of July 
firing ahead. Our advance drove in the enemy's pickets, 
marching at this time by companies, in open order. My 
captain (^lontgomery) fell behind his company where 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 241 

my place was, talked with me ; gives me a lesson useful 
to me. When perhaps within one hundred and fifty 
yards of the enemy, we closed column and displayed ; 
advanced in battalion until the firing commenced, and 
ran along the whole line. A regiment or more of the 
light infantry and three pieces of artillery were in the 
line. Saw the British light infantry, distinctly, advancing 
at arm's-length distance, and their second line in close 
order, with shouldered musket, just in front of their 
camp — their infantry only engaged. The main body 
were discovered filing ofi^ to the right and left, when or- 
ders were given us to retreat. My captain, Moatgomery, 
received a shot in his foot and had hopped back in the 
rear ; Lieutenant Bluer being absent, the charge of the 
company devolved on me ; young and inexperienced, ex- 
hausted Avith hunger and fatigue, had like to have dis- 
graced myself — had eat nothing all day but a few black- 
berries — was faint, and with difficulty kept my place ; 
once or twice was about to throw away my arms (a very 
heavy espontoon). The company were almost all old 
soldiers. Kept compact and close to our leading com- 
pany, and continued running until out of reach of the 
fire. The enemy advanced no farther than to the ground 
we left. We could not have been engaged longer than 
about three or four minutes, but at the distance of sixty 
yards only. Our loss is said to be upward of one hun- 
dred killed and wounded ; among the latter twelve offi- 
cers, one of whom. Lieutenant Herbert, taken prisoner ; 
a few of the wounded not able to get off, were also taken. 
The artillery horses all killed; two pieces were lost. 
16 



242 MILITARY JOUEIs^AL OF 

Retreated two miles to very commanding ground, where 
we met the Marquis with our main body ; halted and 
had some Indian meal served out, the wounded dressed, 
&c., and before day changed our ground and encamped 
about five miles from the field. 

July Itli. — An officer, surgeon, and a few men, sent 
with fliig to bury the dead, &c. This was done in com- 
pany with an equal number of the enemy. Our wound- 
ed who were prisoners, had been properly treated. The 
British moved from Jamestown. About a fortnight after 
the action, visited the field ; could trace plainly the ground 
occupied by both, from the tops of the cartridges which 
lay in a line; the distance between about sixty paces. 
The army marched and crossed James river at West- 
over, the seat of Colonel Bird, said to have been once 
the most wealthy planter in the State ; the improvements 
superb, saw nothing like them before. Kept at a respect- 
ful distance from the enemy ; rather between them and 
the route to North Carolina. Some idea of their design 
to return to the southward. Report going of a French 
fleet below. This news confirmed — great joy — army on 
the alert. 

Se^t. \8t. — Army encamped on the bank of James 
river — part of French fleet, with troops on board, in 
view. Recrossed James river and encamped at Wil- 
liamsburg. Army in high spirits — reinforcements com- 
ing on. 

14//?. — General Washington arrived ; our brigade was 
paraded to receive him ; he rode along the line — quar- 
ters in Williamsburg. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 243 

IbfJi. — Officers all pay their respects to the Command- 
er-in-chief ; go in a body ; those Avho are not personally 
known, their names given by General Hand and General 
Wayne. He stands in the door, takes every man by the 
hand — ^the officers all pass in, receiving his salute and 
shake. This the first time I had seen the General. We 
have an elegant encampment close to town, behind Wil- 
liam and Mary College. This building occupied as an 
hospital. Williamsburg a very handsome place, not so 
populous as Richmond, but situate on evenly, pretty 
ground ; streets and lots spacious — does not apj^ear to be 
a place of much business, rather the residence of gentle- 
men of fortune ; formerly it was the seat of government 
and Dunmore's late residence. A neat public building, 
called the capitol, fronts the principal street ; upon the 
first floor is a handsome marble statue of William Pitt. 

The presence of so many general officers, and the ar- 
rival of new corj^s, seem to give additional life to every- 
thing ; discipline the order of the day. In all directions 
troops seen exercising and manoeuvring. Baron Steu- 
ben, our great military oracle. The guards attend the 
grand parade at an early hour, w^here the Baron is al- 
ways found waiting with one or two aids on horseback. 
These men are exercised and put through various evolu- 
tions and military experiments for two hours — many 
officers and spectators present; excellent school, this. 
At length the duty of the parade comes on. The guards 
are told ofi"; officers take their posts, wheel by platoons 
to the right ; fine corps of music detailed for this duty, 
which strikes up; the whole march ofi", saluting the 



244 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

Bavon and field officer of the day, as they pass. Penn- 
sylvania brigade almost all old soldiers, and well dis- 
ciplined when compared with those of Maryland and 
Virginia. But the troops from the eastward far superior 
to either. 

2btTi. — Joined by the last of the troops fi-om the east- 
ward. French encamped a few miles on the right ; busy 
in getting cannon and military stores fi*om on board the 
vessels, 

2Sth. — The whole army moved in three divisions 
toward the enemy, who were strongly posted at York, 
about twelve miles distant. Their pickets and light 
iToops retire. We encamped about three miles off — 
change ground and take a position within one mile of 
York ; rising ground (covered with tall handsome pines) 
called Pigeon Hill, separates us from a view of the town. 
Enemy keep possession of Pigeon Hill. York on a high, 
sandy plain, on a deep navigable river of same name. 
Americans on the right ; French on the left, extending 
on both sides of the river; preparations for a siege. 
One-third of the army on fatigue every day, engaged in 
various duties, making gabions, fi\scines, saucissons, &c., 
and great exertions and labor in getting on the heavy 
artillery. Strong covering parties (whole regiments) 
moved from camp as soon as dark, and lay all night 
upon their arms between us and the enemy. Our regi- 
ment, when on this duty, were under cover, and secured 
from the shot by Pigeon Hill ; now and then a heavy 
shot from the enemy's works reached our camp. Our 
patrols, and those of the British, met occasionally in the 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 245 

dark, sometimes a few shot were exchanged — would gen- 
erally retire. Colonel Schamel, adjutant-general to the 
army, with two or three attendants, on a party of obser- 
vation, ventured rather close ; they were seen and inter- 
cepted by a few smart horsemen from the British. Scha- 
mel forced his way through, and got back to camp, but 
received a wound, of which he died next day. His death 
was lamented, and noticed by the Commander-in-chief 
in his orders. Possession taken of Pigeon Hill, and 
temporary work erected. Generals and engineers, in 
viewing and surveying the ground, are always fired upon 
and sometimes pursued. Escorts and covering parties 
stationed at convenient distances under cover of wood, 
rising ground, &c., afford support. This business re- 
minds me of a play among the boys, called Prison-base. 
At length, everything in readiness, a division of the 
army broke ground on the night of the 6th of October, 
and opened the first parallel about six hundred yards 
from the works of the enemy. Every exertion to annoy 
our men, who were necessarily obliged to be exposed 
about the works ; however, the business went on, and on 
the 9th our cannon and mortars began to play. The 
scene viewed from the camp now was grand, particularly 
after dark — a number of shells from the works of both 
parties passing high in the air, and descending in a curve, 
each with a long train of fire, exhibited a brilliant spec- 
tacle. Troops in three divisions manned the lines alter- 
nately. We w^ere two nights in camp and one in the 
lines ; relieved about ten o'clock. Passed and repassed by 
a covert way leading to the parallel. 



246 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

Oct. lltli. — Second parallel tlirown up within three 
hundred yards of the main works of the enemy; new 
batteries erected, and additional number of cannon 
brought forward — some twenty-four pounders and heavy 
mortars and howitzers. A tremendous fire now opened 
from all the new works, French and American. The 
heavy cannon directed against the embrasures and guns 
of the enemy. Their pieces were soon silenced, broke 
and dismantled. Shells from behind their works still 
kept U]). Two redoubts advanced of their lines, and 
within rifle shot of our second parallel, much in the 
way. These forts or redoubts were well secured by a 
ditch and picket, sufficiently high parapet, and within 
were divisions made by rows of casks ranged upon end 
and filled with earth and sand. On tops of parapet were 
ranged bags filled with sand — a deep narrow ditch 
communicating with their main lines. On the night of 
the 14t]i, shortly after dark, these redoubts were taken 
by storm ; the one on our right, by the Marquis, with 
part of his light infantry — the other, more to our left, 
but partly opposite the centre of the British lines, by the 
French. Our batteries had kej^t a constant fire upon the 
redoubts through the day. Belonged this evening to a 
command detailed for the purpose of supporting the 
Marc[uis. The night was dark and favorable. Our bat- 
teries had ceased — there appeared to be a dead calm ; 
we followed the infantry and halted about half way — 
kept a few minutes in suspense, when we were ordered 
to advance. The business was over, not a gun was fired 
by the assailants; the bayonet only was used; ten or 



MAJOR EBEXEZER DENNY. 247 

twelve of the infantry were killed. French had to con- 
tend with a i3ost of more force — their loss was consider- 
able. Colonel Hamilton led the Marquis' advance ; the 
British sentries hailed them — no answer made. They 
also hailed the French, "Who comes there?" were an- 
swered, "French grenadiers." Colonel Walter Stewart 
commanded the regiment of reserve wdiich accompanied 
the Marquis ; they were immediately employed in con- 
necting, by a ditch and parapet, the two redoubts, and 
completing and connecting the same with our second 
parallel. The British were soon alarmed; some from 
each of the redoubts made their escape. The whole ene- 
my were under arms — much firing round all their lines, 
but particularly toward our regiment, where the men 
w^ere at work: the shot passed over. In about three 
quarters of an hour we were under cover. Easy digging ; 
light sandy ground. 

IbtJi. — Heavy fire from our batteries all day. A shell 
from one of the French mortars set fire to a British 
frigate ; she burnt to the Avater's edge, and blew up — 
made the earth shake. Shot and shell raked the town 
in every direction. Bomb-proofs the only place of safety. 

16^/^. — Just before day the enemy made a sortie, spiked 
the guns in two batteries and retired. Our troops in the 
parallel scarcely knew of their approach until they were 
off; the thing was done silently and in an instant. The 
batteries stood in advance of the lines, and none within 
but artillery. This day, the 16th, our division manned 
the lines — firing continued without intermission. Pretty 
strong detachments posted in each battery over night. 



248 MILITARY JOUEXAL OF 

llih. — In the morning, before relief came, had the 
pleasure of seeing a drmnmer mount the enemy's para- 
pet, and beat a parley, and immediately an officer, hold- 
ing up a white handkerchief, made his appearance out- 
side their works ; the drummer accompanied him, beating. 
Our batteries ceased. An officer from our lines ran and 
met the other, and tied the handkerchief over his eyes. 
The drummer sent back, and the British officer conduct- 
ed to a house in rear of our lines. Firing ceased totally. 

ISth. — Several flags pass and repass now even without 
the drum. Had we not seen the drummer in his red 
coat when he first mounted, he might have beat away 
till doomsday. The constant firing was too much for the 
sound of a single drum ; but when the firing ceased, I 
thought I never heard a drum equal to it — the most de- 
lightful music to us all. 

IWi. — Our division man the lines again. All is quiet. 
Articles of capitulation signed ; detachments of French 
and Americans take possession of British forts. Major 
Hamilton commanded a battalion which took possession 
of a fort immediately opposite our right and on the bank 
of York river. I carried the standard of our regiment 
on this occasion. On entering the fort. Baron Steuben, 
who accompanied us, took the standard from me and 
planted it himself. The British army parade and march 
out Avith their colors furled ; drums beat as if they did 
not care how. Grounded their arms and returned to 
town. Much confusion and riot among the British 
through the day; many of the soldiers were intoxicated; 
several attemi^ts in course of the night to break open 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 249 

stores ; an American sentinel killed by a British soldier 
with a bayonet ; our patrols kept busy. Glad to be re- 
lieved from this disagreeable station. Negroes lie about, 
sick and dying, in every stage of the small pox. Never 
was in so filthy a place — some handsome houses, but 
prodigiously shattered. Vast heaps of shot and shells 
lying about in every quarter, which came from our works. 
The shells did not burst, as was expected. Returns of 
British soldiers, prisoners six thousand, and seamen 
about one thousand. Lord Cornwallis excused himself 
from marching out with the troops ; they were conducted 
by General O'Hara. Our loss said to be about three 
hundred; that of the enemy said not more than five 
hundred and fifty. Fine supply of stores and merchan- 
dise had ; articles suitable for clothing were taken for the 
use of the army. A portion furnished each ofiicer to the 
amount of sixty dollars. 

20tTi. — Joined by a new raised regiment from Pennsyl- 
vania. Officers hastened to partake of the siege, but 
were too late. British troops march into the interior — 
to Winchester and other places. Visit Gloucester, small 
village opposite York ; nothing seen there. Some of our 
officers return to Pennsylvania, others take their place. 
Visit Williamsburg in company with young gentlemen 
of the country, on horseback ; spend a few days very 
agreeably. Militia employed leveling the lines. Our 
brigade prepare for a long march. 

Nov. 1st. — Three regiments of Pennsylvania, a detach- 
ment of artillery, and Maryland troops, commence their 
march for South Carolina — General St. Clair, the com- 



250 MILITARY JOUENAL OF 

manding officer. Easy, regular marcliing ; roads gene- 
rally good, through sandy country. Pass through Rich- 
mond and Guilford, in JN'orth Carolina, where General 
Green and the British had a hard fight ; also Camden, 
where Gates was defeated. Halted at least one day in 
the week for purpose of washing and refreshing. 

Jan. 4th, 1782. — Joined the troops under General 
Green at Round 0, in the State of South Carolina. 
Moved to Pond-Pond; here we lay some time. Rice 
farms around this neighborhood — the fields almost 
all under water ; immense quantities of ducks ; excel- 
lent sport at times. Planters return to their homes — 
live in style. Army change their ground; march to 
Ashley. Was on picket the night before we reached 
Ashley; got exceedingly wet — it rained all night. 
Marched next morning in wet clothes twelve miles, to 
Ashley, exposed to very hot sun ; laid up with fever — 
carried to hospital ; as soon as able, returned to camp. 
Hosjiital very disagreeable place — all sick, and some 
continually dying. Attendance good; surgeons very 
kind ; furnished with some stores, sugar, tea and molas- 
ses. Continued weak and unfit for duty for some weeks. 
Ashley a very good position — ground high and dry ; but 
it is now midsummer and sickly season. Men die very 
fast; lost several valuable officers. Ashley river low; 
full of alligators. 

August. — Camp continued on bank of Ashley river, 
eighteen or twenty miles above Charleston. Enemy 
confine themselves to city. Their light troops and horse 
advanced five miles, at place called Quarter House. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 251 

Armies both seem disposed to bo quiet ; ours in no con- 
dition for doing much. Some talk of peace, and of the 
enemy evacuating Charleston. Detailed for command. 
Joined a captain of the Maryland line ; marched Avitli 
two sergeants, two corporals, and thirty men, for George- 
town, about sixty miles distant, coast-wise. Escorted a 
brigade of wagons loaded with rum for the army. 
Country appears deserted ; the few people we saw looked 
bad enough, poor and dejected ; they fled from us, and 
in some instances hid themselves. Farms on this route 
have been neglected ; exposed to the incursions of the 
British. Negroes and stock either removed or taken. 
Fell in with an alligator, twelve feet in length, in the 
middle of the road ; supposed that his pond had dried 
up, and that he was in search of another ; soldier shot 
him. 

Septemher. — Our camp very thin ; not more than three 
relieves of officers and men for the ordinary duties. 
Hospitals crowded, and great many sick in camp ; deaths 
so frequent, the funeral ceremony dispensed with. Pro- 
visions scarce and very indifferent ; the beef brought 
from the back counties of North Carolina, by the time 
they reach the camp, poor indeed, and must be unwhole- 
some. Commissary's yard and slaughter place common- 
ly short distance from camp. Soldier going there in 
morning about killing time, met his comrade returning 
in ; asked how was the beef this morning ? other replied, 
that it took two men to hold up the creature until the 
butcher knocked it down. Says the other, And why 



252 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

didn't lie knock it down as it lay ? Flour a rare article. 
Troops have lived chiefly upon rice, now and then a 
small allowance of Indian meal served out — rice very 
good for the sick, but rather washy for duty men. Grov- 
ernor Hamilton, of this State, himself and family, 
quarter at a pleasant seat, two miles in rear of camp — 
General Green not quite so far ; each has a subaltern's 
guard. Very fond of getting one or other of these 
guards better fare than we have in camp. Officer con- 
sidered and treated as one of the family. 

October. — Camp at Ashley Hill. Ranks thinned very 
much; deaths not so frequent. Our situation as to 
ground, a handsome one, and, as far as I can judge, eli- 
gible, but assuredly the climate is severe upon northern 
constitutions. Gentlemen who can afford it, reside dur- 
ing summer in the city and spend the Avinter in the 
country. An unpleasant week's command. At a bridge 
over Ashley, six or seven miles from camp, where the 
great road from Charleston to the upper country crosses, 
a subaltern and thirty men have been stationed. It be- 
came my turn. Orders were to suffer no people to pass 
or repass without proper permit. It was now pretty 
well known that the enemy would soon evacuate the city. 
Many poor devils had taken protection and followed the 
British in ; provisions scarce in town, and those people 
sick of their situation — they were anxious to get back to 
their old places of abode in the country. Some very 
miserable objects came out — whole families, battered and 
starving. Was sure, upon my representation, leave 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 253 

would be given to let them pass. Stated tlie business 
in writing, and dispatched a sergeant. No— ordered not 
to let them pass ; thought this an unnecessary cruelty. 

Lee. IWi. — Had been expecting, every day for a 
month past, to hear of the intended evacuation of 
Charleston. The Governor's guard was an object at this 
time, as the officer commanding would, of course, accom- 
j)any or escort him into the city. I was so fortunate as 
to have the guard this day, when advice was received 
that the British would embark next morning. A few 
hours for the Governor to get ready, we set out in the 
evening with one tumbrel, containing books, papers, &c., 
and reached the city early next day. Saw the last of the 
enemy embark in their boats and put off to the shipping. 
An immense fleet lay in sight all day ; found the city 
very quiet — houses all shut up. A detachment from the 
army had marched the day before to take possession as 
soon as the English would be off. Guards stationed at 
proper places, and small parties, conducted by an officer, 
patrolled the streets. Charleston a handsome town, sit- 
uate on neck of land between the confluence of Ashley 
and Cooper rivers ; Cooper river, however, appears to be 
the only harbor. Town here fronts the east ; business 
all done on this side. Second and third day people be- 
gan to open their houses and show themselves, and some 
shops opened. Stayed a week, and returned to our old 
encampment. 

30^7i. — Broke up our camp. Pennsylvanians have 
been reduced, by deaths, desertions, &c., and were now 
incorporated into one regiment of six hundred men. 



254 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

Supernumerary officers went home to tlieir own State. 
Lieut. -Col. Commt. Josiah Harmar, who had acted as 
Adjutant-general since our junction with General Green, 
took command of this regiment. 

Jan. Isi, 1783. — Arrived on J^mes Island, and en- 
camped contiguous to a very beautiful forest of pine. 
Had with us one complete regiment of the Maryland 
line, a battalion belonging to South Carolina, (which was 
all the troops that State had), and six companies of ar- 
tilleiy, two of whom were from Pennsylvania, the rest 
from Yirginia. Colonel Hamilton commandant of artil- 
lery. The woodland an elegant situation for hunting. 
Each company had its ground marked out, when the 
whole went to work, and in course of a week were com- 
pletely housed. Some of the companies had more timber 
upon the gTound they occupied than was necessary for 
their huts. The infantry were in a line ; artiller}^ in rear 
of right wing formed a park. The order and formation 
such as our encampment. 

January. — Cantonment on James Island. Weather 
moderate. Troops employed finishing huts and opening 
the streets ; not a stump left. Top of timber and brush 
carried to certain distance, and built up in a circular line 
round the cantonment. This brush barrier, or fence, 
could not be passed without much trouble ; it served in- 
stead of sentinels round the camp. Openings left at 
particular places, where the guards or sentinels were sta- 
tioned. Still kept a front and rear camp guard, but the 
usual number lessened. 

February. — Very pleasant weather for working parties ; 



MAJOIl EBEXEZEE DENNY. 255 

some appearance of spring. Officers and men all in 
comfortable quarters. Provisions good ; very little occa- 
sion for fire through the winter. 

March and Ajpril. — Delightful season. James Island 
a little paradise — the country fiat, but sandy and dry. 
Troops healthy. Our regiment receive new clothing; 
officers also are furnished in Charleston with a small 
supply. Make a very fine appearance. Exercised often ; 
perform the parade duties in absence of the adjutant — 
very fond of this. Ofiicers go frequently to the city — 
police boat for that purpose ; row there in half an hour. 
A short walk from the huts, and we have a view of 
Charleston, of Hadrel's Point, which is the main land 
east, and of Sullivan's Island, east across the channel 
from James Island. Visit Fort Sullivan, celebrated for 
the defense made against Sir Peter Parker. Curtains 
and embrasures faced with the cabbage tree — soft 
spongy wood, admirably calculated for this use. Saw 
where a great many shot from the British ships had en- 
tered the logs, but no damage done ; holes almost closed 
up. From Sullivan's Island to Hadrel's Point was for- 
merly a bridge — it was burnt by the British. Fort Sul- 
livan still in very good condition ; but Fort Johnson, 
upon James Island, immediately opposite (across the 
channel), nearly demolished. Plenty of fish and oj^sters 
all round us, and what the folks here call stone crabs, 
A^ery fine; they are like the common crab, but much 
larger, and soft shells. Ofiicers in rotation dine with 
General Green, at his house in the city. Colonel Stew- 
art, of the Maryland regiment, on an excursion in the 



256 MILITAEY JOUENAL OF 

country, was cast from his horse into the ditch and broke 
his neck. Officers of the army (those on duty excepted) 
attended his funeral in Charleston. Preliminaries of a 
peace arrive. Great rejoicing — grand review — dinner 
— fire works, and dance at the cantonment. Ladies and 
gentlemen come over on this occasion from Charleston. 

June 1st. — Preparations making to send home, by sea, 
the Maryland and Pennsylvania troops ; transports want- 
ing. A New England brig arrives, and contracts to 
carry two companies. Bond's and Irwin's companies or- 
dered to embark. I had belonged to the latter since the 
action of Jamestown, when Captain Montgomery, who 
was wounded, returned to Pennsylvania. Had a very 
pleasant passage of seven days to Philadelphia, where 
we landed on the 15th. Mrs. Green, wife of the General, 
came passenger Avith us. Quartered in the Philadelphia 
barracks, along with about one hundred and fifty new 
raised men. Our companies of the southward appear to 
great advantage. The near approach of the disband- 
ment of the army, and a tardiness in Congress to make 
provision for a settlement, produced dissatisfaction among 
the officers in Pennsylvania, as well as among those at 
head-quarters. To us wdio were strangers in our own 
State, this business was unknown. About eighty men 
from the recruiting rendezvous at Lancaster, turned out 
and marched to Philadelphia without an officer; were 
joined by the recruits in the barracks ; marched to the 
State House where Congress were, frightened that body, 
and broke up their sitting. This proceeding took place 
about noon, when the officers belonging to the two com- 



MAJOR ECENEZEE DENNY. 2-37 

panies from Charleston were at Governor Dickinson's on 
an invitation to dinner. The aLarm reached us — hasten- 
ed to the barracks — long roll beat ; our two companies 
fell in to a man ; marched to the Grovernor's house in 
Market street ; several troops of militia horse paraded ; 
great uproar in the city. Although the insurgents had 
posted sentinels round the State House, the members of 
Congress made out to escape, after passing a resolution to 
assemble at Trenton. The officers who were concerned 
in this business, and who had privately directed the 
movements, now thought of themselves ; they fled and 
escaped in a light boat down the river ; men soon dis- 
persed. A few days brought Ceneral Howe from head- 
quarters with a brigade of light troops, for purpose of 
suppressing the insurrection. Most of the officers who 
were here previous to our arrival were arrested, and a few 
taken in close custody. General court martial ordered for 
their trial. Government were desirous of getting rid of 
the army in as quiet a manner as possible ; at this par- 
ticular period it was thought best not to be too rigid. 
Howe had his cue ; officers released. Captain Alexander 
Parker (my uncle) , on furlough from Lancaster, was re- 
turning home ; obtained leave of absence, and accom- 
panied him to Carlisle. Our regiment from southward 
not yet arrived. 

Dec. 3d. — By proclamation of Congress, the American 
army was disbanded ; a few men, under the command 
of a captain at Fort Pitt, excepted. A resolution soon 
followed for raising a regiment for the purpose of garri- 
soning the western posts — this regiment to consist of ten 
17 



258 MILITAEY JOURXAL OF 

companies, portioned as follows : Pennsylvania — 4 com- 
panies and Lieut.-Col. Commt. Jersey — 1 company. 
IS'ew York — 3 companies and a Major. Connecticut — 2 
companies and a Major. 

1784. — The States made the appointments in the first 
instance, which were confirmed by Congress. The offi- 
cers were all from those who had been in service. Colo- 
nel Harmar was in France ; had been sent with the 
ratification of the treaty. The command of the new 
regiment was reserved for him, and indeed the Pennsyl- 
vania appointments not made until his return. Governor 
Mifflin at this time was President of Congress, and very 
popular in Pennsylvania, and Harmar's great friend; 
but the Colonel's character as a military man stood high ; 
the regiment he brought from the southward eclipsed 
every thing. I was nominated by Harmar one of his en- 
signs ; the appointment reached me at Carlisle. As soon 
as they had a knowledge of my acceptance, recruiting 
instructions were sent me. Marched about a dozen men 
down to Philadelphia ; joined the camp on west side of 
Schuylkill. The four companies nearly full. Some time 
spent in equipping and exercising the recruits. 

SeiHemher. — Marched through Lancaster by Carlisle, 
&c., to Pittsburgh. Waited for the arrival of commis- 
sioners appointed to hold a treaty with the Indians. 
Treaty expected to be holden at Cuyahoga. Commis- 
sioners late getting out, season advanced, i:)lan changed, 
and Indians invited to attend at Fort M'Intosh, about 
thirty miles below Fort Pitt, on bank of Ohio ; to which 
place we repaired, and found exceeding good quarters. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 259 

January^ 1785. — iVbout four liiindrcd of the Scnccas, 
Delawares and Wyandots come in. After considerable 
difficulty, a treaty is agreed to, but with much reluctance 
on the part of the savages. Amongst the Indians are a 
number of women and children. The whole a very 
motley crew — an ugly set of devils all — very few hand- 
some men or women. Colonel liarmar did not join us 
until w^e reached Fort Pitt, at which place I was appoint- 
ed to do the duty of adjutant; this had always been 
favorite duty of mine. 

Fort M'Intosii, 1785. — Winter passed away — no or- 
ders for marching; did expect, as soon as the season 
would permit, to march for Detroit. April and May de- 
lightful season — frequent excursions into the country — 
fishing and hunting. Officers visit Fort Pitt, where we 
left a lieutenant and thirty men. Fort Pitt and Fort 
M'Intosh both handsome places. Fort Pitt erected by 
the British long before the late war — an elegant work, 
regular pentagon ; vast labor and money expended here. 
Ditch and parapet with pickets and fencing, and every 
thing in the most complete order. Very considerable 
quantity of military stores at this place. Indians come 
in to trade, wdll get drunk — a white man killed by a 
drunken Indian at Pittsburgh — people rise and attempt 
to put the Indian to death. Express sent to Colonel 
Harmar at M'Intosh. I was ordered to Pitt with certain 
instructions to Lieutenant Ashton, who commanded there. 
The Indian guarded to county jail. Pittsburgh in West- 
moreland county. Hannahstown, about thirty miles east, 
the seat of justice. Cornplanter, chief of the Senecas, 



260 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

arrived at Pitt. He had signed the treaty of M'Intosh ; 
was dissatisfied — his people reflected on him ; came to 
revoke. Colonel Harmar was informed of this, and in- 
vited up to Pitt — I accompanied him. Meeting appoint- 
ed in the King's Orchard. Sj^eeches on both sides taken 
down. Cornplanter dismissed with assurances, &c., but 
no revoking. 

Summer nearly gone. Men have been enlisted but 
for one year ; orders to re-enlist for three. Of the four 
companies, we re-engaged seventy etfective men — rest 
all discharged. Officers went on the recruiting service. 
Anxious to know Iioav I was to be disposed of. Proper 
complement of officers kept for the new company. Did 
count upon returning over the mountains, but would 
have preferred remaining at Pittsburgh. Dislike the 
recruiting service. The new company ordered to pre- 
pare to embark for the Great Miami, where another 
treaty is intended to be held. Generals Butler and Par- 
sons, two of the commissioners, arrive. The party all 
ready to descend the river, when the Colonel instructed 
me to prepare and accompany them ; this to me was very 
unexpected. The company has its complement of offi- 
cers ; I was extra. Must move. 

2'dth. — I agreed with Mr. Duncan, about the wintering 
of my mare; he x^romising to keep her safe in his 
•meadow, while the grass continued, and charge noth- 
ing — but the remainder of the winter she should be well 
fed and kept on good hay, for thirty shillings per month. 
Having arranged affiiirs as well as the shortness of my 
time would afford, I set off for M'Intosh, in company 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 261 

with Mr. O'Hara, but did not arrive until the next morn- 
ing ; the water being exceedingly low, and Mr. O'Hara 
so unfortunate as to run aground in the night. At ten 
o'clock set out on horseback for Fort Pitt to make some 
arrangements ; stayed one day. Found the party had 
sailed. A corporal and six men with small boat left for 
me. After receiving from the Colonel particular orders 
relative to myself, I embarked again with Mr. O'Hara. 
and in a few hours, with brisk rowing, overtook the com- 
missioners, who had halted at Little Beaver creek, where 
Captain Hutchens and several surveyors were encamped. 
Here we stayed some minutes. About ten o'clock at 
night we got to where the troops were encamped, near 
the mouth of Yellow Creek, 30th September, 1785. A 
very pretty looking company, commanded by Captain 
Doughty, of 'New York, arrived at M'Intosh the same day 
the other left. 

Oct. M. — Reached Wheeling. Joined by several of 
the contractor's boats loaded with provisions. Our fleet 
now consists of twelve small keels and batteaux, besides 
two large flats called Kentucky boats. The flats carry 
cattle, horses, &c. ; the others, the troops and goods for 
the Indians. Ohio river remarkably low — two pilots 
employed to keep ahead and point out the channel ; not- 
withstanding, some of the boats frequently ground. 

8tJi. — Encamped opposite mouth of Little Kanahwa. 
My uncle, Captain Parker, owns the ground above 
Kanahwa ; crossed over in light boat ; his improvements 
made just before the war scarcely visible; place grown 
up ; pretty tract of land. Settlement and pre-emption 



202 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 



y7s^ 



entitle him to fourteen hundred acres. Will be valuable 
property not long hence. 

IWi. — Passage very tedious; water low and frequent 
interruptions ; made not more than ten and fifteen miles 
a day. Fine opportunity of hunting and fishing along 
the shore. Game plenty, particularly turkeys. Some 
elegant bottoms on both sides of the river ; but generally 
opposite the most prominent parts of the bottoms, the 
hill makes in and forms what is called narrows. Colonel 
]Monroe, a member of Congress from Virginia, on a 
visit to Kentucky, took passage with the commissioners. 
Obliged to meet Congress early in October, and anxious 
to get on ; a light boat got ready ; a sergeant, myself, a 
corporal and six privates, embark with the Colonel — 
leave the fleet, and after rowing about fifteen miles ar- 
rive at Great Kanahwa. 

12th. — Spent this morning with Colonel Lewis, who is 
proprietor of the place. Several families reside with him 
on the point — it is a very pretty situation. Set out about 
eleven o'clock ; kept half our crew at the oars all night. 

13^/^ — In the evening passed the Three Islands ; nar- 
row channel here ; Indian crossing place. Frequent at- 
tacks on boats at this place ; saw nothing ; arrived safe 
at Limestone, late. 

14^//. — Colonel Monroe having procured horses to 
carry him to Lexington, left me at ten o'clock. JN'othing 
remarkable here; place only settled this spring; indif- 
ferent kind of folks. This is said to be the best and 
nearest landing place to Lexington — if so, it will in a 
fehort time become of some importance. 



MA JOE EBEXEZER DENNY. 2G3 

18^7^. — Fleet arrive — make a short halt and i^ass on. I 
follow in my light boat ; encamp early in the evening ; 
men cook provisions for next clay. 

22cl. — x\rrive at the Great Miami. Best ground for our 
station about a mile above the mouth, where the boats 
were brought and every thing unloaded. All hands set 
to work chopping, clearing, &c., and preparing timber 
for block-houses and pickets ; and on the 8th instant had 
ourselves inclosed. Hoisted the United States flag, and 
christened the place Fort Finney, in compliment to Cap- 
tain Finney, the commanding officer. Our work is a 
square stockade fort ; substantial block-houses, two 
stories, twenty-four by eighteen feet in each angle ; cur- 
tains one hundred feet of stout pickets, four feet in the 
ground, and nine feet above ; situate one hundred and 
flfty yards from the river, on a rising second bank. A 
building, eighteen by twenty feet, within the east and 
west curtains, for the accommodation and recej)tion of 
contractors' stores and Indian goods ; and one small, but 
strong building, centre of north curtain, for magazine. 
A council house, twenty by sixty, detached, but within 
gun shot. Commissioners and their followers pitch their 
tents within the fort, and erect wooden chimneys. Sea- 
son very favorable, but growing cool. Men employed 
finishing the block-houses, and clearing ofi" the timber 
and brush to some distance outside. 

Nov. 13th. — Corporal Thompson arrived with his boat, 
in company with General Parsons, one of the commis- 
sioners. 

24:iJi. — Messengers who set out from Pittsburgh to tho 



2G4 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 



/7i' 



Indian towns, to invite the Indians to a treaty at this 
place, arrive with six chiefs of the Shawanees, Wyan- 
dot and Delaware nations, to wit: Captain Johnny, or 
Red Pole, Half- King, Crane, Pipe, Wingeman and 
White-Eyes — all very glad to see us hroiliers. Some 
grog and smoke produced. 

2bth. — Wrote to Colonel Harmar at Philadelphia, an 
account of our passage, &c., and of the arrival of the In- 
dians, state of the troops, &c. 

21th. — Caught two large Kentucky boats floating down 
enxpty — had been unloaded at Limestone, and carried 
away by a sudden rise of water. Boards served us for 
floors, sentry boxes and other useful j^urposes. About 
one hundred Indians assemble and encamp a couple 
of miles from us ; the greatest part W^yandots, a few 
Delawares. 

Dec. ofh. — Generals Clark, Butler and Parsons leave 
us on a visit to the Falls of Ohio, about one hundred and 
fifty miles below. Captain Finney and myself, with a 
party of soldiers in boat, go to Big Bone Lick, thirty 
miles down ; dig up and collect some astonishing large 
bones. 

Dec. GtJi. — Spent this day in the Indian camp by in- 
vitation ; treated with attention. It was a high day 
among them, a frolic and feast ; several games played — 
exceedingly active at the game our boys call shinny or 
common. About forty young men were paraded for this 
game, equally divided ; the ground had been cleared for 
the purpose. At the centre was a painted post, decorated 
with pieces of cloth suitable for leggings and breech 



MAJOR EBENEZEE DENNY. 2G5 

clouts ; the winning side got these. Their ball the size 
of a man's head, made of deer's hair, covered with skin ; 
their sticks four or five feet long, resembling a racket. 
The ball was thrown in the air — all endeavored to catch 
it upon his racket ; a fellow would take it in this way 
and keep in until another more smart overtook him or 
knocked it abroad, when another scramble took place. 
They insisted on my joining in one of these games. 
Several other games were played ; some with beans and 
dishes or bowls, in imitation of backgammon. Our din- 
ner was served upon skins spread on the ground. Had 
walked to the camp, but must ride back ; girl and horse 
got for me. ^ 

^ Elsewbere in a note he says : " I left the garrison in company with Mr. 
Zane (a man who has been brought up during his youth amongst the 
Wyandots), to share in the amusements of a frolic that was to take place 
this day. Accordingly, when we arrived at their encampment we were 
taken very friendly by the hand, and desired to fall in with them at a 
game of common. The first thing did was to divide the whole into two 
parties; this ceremony was performed by two old sachems; and then took 
post on each side of an elegant decorated post of sugar tree, on the top of 
which was as much new scarlet cloth as would make a pair of leggings ; 
around the middle was bound a pair of scarlet garters. These were the 
prizes. When all was ready, one of the old men gave a halloo as a signal 
to make ready, which was answered by another from each of the company ; 
at that instant the ball was thrown up in the air, then at it we went, and 
contended for half an hour. At length it was sent past the stage, and the 
person who struck it declared it aloud, which ended that game — he being 
presented with the leggings. And in the same manner was the garter 
played for ; he who hit the ball the last got the prize. 

" After dinner another play was introduced, which was called mamondi/s. 
Having all sat down in a circle, they placed some blankets in the centre, 
and two of them began the play, with a wooden dish and six plum stones 
in it, marked on each side something like dice. They shook the dishes 
about, and from certain marks one would soon exceed the other. With 



266 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

7//^. — Tlie Indian ^Yomen assembled in our council 
house and desired the attendance of the chief captain 
(Captain Finney) . ^^e all turned out, heard an oration 
•from one of their elderly ones, the conclusion of which 
-A-as a request for something to warm their hearts. 

12tJi. — Accompany Isaac Zane, a white man, and two 
Indians, on a hunting party. We took a light boat, went 
lip the river seven miles, and pitched a camp ; had an 
Indian woman along to keep camp. First day, too anx- 
ious in pursuit of buffalo, lost my course ; intended to 
have kept near to Zean ; he was led off. I was alone and 
followed by wolves, yowling occasionally. Zean heard 
the report of my rifle and came up ; was very glad to see 
him. Concluded to return to camp; he conducted me 
some distance. Before we parted he killed a doe ; open- 
ed the udder with his knife — milk collected, of which I 
drank. Got to camp and stayed there. Party returned 
home the fourth day, and brought with us the meat of 
three buffaloes, two bears and parts of a number of deer. 

15//^. — The same day we returned from our hunt, it 
rained excessively hard. We were joined by our com- 
missioners from the Rapids, just at the landing ; they 
having received a plentiful quantity of wet that occasion- 
ed a near resemblance to drowned rats. 

18^/^. — Three Shawanee Indians arrived with a speech 



these and other affairs we diverted ourselves until it grew late, when 
takin"- our leave, one who had expressed a great deal of friendship for me, 
remarked that the road was dirty, that we had three miles to go, and that 
I would be much the better of a horse — if I would accept of one he would 
soon have him procured ; I assented ; accordingly a squaw was dispatched, 
and soon after we were both mounted and conducted home by t-^o females." 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 267 

from their nation, informing us of their being on their 
way to this place. This was very agreeable news to our 
commissioners. 

19M. — Major Montgomery and Mr. Elliot were sent 
in a boat, with a sergeant and four privates, up to Lime- 
stone, in search of several horses that were stolen from 
the Indians here, and were heard of at that place. 

20t]i. — Commissioners returned a few days since from 
the Falls ; disappointed at not finding more Indians 
come in. Those with us, about one hundred, are princi- 
pally Wyandots and Delawares, with whom the treaty at 
M'Intosh was held. The Shawanees are the fellows the 
present treaty was intended for ; they seem to hang back. 
Indians treated very kindly — dancing parties in our 
council house almost every afternoon ; the men jump, 
stamp and exert themselves much, but all keep good 
time ; females glide round, and have a gait or step pecu- 
liar to themselves. An old fellow has a keg, with skin 
drawn over each head — sort of drum on which he beats 
time — considerable regularity — dance in a circle round 
the fire — can't dance without something to make their 
hearts warm, and generally break up pretty merry. 
Very few went home sober, but those who did were sure 
to get drunk at night. They would come next day and 
peremptorily demand a quantity of rum; on being re- 
fused they set homeward very much offended, declaring 
that the next day should move them off, never to be seen 
as friends again. This day our clothing came. 

Dec. 20tJi. — The commissioners are of opinion that 
a post will be continued here ; they think it an eligible 



268 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

position until we are in possession of Detroit, &c. It 
is convenient to the principal body of the savages who 
inhabit the head waters of the Miami, and we are about 
seventy-five miles north of Lexington, to which place a 
road is now marked out ; the Falls of Louisville, below, 
and Limestone settlement above. 

21st. — Sent a return to Colonel Harmar by Mr. Hu- 
lings, inclosed in a letter, the copy of which is as follows : 

Colonel — Since my last, the commissioners after sending back the 
Shawanee chiefs, to bring in their nation and others on the Wabash, &c., 
have taken a trip to the Rapids, where they left General Clark. Whether 
he will return or not, is a doubt with us ; but General Butler and Gen- 
eral Parsons say he will be up in a few days. Our reason for thinking he 
will scarcely return, is, that while here he had received almost daily 
complaints from the people on the frontiers of Kentucky, against the In- 
dians, and reflecting on him for trifling, as they think, with some of the 
savages, while others are plundering thein. The people are very ripe for 
a campaign into the towns. 

A runner arrived two days since with a speech from the Shawances, 
informing us of the whole nation being on their way to this place. But 
after they do arrive, there are several more nations to be coaxed, so that 
from every appearance, next spring will bring up the rear of the treaty 
Much more indulgence is allowed the Indians here than was at M'Intosh. 
Dancing, playing common, &c. (for which they are well supplied with ma- 
terials to make their hearts merry), are frequent amusements here. Major 
Finney is determined they shan't act Pontiac with him, for every precau- 
tion is taken at that time. 

The commissioners are of opinion that this place is the most advanta- 
geous spot to keep troops at, until we have possession of others farther 
northerly, as it is convenient to the principal body of the savages, and 
nearly an equal distance from the Rapids, the interior part of Kentucky, 
and Limestone, which is the upper part of the settlement. There has 
been a road marked out from this place to Lexington, their capital town, 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 269 

from which we can have any supplies we might stand in need of. The 
distance is about seventy-five miles. 

The companies' clothing came to hand yesterday, all in good order. 
The commissioners made a compliment to Major Finney of as much white 
half-thicks as made each man a pair of over-alls ; they have been worn for 
some time past, so that their sufferings are not so great as you might 
imagine. Opportunities are so seldom up the river that I can't possibly 
send you returns as regular as I could wish, but none shall be neglected. 
I have the honor to i-emain, your very humble servant, 

E. D. 

23^?. — General Clark arrived from the Rapids, which 
was a very agreeable surprise, as few of us expected him. 

2bt]i. — A very dull Christmas (Sunday) . 

2^tli. — The chiefs of the Delaware nation (particularly 
Captain Pipe) made proposals to our commissioners to 
send once more to their towns, to know why a certain 
tribe of their's did not come in agreeably to a promise, 
and likewise, if the commissioners would send a mes- 
senger, he should be accompanied by their runners into 
the Shawanee towns, and to the more western towns, to 
bring a final answer from them. All was agreed to ; and 
at the request of the commissioners, Mr. Doyle prepared 
to accompany Mr. Ranken. 

29?f^. — T^Tew deputation sent to bring the Shawanees, if 
possible, to treat — Lieutenant Doyle went along — all 
mounted. The caravan took up the line of march, and 
was expected would move on in state. Mr. Doyle, with 
his friend, Mr. Ranken, and a young man, an assistant, 
with two Indian men and several women, formed the line. 
They had not been long on the road until a very heavy 
cold rain came on, from which they must have suffered 



270 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

much ; but as the party consisted of old warriors, it was 
expected they would not be discouraged at any difficul- 
ties of that kind, but proceed as men employed on such 
business ought to. 

Slsf. — I set out in company with two Shawanees to 
provide a few turkeys for the first of the year, and at the 
request of General Parsons, agreed to meet him, General 
Butler and Major Finney, at a large pond about six 
miles up the river ; they to go in a boat. After we had 
rode the distance of four or five miles (for our party was 
all on horse-back ; I was mounted on one of the Indians' 
wife's horse and saddle), we got amongst the turkeys; 
and the first thing done was to charge upon them, so as 
to cause them to fly up on the trees, and all the bowlings 
and fi-ightful screeches I ever heard, were given to effect 
this purpose. As soon as the turkeys rose we alighted 
and commenced firing. In this manner we sported with 
two flocks, until we had as many as we could convenient- 
ly carry home ; then steering our course toward the boat, 
met a horse belonging to the Indians, and the only one 
that was left behind ; he missing his old companions, got 
on their track, and having a bell on, alarmed the boat, 
just as it was putting into the place appointed for our 
meeting, and occasioned them to make to the other side 
of the river ; so we were obliged to return home without 
the refreshment which we expected fi-om them. 

Jan. 1st, 178G. — Agreeably to an invitation, the com- 
missioners and their gentlemen dined with Major Finney, 
Mr. M'Dowell and myself, in our hut, where we spent a 
few sociable hours in memory of the late year, and drink- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 271 

iiig rsuccess to the ensuing one. Just as tattoo was striking 
off, a gun was fired on the river and a light shone that 
did not a little alarm us, but upon examination was dis- 
covered to be a boat passing ; w^e made her come to shore. 
One of her hands was an old man, who had been lately 
made a prisoner by the Shawanees. His story is as fol- 
lows : About two wrecks since, himself and his two sons 
were hunting on the head waters of Yellow Creek ; at 
a time when the sons were after their horses, two Indians 
came on him, and after inquiring of his company (for 
they could talk English) moved off very rapidly, taking 
him along as a prisoner ; he says they treated him toler- 
ably, only that his hands were bound ; but when they 
arrived at the Indian town, an old man took the direction 
and loosed his arms, returning to him his blanket, which 
had been taken, along with a rifle and some ammunition. 
He was kept about two hours, when the same old man, 
who could talk very good English, conducted him from 
the town, placed him on a path that led to where two of 
the old man's sons were hunting ; he at the same time 
gave the prisoner a horse, three pints of parched corn 
and a shell to deliver to these boys, and then sent him 
off. The prisoner found the boys and delivered the shell ; 
they knowing the horse, and understanding the token, 
conducted the prisoner down to the Three Islands, about 
eleven miles above Limestone; and just as they ap- 
proached the river they discovered a boat on its way 
down. The Indians being apprehensive of some danger 
fi'om the boat, did not wait for its coming ashore, but 
after bidding farewell with the white man, took their 



272 MILITARY JOURIs^AL OF 

horse, wliicli lie rode, and moved oif. The white man 
hailed the boat, got on board, and so arrived at this place. 

2d. — Major Montgomery and Mr. Elliot arrived with 
two of the horses that they went in search of ; the third 
one they were not able to get, but expect that Colonel 
Boon, a very worthy gentleman at Limestone, will re- 
cover him. 

StJi. — Lieutenant Doyle arrived, and informed us that 
after a disagreeable march of sixty miles, they were met 
by a party of one hundred and fifty Shawanees, on Sun- 
day, the first of the year. After consulting, it was agreed 
that he and Mr. Rankin should return, and Wengeanem, 
the Indian chief, go forward as far as was first intended ; 
indeed, the chief thought, that as Lieutenant Doyle and 
Mr. Rankin were under his protection, that he ought to 
have the right of ordering them, and did order them 
back with the Shawanees, Lieutenant Doyle says that 
the few nights he w^as with them their march was con- 
ducted with great regularity ; that the whole appeared to 
be formed in certain squads, equal in number, and when 
any of their young men or hunters would kill meat, it 
was brought, laid down by the chiefs, one of whom cut 
it into as many shares as there were squads or fires (for 
every squad had their own fire) and sent it off by men, 
who appeared to serve as fatigue men for the day; so 
there was no one lived better than anotlier, but all fared 
alike. Every evening after they halted and fixed them- 
selves properly, Captain Johnny, a young Indian who 
lived with the chiefs, and seemed to act as an aid, would 
take a drum made out of a keg, with skins tied over each 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 273 

end, and beat some kind of a signal ; on hearing which, 
the whole would assemble and spend the greatest part of 
the night in dancing and feasting. Lieutenant Doyle 
continued with them until the whole got within twenty 
miles of the Fort, when hearing that they intended 
resting at that place, while another party of the same 
number would join them, he took leave of Mr. Ranken 
and came with his suite to the garrison. 

9th. — George AVhite-Eyes and Pipe's son, set out with 
dispatches for Muskingum, the purport of which was to 
have stores and liquors sent down. 

IMli. — We received information of the Shawanees in- 
tending to come into the council house, and that on their 
approach they would salute us with three rounds per 
man. Our commissioners knowing them to be a very 
proud nation, thought it best to pay them the same 
honors, and ordered preparations in a style rather de- 
grading to the United States, wdiich was, that a party 
of soldiers should cook and serve out provisions to them 
in the council house. Now with them, the most decrepit 
old women are made choice of for that business ; and 
nothing could have occasioned greater laughter than the 
appearance of soldiers carrying kettles of provisions to 
them. When the Indians saw them, they cried out, 
" There come the old women with warriors' coats on," &c. 
And who knows but they conceived us all old women 
clad in uniform. In order to return their salute, twelve 
men were ordered to parade, with three rounds of car- 
tridges, and myself to command them. We waited 
their approach, which was very solemn. As they came 
18 



274 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

up they gave us Indican music, beat on a keg drum by 
one of tlie chiefs, the whole singing at the same time. 
Their line was formed in rank of file, the women bring- 
ing up the rear, all in very regular order. When their 
firing was over I commenced, and in the intervals gave 
them a tune on the drum and fife. 

After all were seated, their chief warrior, Wiendooha- 
lies, fi'om Wapotomaky, rose and wiped our eyes, open- 
ed our hearts, &c. After Avhich our commissioners de- 
livered a si^eech, informing them of their commission and 
Congress' desire to treat with all nations between the 
Mississippi and the St. La^\Tence, north of the Ohio, and 
bidding the Shawanees welcome to the thirteen great 
fires ; that at their next meeting the business would be 
entered into more fully. The Shawanees then desired 
to shake hands with the warriors ; accordingly the officers 
paraded in the centre and received them all by the hand. 
A smoke from their pipes of peace took place next ; and 
about dark a signal was given to march, and ofi" they 
went. 

IWi. — It snowed until the ground was nearly six 
inches covered; but immediately after came warm 
weather which melted the whole, and caused the river 
to rise. 

21s/. — Bohengeehalus, ^ with about twenty Delawares, 
arrived. They were saluted in the same manner that 
the others Avere. Bohengeehalus is esteemed one of the 
greatest warriors now among all the Indians. After he 

^ Bohengeehalus, a very large stout man, brother of the " Grenadier 

Squaw." 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENXY. 275 

had seated himself he discovered General Clark, and 
knowing him to be a great warrior, rose and saluted him 
very significantly — instead of taking hold of each other's 
hands, they gripped nearly at the shoulder, and shook 
the left hand underneath the right arms. 

This evening we were entertained with the Shawanees 
dancing much in the same manner as was performed bv 
the Wyandots, but the assembly was vastly larger. After 
they had gone through several of their common dances 
they prepared for a war dance. The Shawanees have a 
variety of dances ; but the most pleasant one is their 
social dance, as it is interpreted. As many young men 
as please, form a ring round the fire, move, dance and 
sing tove songs ; the girls looking on for some time — at 
length they rise one after the other, as the spirit moves 
them, and seize a partner. The couple stick to each 
other, dancing and performing every possible gesture, 
but still keep in the ring, singing and beating time to 
their music. JN'ow^, while busily engaged, the j)arties ex- 
change some articles of dress, or other things, as a token 
of their res'ard. The sirls were verv fond of o-ettino- a 
few of us engaged in this dance. But the war dance ex- 
ceeds all — it was performed at the request of the officers. 
Eight or ten of the most active men stripped themselves 
quite naked, except the breech clout, painted their bodies 
and faces, so as to have a horrid appearance ; armed with 
tomahawk and scalping knife, they formed a circle, 
danced moderately to a mournful kind of tune for ten or 
fifteen minutes, gave the war-whoop, and sat down to- 
gether on seats placed for the purpose. They noAV hung 



276 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

their heads — a dead silence for a short time ; one gets up, 
dances and capers to the music — repeats his exploits, 
the injuries they had sustained, urging the others to be 
strong, and rise and revenge themselves uj^on their ene- 
mies. At length they are roused, one after the other, 
until all get up, when they commence the most tremen- 
dous yelling, jumping and figuring about in imitation 
of shooting, scalping and tomahawking, exerting them- 
selves exceedingly, until a signal is given for silence. A 
short speech concludes. 

2Mh. — The treaty concluded at M'Intosh was explain- 
ed to Bohengeehalus and his tribe, to their satisfaction. 

2otli. — One of the Shawanee chiefs died. 

2Qth. — Shawanees occupied our long house in dancing 
every day, for ten days past. Officers and young gentle- 
men attending the commissioners very frequentl}" join 
them. Business opened this day by an excellent speech 
from our commissioners to all the Indians — about four 
hundred present. The boundary lines, designating the 
lands allotted the several nations, were particularly de- 
scribed and pointed out on the map. They were told 
that as they had joined the English and taken up the 
hatchet against the United States, and the war having 
terminated in favor of the latter, and that the English, 
also, to obtain peace, had ceded the whole of the country 
on this side of the lakes to the Americans ; that they, 
the Indians, must now look up to the Americans, and 
ought to be thankful if allowed to occupy any part of the 
country, which by the war they had forfeited ; neverthe-- 
less, more perhaps than they expected would be done for 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 277 

them, but tliey must leave hostages for their good be- 
havior, &c. 

21th. — Shawanees met in council house. Their head 
warrior, Kickwaypalathey, replied to the speech of yes- 
terday ; denied the power and right which the United 
States assumed ; asked if the Great Spirit had given it 
to them to cut and portion the country in the manner 
proposed. The Ohio river they would agree to, nothing- 
short ; and offered a mixed belt, indicating peace or war. 
Tlone touched the belt — it was laid on the table ; Gen- 
eral Clark, with his cane, pushed it off and set his foot 
on it. Indians very sullen. Commissioners told them 
it was well, that the United States did not wish war, that 
two days yet would be allowed to consider of the terms 
proposed, and six days more with provisions to return 
home ; but after that to take care, for they would cer- 
tainly feel the force of the United States. Council broke 
up hastily. Some commotion among the Shawanees. 
Returned same afternoon and begged another meeting, 
when their old king, Molunthy, rose and made a short 
speech, presented a white string, doing away all that 
their chief warrior had said, prayed that we would have 
pity on women and children, &c. 

Feh. 1st. — Treaty concluded and signed ; presents de- 
livered, and provisions furnished each tribe for six days. 
Five Shawanees left as hostages. 

8^^. — The commissioners, messengers and attendants, 
left us ; returned in three boats. Wrote to Colonel Har- 
mar at Philadelphia. Our commissioners Avere heartily 
sick of continuing so long at this place ; their fare was so 



278 MILITARY J U E X A L OF 

indifferent for a month past, having nothing but whiskey 
with beef and bread. Fortunately a boat arrived two 
days before they determined to start, which sup2:)lied 
them with some liquors for their trip, and a small quan- 
tity of sugar, an article they have been out of since the 
rum was done. After they had prepared and determined 
to start up in boats, took leave of us in the afternoon, 
and hoisted sail. We fired a few rounds by way of 
a salute. They having a fine wind, and their boats, 
three in number, being well rigged with a sail each, 
soon got out of sight. 

By Lieutenant Doyle, who accomj^anied the commis- 
sioners, I sent two returns to Colonel Harmar, one dated 
the 1st of January, the other the present date; they 
were both inclosed in a letter a cojjy of which is as fol- 
lows, viz : 

Colonel — We were agreeably surprised a few days after I wrote you 
last, with the arrival of General Clark in a small canoe. I think I men- 
tioned his going to the Rapids with the other commissioners, and not re- 
turning with them. I likewise mentioned that the Shawanees were on 
their way to the treaty ; it was true, but their movements were very slow, 
for they did not arrive until the 14th of January. Lieutenant Doyle and 
Mr. Rankin (one of the messengers) had set oflF to go to their towns, but 
meeting them about sixty miles distant, returned. Lieutenant Doyle's 
description of their march, and the mode of conduct since they arrived, 
confirms the character which we had of them, which is a proud, ambitious, 
smart nation. The young men seem to be under strict subordination to 
two or three old sachems. They have a white flag, which they marched 
in with, a drum and several other instruments of music. The pipe of 
peace is the most elegant I have ever seen. They have a greater com- 
mand of their appetites than some other nations ; as a proof, they abso- 
lutely refused receiving any liquor for some days after their arrival. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 279 

'Tweuty -first of January a tribe of Delawarcs came in. The leader's 
name is Bohengeehalus. It is said he is the principal warrior amongst 
the Wyandots and Delawares. Nothing more than an explanation of the 
treaty at M'Intosh was done with him. 

Twenty-sixth, our commissioners delivered a speech to the Shawanees, 
setting forth their business, &c., and acquainting them of the country 
which would be allowed them. Next day a reply was made, in which they 
burlesqued the dividing of lands, and asked if the Great Spirit directed 
the Americans to cut and divide the land as was proposed; no, they did 
not understand that part. The Ohio, they thought, was the fittest line, 
and if we were satisfied, they would agree to let it remain the boundary. 
At hearing this we began to entertain different notions of matters, but the 
affair was soon cleared up. The commissioners did not attempt to touch 
the string which was given, and without rising, determined on an answer, 
which was, that if they did not agree with the terms proposed, in two 
days, they should then be furnished with six days provisions to carry 
them home, and no harm should be done them during that time ; but after 
that take care, for they would certainly feel the force of the United States. 
Council was not broke up more than fifteen minutes when a messenger 
came for the commissioners. After they had assembled, the chief took a 
white string and destroyed the whole of his former speech. 

On the 1st instant the treaty was concluded with the Shawanees, and 
articles similar to those at M'Intosh were signed. 

The Half-King of the Wyandots has acted meanly in the business of 
this treaty : he endeavored to prevent the Shawanees agreeing to our pro- 
posal, with a view, we suppose, of expecting a larger quantity of goods 
that he thought would be a drug on our hands j but when he found they 
desired peace, and were determined to agree, he then declared that he had 
not given an answer to the treaty at M'Intosh, nor would he give one here; 
but when the warm weather would come, he would then go to Congress 
and hear from them what was to be done with these lands. No reply was 
made to this. A few days after he desired a council for himself and the 
Delawares. When they convened, he rose and very strenuously insisted on 
the commissioners enlarging the country allowed his people and the Dela- 
wares. The commissioners told him that matter was settled, and they 



280 MILITAEY JOURXAL OF 

would not make the smallest alteration. Captain Pipe, of the Delawares 
(who was sitting listening), rose and said, " Brothers, the Delawarea are 
perfectly contented, they have land enough ; and as a proof of our satis- 
faction, myself and another chief, with several young men (good hunters), 
will go as soon as we hear of the surveyors being out, and assist them to 
mark the lines, and (turning to the Half-King) you'll go too. The Half- 
King was so much confused he said nothing. 

The Lord knows when we'll get rid of these creatures. 

Major Finney does not expect to leave this place until further orders 
from you. He has lately received orders from Major Wyllys, dated at 
M'Intosh, to send him returns of the troops, and that only four rations 
(extra) were allowed to a complete company. The commissioners think 
it probable another treaty will be held next summer, somewhere to the 
northward of this place. They i-egret the misfortune of not holding this 
one somewhere near Detroit; however, they all clear themselves of that 
matter. 

Our men have been kept in health with plenty of exercise ; but in 
spring we may expect fever and ague, as the country about here is very 
low, and frequently covered with water. 

Three privates of Captain Doughty's company and two of Captain 
Hart's, that were here, have returned with the commissioners. 
With respect, &c. 

E. D. 

Wi. — Captain Dunn had arrived the day before from 
Lexington, on his way to the Shawanee towns, where he 
intended spending winter. He took leave and set off 
with several of the Shawanee chiefs. General Clark left 
us this day for the Falls. 

Vdth. — A canoe came down from Limestone, and in- 
formed us that this morning our commissioners were not 
more than seven miles up the river, but they had got 
under way early in the morning. 

\2tli. — I wrote to Mr. James Parker at Lexington, 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 281 

relinquisliing all claims to our former connection, provi- 
ded lie would clear me of the obligation given Captain 
Parker for warrants. The bearer was Mr. West. 

ISth. — Mr. Sims passed for Fort Pitt, with whom I 
sent the following letter to Colonel Harmar : 

Colonel : — I forgot to mention that upon the arrival of the Wyandots, 
Shawanees and Delawares from White river, we were saluted by them, 
and having received notice of their approach and intention of firing, we, 
agreeably to the commissioners' request, returned the salute with three 
rounds of twelve men each time ; and previous to the commissioners leav- 
ing the garrison to embark, Major Finney directed me to parade the com- 
pany, march them down to the bank, which is about one hundred yards 
from our fort, and there to form, so as to present arms to the commission- 
ers as they passed to the boats ; this was done, and when they had taken 
leave and hoisted sail, I gave them a platoon by way of an acknowledg- 
ment. 

General Clark left us for the Rapids on the 10th. He did not trouble 
us with much parade, neither did he take away any of our men. This 
last was a matter Major Finney endeavored to prevent as much as possi- 
ble. There would not have gone half the number of soldiers from us 
up the river, only for the petty messengers who took up as much room as 

the commissioners, and occasioned a third boat. There were B , 

M , E , and Mr. K , all in constant pay at twenty shillings, 

three dollars, and twenty-five shillings per day, in proportion as they 
ranked. These men went out together to the towns, returned together, 
and were waiting here, when we arrived. The Lord knows what service 
some of them were of, for we can't imagine. 

We are now clear of commissioners, messengers, Indians, and every kind 
of animal except five hostages. Such a sudden change makes me rather 
melancholy. I feel as if I ought to have gone with them; though my 
desire is to stay. I would be glad enough to be up, but the season is so 
cold, that I think the trip would be very disagreeable. I will be very 
thankful if you will put it in my power to go up in the beginning of 



282 MILITAEY JOURXAL OF 

April, or as soon as convenient, and leave for a few weeks, that I might 
settle some affairs at Carlisle ; for if we should go any farther off I shall 
despair. 

E. D. 

26th. — Captain O'Hara (the contractor) arrived with a 
large cargo of Indian goods and stores for the commis- 
sioners. He came in consequence of the dispatches sent 
by George White-Eyes on the 9th of January. This was 
a time when they expected all the western Indians. He 
likewise brought with him the settlements for last year's 
serA'ice, and two months' cash for the present, with six 
months' subsistence for the officers. 

Captain O'Hara informs us that he lay with the com- 
missioners the night of the 23d instant, about twenty- 
five miles below the Great Kanahwa; that Captain 
Beatty, our pay-master, was coming to this place to pay 
the troops the above mentioned money, but being very 
unwell, and having orders to return with the commis- 
sioners, he j)ut the cash into his hands and went back. 

March 1st. — Major Finney commenced the payment, 
and Captain O'Hara opened a cheap assortment of goods, 
which lie disposed of to the soldiers as quick as they re- 
ceived their money. 

3df, Ath and 5th. — After they had laid out the greatest 
part of their settlements for dry goods, reserving only a 
small share for liquor, they got permission to purchase 
the same, and toleration to get drunk, so that it would not 
interfere with their duty ; but this charge had no eifect ; 
for three days there was scarcely one sober man in the 
garrison, and God knows how long they would have con- 



MAJOR EBENEZEE DENNY. 283 

tinned so, if the issues had not been stopped. So between 
the wet and dry aflfairs, Captain O'Hara will take nearly 
the same sum of money back that he brought, except 
what the officers received. 

12th. — Two boats called from Fort Pitt, on their w^ay 
to "0-post," loaded with liquors and flour. 

17th. — A majority of the men in garrison arc Irish. 
The soldiers requested to have the privilege of cele- 
brating this day, as was customary. Accordingly the 
bung was opened and every man had permission to 
purchase and drink what quantity of liquor he pleased ; 
and a pretty good portion did some of them take, for 
toward the evening w^e had not six men in the garrison 
fit for duty, not even the guard excepted. 

18th. — Gr. Palfrey died from the effects of too much 
liquor — and was buried the next day. 

20th. — Since our establishment at this place a few 
families had erected a station six miles below us, on the 
Kentucky side. This morning an express fi'om them 
informed us that Indians had attacked two of their peo- 
23le, a short distance out, killed one and wounded the 
other. The wounded person escaped in. I took a light 
boat, with sergeant and twelve, hastened to the station ; 
found the dead man scalped and cut in several places ; 
buried him, assisted in securing the stockade, &c., and 
returned. 

21st. — Mr. Bradshaw arrived about ten o'clock at 
night, with a boat loaded with provisions ; likcAvise Mr. 
Devoire and Mr. Le Bere arrived on their w^ay into the 
Indian country. Mr. Le Bere intends spending a few 



284 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

weeks in the Indian towns and then return by way of 
Sandusky, to join his company at Muskingum. 

2A:th. — This night the five Shawanee hostages deserted 
from their lodging, and i^ushed Avith great expedition 
toward the towns. They likewise took with them ^Ir. 
Sufferins' family, who were encamped about a mile dis- 
tant — Mr. Sufferins being absent on a hunting party. 

2bth. — Our interpreter, Mr. Sufferins, came in ; very 
much surprised at finding his people had gone off, and 
still more when hearing how the hostages had left us. 
This day we completed a block-house on the bank, to 
guard the boats. 

2Qth. — Mr. Sufferins set off on purpose to overtake 
his family and the hostages, if possible, and to know the 
reason of elopement. But after riding twenty miles, 
only arrived at the place where the}^ lay the night before. 
The distance he thought they might be in front of him, 
at the rate they had gone, discouraged him fi'om pursu- 
ing any farther, and he turned back with the intention 
of prej^aring to go to their towns. 

21th. — We were surprised by the arrival of !Mr. Abner 
Dunn, an old officer, who had been to the Shawanee 
towns. He arrived with five Indians (Shawanees) and 
six white prisoners. Mr. Dunn informed us that their 
chief, with the six prisoners, had halted about five miles 
off, being doubtful of the manner in which they would 
be received, having the night before sent two runners 
with some tobacco for us to smoke until their arrival, 
and to get leave for their friends, the hostages, to go and 
meet them ; but when the runners came and could see 



MAJOR EBEJ^EZER DENNY. 285 

no hostages tliey retired undiscovered, and informed their 
people, which alarmed them ; however, Mr. Dunn pre- 
vailed on five of them to go in with him and the others 
to remain until he would send for them. The Indians 
soon found us to be friends, and sent for the remaining 
party. After they had all arrived, the White-Horn, 
their chief, seemed much astonished at the conduct of the 
hostages. Two speeches were delivered by Johnny Har- 
ris from Molunthy, their king ; one of them consisted of 
professions of friendship, &c., the other was information 
respecting some parties of Cherokees that were out. 

dOth. — Major Finney delivered a speech to the Indians 
and sent a message to their king, thanking him for his 
information respecting the Cherokees, after which they 
marched oif. The night preceding, a girl and boy of the 
prisoners that were delivered u^:) yesterday, eloped. 

31s^. — This night Corporal Thompson and John Geary 
deserted, and took oif one of our best boats. 

A;pril 1st. — Sergeant Wilcox pursued the deserters. 

2d. — Captain O'Hara and Mr. Smith left us for Fort 
Pitt. 

Ath. — Mr. Dunn took leave for the Falls. 

Copi/ of a Letter to Colonel Earmar, dated 31s« March, 1786. 
Sir — The Shawanees have been very slow in executing their business 
respecting the delivery of the prisoners. They overstayed the time agreed 
on better than a month ; their delay, and an account from the station a 
few miles below (since evacuated), of five Indians attacking two men of 
the place, killing one and wounding the other, we suppose frightened oflF 
the hostages; for on the night of the 24th of March the whole of them 
eloped, and we have not heard from them since. But fortunately, two 



286 MILITARY J U E X A L OF 

days after there came in two chiefs with sis prisoners, whom they deliver- 
ed up, with a speech from their king apologizing for the delay, &c. We 
don't apprehend any danger from the Shawanees immediately, but there 
is now a number of others in the woods for war, that makes our situation 
rather unsafe. They have ki-lled at Limestone and near the Falls — the 
last which I have mentioned above, was about four miles distant. 

Captain O'Hara arrival here on the 26th of February with the ar- 
rearages of pay and clothing for the men who were in service last year; 
in six months notes and two months for the present in cash, and the same 
with six months subsistence for the officers. He brought with him a 
pretty assortment of goods suitable for the soldiers, which he let them 
have at reasonable prices. I believe he will take back all the notes and 
cash (which are the same to him), except what the officers received. I 
mentioned in a letter some months ago that the commissioners had made 
a compliment to Major Finney of cloth for over-alls for the men. Since, 
there has some alteration happened or otherwise it was a mistake in me, 
for as they went up the river they met Captain O'Hara near the Great 
Kanahwa, and turned the account over to him. He has charged each man 
that had them with his price. 

There was a letter received from Mr. Armstrong, (to which he put his 
title, Lieut. 1st A. R.) for the purpose of acquainting us of his promotion. 

Colonel — as I stand next on the list, am induced to beg your interest to 
fix me clear of the censure of a number of my friends. For certain it is 
that I have in some measure lessened, having once served as an officer a 
grade higher, and that at a more honorable time than at present. But 
the attachment I have to a military life, and the expectation of rising, 
persuades me to this duty, hoping that my friends, yourself in particular, 
will assist me in procuring a lieutenancy — what I once had the honor to 
hold under you. 

I shall ever endeavor to render satisfaction for your assistance in this 

very material affair, as well as for many past, 

While I have the honor to subscribe myself, &c. 

E. P 
N. B. Sent a return of the troops with the above. 

23(7. — Captain Blue- Jacket, a chief of tlie Shawa- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 287 

nee nation, came in. He informed us of tlic good in- 
tentions of liis people, and that a number of them 
would hunt this summer near this place, and would 
bring in the skins ; begged that we would receive the 
Shawanees friendly. As a joroof of his friendship, and 
that we might be assured the nation wished for peace, he 
left his son, a boy about eighteen years of age, to con- 
tinue with us until some opportunity would offer for 
sending him home. 

24:t]i. — He took leave, and as he went off said he would 
go by a hunting camp where there were a number of In- 
dians, and inform them how desirous we were to see them 
come in to trade. 

2^t]i. — In the evening there arrived two young war- 
riors of the Shawanees, with a white boy, a prisoner, 
whom they delivered up to us ; and after receiving a few 
presents, and being asked if they did not think the boy 
would run back again, they candidly told us, that he cer- 
tainly would, if not bound or confined some way. This 
was enough. Though the boy seemed fond of having it 
in his power to go to his father's, but yet it was all affect- 
ed ; for in a few hours after a boat came along, bound 
for the Falls, in which he was put, and in a manner by 
force ; for when he found there was no way of escaping 
he cried, and appeared to leave the Indian with more re- 
gret than he could have done if they had been bearing 
him away a prisoner from his mother. 

2%t]L — Our friends, the warriors, left us, and took with 
them Blue-Jacket's son. 

May IMTi. — We have Shawanees with us every day. 



288 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

The most of their hunting men are now in the woods 
around us, at the distance of twenty miles. They intend 
bringing their peltry to barter at this place. Several of 
the boys, and even one young woman of the prisoners, 
made their escape and returned to the Indians. The 
chiefs who have been in, particularly the White-Horn, 
say they never mean to break the chain of fi'iendship 
that now subsists between the Americans and them, and 
threaten vengeance upon the first who infringes upon the 
articles of the treaty. 

ISih. — From a letter sent by Major Finney to the 
commanding officer at Fort M'Intosh, requesting a rein- 
forcement of men at this post, and from several late re- 
ports of troops being on their way to us, we prepared a 
small boat and set out up the river, intending to sail two 
or three hours for amusement, at the same time thought 
it probable we might meet them. We had got about 
four miles, and halted at a spring, when Ave were very 
agreeably surprised hy the arrival of Captain Ziegler's 
company of seventy men — Lieutenant E. Beatty, Doctor 
Allison, and the Major from Connecticut, Wyllys, com- 
manding. 

22d. — I received orders to prepare to go on command 
to the Falls of Ohio. 

2Sd. — Set out with sergeant, corporal and twelve men 
in a barge, for Louisville. River very full. Landed 
next morning at the place — distance said to be one hun- 
dred and fifty miles — run it in twenty-four hours. Four 
Kentucky boats, which passed Fort Finney the day be- 
fore I left it, were attacked at the mouth of Kentucky 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 289 

river by the Indians on both sides of the Ohio, supposed 
to be in number two hundred — fortunately no other 
damage than a few horses killed. Very alarming ac- 
counts of the depredations of Indians in neighborhood of 
Yincennes — a settlement on the Wabash. Every day 
fresh accounts of mischief done in the upper counties 
and on Cumberland. People of Kentucky talk of an ex- 
pedition against the Indians on the Wabash. Four 
days I remained at the Falls, and every day there were 
accounts of men being scalped between that and the 
upper counties. General Clark informed me that he 
had frequent intelligence from the different p»osts on the 
Mississippi and Wabash, which he took from the British 
last war, and that if something was not done immediate- 
ly respecting that country, there will be much more diffi- 
culty in subjecting them than there ever w^as. 

After many altercations between General Clark, my- 
self and the two gentlemen who had the artillery in 
charge, they agreed I should have a piece, wdth a few 
shot, which I immediately had put on board. 

2Sth. — Having procured a brass three-pounder, with a 
few boxes of suitable shot, left the Falls ; embarked 
again for our Fort. River very high, and obliged to 
work up close along shore, giving the savages every jdos- 
sible advantage. This evening, about seventeen miles 
up, we discovered two bark canoes lying on the bank, 
and a number of trees barked, which we supi^osed had 
not been done longer than two days. We j^asscd on 
as silent as possible. This night our cable and anchor 
19 



290 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

served to keep us in tlie middle of tlie river ; but the 
river rose so high it was of no more use afterward. 

30^//. — About a mile below Kentuck we discovered 
some appearance of an Indian camp, and saw a black 
horse with a belt on. ^Ye passed the mouth of Kentuck 
in the night, and lay near a mile above. 

olst. — We met with such strong water below and 
above the Big Bone, that we were obliged to drop the 
oars (though we worked fourteen,) and pull up by the 
bushes ; lay this night five or six miles above Big Bone. 
We arrived safe at the Fort, near the Miami, in the af- 
ternoon, and Avere received with gladness. 

June 1st. — Several Delawares came in, Avho seemed 
surprised at the field-piece which I lately brought from 
the Falls, and at our additions to the Fort. 

11^^. — Captain Pipe's brother, with three other Del- 
awares, arrived with a speech from Pipe, the purport 
of which was, that he hoped we still held the chain of 
friendship fast, that was made between them and us, at 
this place, and informing us, that for his part, nothing 
should be wanting which was in his power to keep the 
Delawarcs and the Americans upon the most friendly 
footing, and begging we would treat his young men (a 
number of whom were hunting near us) as we have 
hitherto done. 

13f/;. — ;Mr. Sovereign came in with the Shawanees 
with a speech from Molunthy, informing us that he was 
very glad to hear we treated his young men so friendly, 
and apologizing for the delay in delivering up the pris- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 291 

oners. He says the nation is divided ; that the people 
of Chillicothe will not hear reason ; they Avill not give 
the prisoners up. In fact, the plain English of which is, 
that a party of them are as much inclinetl for war as 

anything else, from the d d lies imposed on them by 

British emissaries. They are fully of the opinion that 
their king and sachems have sold both land and war- 
riors, and are determined not to agree to what has been 
done. Molunthy gives us information of four men being- 
killed by the Mingoes, on the waters of the Muskingum. 
He says that he has advised the Mingoes and Cherokees 
to be quiet, but they would not hear him. He desires us 
to have patience. He is striving all he can to fulfill the 
promises made to our chiefs at the council fire. 

14:tli. — Mr. Sovereign returned homeward with a speech 
to Molunthy, informing him that we still kept the road 
open, and hoped he would soon send in the prisoners ; 
thanking him for the intelligence he sent, and begging 
he would endeavor to persuade his contentious people to 
listen to reason, otherwise the consequence would be 
fatal ; we would wait with patience for a time, until he 
would fulfill the promises made to our chief at the great 
council fire, &c. 

l^th. — Major Wyllys left us in a small boat bound up 
the river, with whom I sent the following letter to 
Colonel Harmar, with an inspection return : 

Sir — After the arrival of Major Wylljs and Captain Ziegler, I wag 
ordered to the Falls to procure and bring up a field-piece, with ammuni- 
tion, &c. I got a brass three-pounder, with about thirty rounds only of 
ball and grape-shot. And if it had not been for General Clark, who has 



292 MILITARY JOUEXAL OF 

always been our friend here, I should have returned as I went, owing to 
a contentious set of men in civil office there, all of whom are candidates 
for something, and were afraid would be censured by the public for giving 
any of the military stores away, at a time when their country is suffering 
by savage depredations. True it is, that everywhere below us, the Amer- 
icans have as much reason to be engaged in an Indian war as they ever 
had. They are daily losing men in the lower part of Kentuck settlement; 
all which aggravation could not unite the people in a sufficient body to 
carry on any kind of an expedition — such is the division amongst them. 

I brought from the Falls, and delivered to Major Wyllys, all the intel- 
ligence I could collect, amongst which are the particulars of two skir- 
mishes which the Americans at St. Vincent had with the Piankeshaw 
Indians in that neighborhood. 

Some Shawanees and Delawares went with us as usual, professing much 
friendship. The arrival of Captain Ziegler's company has added much 
to the appearance of this place, and something to the other company. 
For since, a better spirit of emulation has subsisted, which has been of 
service. Captain Ziegler tells me the regimental book for last year was 
left at M'Intosh, and not used very well by the officers last winter ; I am 
sorry for it, but hope you will get it. My coming away from that place in 
such haste occasioned several neglects; I even forgot my Bible with you 
We long to see you. With respects, &c. 

E. D. 



26?*^. — Captain Doyle arrived from M'lntosli ; he 
informed us of the arrival of Colonel Harmar and lady 
at M'Intosh. 

July 4:th. — This day was celebrated with three rounds 
of small arms and three with the field-piece, after which 
the gentlemen all dined together. When dinner was 
over thirteen toasts were drunk, each accompanied with 
a round from the three-pounder, attended in the inter- 
vals by two drums, two fifes and a couple of excellent 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 293 

violins. The evening was spent as Avell as circumstances 
would allow of. 

bth. — Captain Beatty and Mr. M'Dowell left us, hav- 
ing been ordered, by Colonel Harmar, to go up imme- 
diately after the arrival of Mr. Doyle. With Mr. 
M'Dowell I sent a letter to Doctor M'Dowell, desiring 
him to ask Colonel Harmar for permission for me to go 
up, &c. 

IZtJi. — Major Finney received a letter from General 
Clark, informing him that on the 1st of August he in- 
tended marching into the Indian country, with fifteen 
hundred men, and requested that the field-piece which I 
brought up might be sent down against that time. 

VI th. — Corporal Thompson, Gairy, and two other de- 
serters, were brought in by three men from Lexing-ton, 
by whom Major Finney received an account from Col- 
onel Patterson of orders being arrived from the State of 
Virginia to the County-Lieutenant of Kentucky country, 
directing them to plan and put into execution an expe- 
dition through the Indian country immediately. It is 
thought General Clark would command. 

Captain Armstrong arrived with the boat and men 
which Major Wyllys took away. He brought a letter 
from Colonel Harmar to Major Finney, in which there 
was an order to send up Ensign Denny, for the purpose 
of acting as adjutant — to repair to a neAV fort at the 
mouth of Muskingum, called Fort Harmar, where the 
Colonel, with Mrs. Harmar, had arrived. 

2M. — Embarked about noon, in a swift boat, with 
corporal and six choice men ; rowed six oars. River in 



294 MILITARY JOUnXAL OF 

good order. Anxious to make a quick passage. Had 
provisions for several days cooked, and boat fitted for 
anchoring in the stream, &c. Reached few miles above 
Little Miami. 

24^/^. — Met the water rising. 

2bth. — Reached Limestone about same time of the day 
we left the Fort ; this is coming at rate of forty miles a 
day. Stayed and cooked. 

2Qth. — Work along. River risen five feet. 

21th. — In the evening pass the Scioto river. 

2^th. — Within a few miles of Sandy. Water falling. 

2Wi. — Pass Sandy and Guyandot. 

30^/^. — Helped forward by a violent storm of wind 
and rain, directly up the river ; reached Great Kanahvra. 

31s^. — Layby drying our things and cooking. 

August 1st. — Got within a few miles of Letart's Falls. 
Water rising rapidly. Met Mr. Le Bere in the evening. 

2d. — Piissed the Falls and anchored ten miles below 
Flin's Station. 

3fZ. — Passed the Scotch Settlement and Flin's, and lay 
in sight of Little Kanahwa. 

A.tli. — In the morning arrived at Muskingum, Fort 
Harmar, where I met with Colonel Harmar and a 
number of acquaintances. Here I was received as a 
brother officer might expect. Though I was ordered up 
in haste, yet I had some hopes of getting a furlough to 
go to Philadelphia, as I had not been absent during our 
service. Having hinted in a letter to Colonel Harmar, be- 
fore I left the Miami, that a short furlough would be very 
acceptable and knowing, that if he could with any kind 



MAJOR EBEXEZEIl DENNY. 295 

of propriety grant it, he would, I deferred asking. Next 
day after my arrival he proposed a furlough ; I thanked 
him and accepted it. But as I had no non-commission- 
ed officer from the Miami, he thought it best to send my 
boat back under the care of Major North and Captain 
Beatty, just arrived and on their way to the Miami, and 
to take a passage to Fort Pitt with Mr. Bradford, who 
was to start on the 10th instant. Fort Harmar is un- 
finished. Doughty's company from New York, Heart's 
and Strong's from Connecticut, are here and at work. 

Wi. — Major North and E. Beatty got under way. 

10th. — Received a furlough for two months ; took pas- 
sage with Lieutenant Bradford, who was ordered to Pitt 
for artillery, stores, &c. 

IQth. — Arrived at the mouth of Little Beaver ; found 
Mr. Hutchens and the old surveyors encamped there. 
Hamtramck's company, from New York ; Mercer's, from 
New Jersey, and M'Curdy's, of Pennsylvania, escorting 
the surveyors. 

11 th. — Reached M'Intosh. Captain Ferguson's com- 
pany here. Here Mr. Bradford had business, which 
would detain him a day. Major Finney and myself 
having no time to lose, agreed to walk to Fort Pitt, thir- 
ty miles distant, knowing that when the boat did move, 
it would take her two days, as the water was ver}^ rapid. 

l&h. — We breakfasted with my old friend. Captain 
M'Curdy, and set oif for Fort Pitt. I tripped along 
after Major Finney exceedingly well, for near two-thirds 
of the way ; but having been confined so long to my 
boat, and not accustomed to walking, I got much 



296 MILITARY JOUKXAL OF 

fatigued; however, we reached Fort Pitt about two 
o'clocli, P. M., where we refreshed ourselves upon a tol- 
erable dinner and a glass of claret. 

August 22d. — I received my mare, left in care of Mr. 
Duncan, in miserable order. 

2Sd. — Left Fort Pitt in company with Mr. James 
Sample. The weather being favorable, we traveled very 
agreeably together as far as Shippensburg, where we ar- 
rived on the 28th. 

29tlL — I got to Carlisle. Time short — staid a few days. 
Left Carlisle for Philadelphia, at w^hich place I arrived 
on the 8th September. 

Sejjt 12tli. — Having completed my business, I parted 
with my friends, James Campbell and several other ac- 
quaintances, and left Philadelphia, with once more my 
face turned toward the western country. 

13^/^.— Got to Carlisle. 

20^^. — Left my friends at Carlisle. 

2€)tli. — Arrived at my uncle, John M'Clure's, on the 
Monongahela, seven miles above Pittsburgh, where I 
left my mare, saddle and bridle, for further use. 

26^/^. — Went in canoe to Pittsburgh, wdiere I met 
Major North and Captain Beatty, just arrived from the 
Falls of Ohio, where they left Major Finney and Captain 
Ziegler with their companies. 

30^/i. — Left Fort Pitt in the boat in which IS'orth and 
Beatty came, and proceeded to ^luskingum, at w^hich 
place I arrived the 3d of October, in the morning. 

FoET Harmar, Oct. 3(1. — John Pratt, formerly Lieu- 
tenant and Quarter-master in the 4th Pennsylvania reg- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 297 

iment, had originally been of Connecticut, came out now 
as one of the officers of that State, and appointed Quar- 
ter-master, myself announced as adjutant. Strong, Pratt 
and Kingsbury belonged to one company and formed a 
mess ; I was invited to join them. Very pleasantly fixed. 

lOtli. — Captain Doughty and Captain Strong left us 
with leave of absence until spring. 

IWi. — Captain Tunas, a Delaware Indian, arrived 
with information that the ditferent nations of Indians 
from the Wabash, who had collected at the Shawanees 
towns with a determination to visit this country, had 
returned home ; that one hundred and twenty Shawanees, 
Mingoes and Cherokees had left Wapotomeky with in- 
tention to strike the people on the Ohio ; that but few of 
the Shawanees continued ; the greater part of them were 
in the Kentucky country, scalping and stealing horses. 
He says Captain Brant, a civilized Indian, had been at 
Sandusky this summer, but his business was not known. 
Mr. Johnston, the British agent, had asked all the red 
people to Niagara; that the Shawanees and a number 
of other nations had gone, but not any of the Delawares ; 
that Johnston told them they would be no people in a 
short time, if they did not unite. They should all be 
one people, and what they did, either to make joeace or 
w^ar, would then be strong. 

Nov. 13t7i. — Three men arrived from Limestone, who 
had been with Colonel Logan against the Shawanee 
towns. They informed us that Logan left Limestone the 
6th of October, marched with eight hundred men in six 
days, to the Shawanee towns, where he found some men 



298 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

and a number of women. The "svarriors had all set out 
to meet General Clark, who was marching with fifteen 
hundred men toward the Wabash, and only a few 
sachems remained at home with the squaws. Colonel 
Logan destroyed all their towns, killed and scalped eleven 
Indians, amongst whom was the king Molunthy, and 
carried twenty-eight Indian women and children pris- 
oners to Danville, where they were kept in confinement. 
The old king was tomahawked after he had delivered 
himself up. Logan found none but old men, women and 
children in the towns; they made no resistance; the 
men were literally murdered. 

15^/;. — Left Fort Harmar in a light boat, a sergeant 
and twelve men ; arrived at Fort Pitt the 22d. 

2-iih. — Rode to Hannahstown, accompanied by Mr. 
Brison. Yiewed several farms and tracts of land in West- 
moreland county, belonging to Colonel Harmar, property 
which he got with Mrs. H. 

Dec. bth. — Was ready to return, but the heavy snows 
and frost had filled the river with ice. 

^th. — Ohio frozen over in many places. Monongahela 
and Allegheny both passable on the ice. 

IWi. — Had several days of soft rainy weather. Rivers 
broke up. The rise of water was sudden. Several boats 
loaded with goods, &c., carried down with the ice passed 
Pittsburgh. An attempt made to save them, but fruit- 
less. We had great difficulty to preserve our boat. 

IQth. — Ohio pretty clear of ice. Loaded our boat and 
sailed for Fort Harmar, where we arrived on the 19th, 
in the morning. In my absence. Lieutenant Pratt, the 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 299 

Quarter-master, attended to the ordinary duties of ad- 
jutant, but much left undone. Regimental book opened, 
monthly returns of the regiment, &c., to be made out 
and transmitted to the War Office. 

Fort Harmae, Mouth of Muskingum Miver, Jan., 1787. 
— N'o change of movement of any consequence. Officers 
and men in close quarters. Officers pass and repass up 
and down to the several posts. Ferguson's company of 
artillery at M'Intosh. Hamtramck, M'Curdy and Mer- 
cer had put up quarters, after the surveying was over, 
at a place which they called Fort Steuben, about thirty 
miles below M'Intosh. Doughty, Strong and Heart with 
their companies at Fort Harmar. Finney and Zicglcr's 
companies had evacuated Fort Finney and erected a 
small work opposite Louisville. One other company, 
commanded by Captain Burbeck, of New York, station- 
ed at "West Point. 

Receiving and digesting the monthly returns of the 
troops at all these different posts, was a business of some 
trouble. Those from the post commanded by Ham- 
tramck less difficulty with. Colonel Harmar thinks 
him one of his best captains. 

Feh. Mh. — Mr. M'Dowell arrived on his way to the 
Rapids of the Ohio. Fortunately there came with him 
a supply of provisions for the troops at Fort Harmar. 
For upward of thirty days past they had been on half 
allowance of flour, with whiskey only one-half their time. 

8fA.— Major Wyllys and Mr. M'Dowell left us for the 
Xlapids. 



300 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

Idth. — Captain Heart and Lieutenant Beatty ar- 
rived from Fort Pitt. The latter brought with him near 
two months pay and three months subsistence, chiefly in 
paper money, and likewise part of the annual allowance 
of clothing for the troops. The money being a particu- 
lar currency of one State only, the officers at this post 
(Fort Harmar) objected to receiving it; for though it 
might answer their present purposes, being in the neigh- 
borhood of the State, yet it might be setting a precedent 
for others, which would be very injurious. Several days 
spent in deliberating upon the receiving this paper 
money. Sometimes it was in contemplation to send it 
back ; again they would conceive it more to their advan- 
tage to keep it. However, as the Colonel had some bu- 
siness up the river, he postponed the payment until (we 
supi^ose) he would consult the officers up the river. Ac- 
cordingly he, Beatty, Pratt and ^Ir. Spear set off the 
forenoon of the 2oth. 

25th. — This afternoon we were agreeably surprised by 
the arrival of Major Finney from the Rapids, after a 
passage of seventeen days to this post. The Major be- 
ing on the way to visit friends down the country, he only 
tarried until next morning and set off up the river in 
hopes to overtake Colonel Harmar. 

March 6th. — Mr. Lakesang called, being on his way to 
the Rapids of the Ohio. He continued over night. By 
Mr. Lakesang I forwarded to Major Wyllys three hun- 
dred hard dollars, and a receipt for thirteen hundred 
dollars, left with me by Beatty to be sent by the first 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 301 

conveyance (Captain Heart witness) . By the same boat, 
and under Mr. Lakesang's care, I sent the proportion of 
clothing for the troops at the Rapids, and likewise a new 
rifle, complete, for Lieutenant Doyle, with a number of 
letters, &c. 

2Qth. — Our commandant, with his suite, arrived from 
Fort Pitt, about seven o'clock at night, and disappoint- 
ed the garrison of a little parade that was intended in 
receiving him. 

21tJi. — Major Hamtramck arrived, having been di- 
rected by the commandant to muster the troops. 

2^tJi. — Muster and inspection took place, after which 
a few manoeuvres, &c. 

April 1st. — The Major left us, bound for Fort Steuben 

10th. — Captain Heart ordered to proceed with his com- 
pany to a place called Venango, on the Allegheny river, 
about one hundred and fifty miles above Pittsburgh ; 
there to erect a suitable work. This place had formerly 
been occupied by French and English troops, but burnt 
down. 

Ibth. — Colonel Harmar, Lieutenant Beatty and Pratt, 
left us, bound for the Rapids. Soon after their depar- 
ture. Major Hamtramck arrived, having been ordered 
down to command at Muskingum, owing to the Colonel's 
absence. 

May 10th. — At night our Colonel arrived from the 
Rapids of the Ohio, to no little satisfaction of all the 
officers at Fort Harmar. 

loth. — Major Hamtramck set off, accompanied by 
Captain Beatty, for Fort Steuben. Captain Beatty goes 
7 



302 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

on to ^^ew York to obtain a settlement for the regiment 
iij) to the first of the present year. 

11 th. — We were surjorised with the arrival of Captain 
Strong, from Connecticut, with dispatches of very con- 
siderable importance to Colonel Harmar, from the War 
Office. 

2bth. — In consequence of the dispatches brought by 
Captain Strong, Fort Steuben has been ordered to be 
evacuated; accordingly Lieutenant Iversey, with sixty 
men, arrived here from that place. Major Hamtramck, 
with the remainder of the troops, are expected daily. 
Hamtramck promoted to Major, in room of Fish of 
JS'ew York, who resigned. Lieutenant Smith, captain in 
place of Hamtramck. 

21 ill. — Captain Strong, with his company, embarked 
on board keel boats for the Rapids of the Ohio. 

June 1st. — Major Hamtramck, with the whole of the 
troops under his command, arrived safe. 

2d. — Cai^tain Mercer, with part of his company, and 
Lieutenant Kersey, set off for the Rapids, on board two 
family boats that were passing down. Ensign Spear, 
with fifty-four men, left us this day for the surveying 
business. 

bth. — Captain Smith, with his company. Ensign Se- 
dam, with part of Mercer's company, Lieutenant Peters, 
Doctor Elliot and myself, left Fort Harmar to join the 
troops at the Rapids. 

10?^^. — In the morning we joined our friends at the 
Falls. 

11th — Our commandant, with Major Hamtramck and 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 303 

Mr. Pratt, the Quarter-master, &c., arrived in the barge. 
They bring accounts that Colonel Todd had returned 
from the Cherokee town on Paint creek, with three or 
four scalps and six or seven prisoners. 

IStJi. — Water favorable. We began to send our boats 
and stores over the Rapids, for fear of low water. Sub- 
altern's command at landing below the Rapids as guard. 
Troops wait for a supply of provisions. Some clashing 
between contractors. Turnbull and Marmie superseded 
by O'Hara and Duncan. When Bradshaw the agent is 
at a loss, commanding officer directs the purchase of 
provisions. 

Juh/ 2d. — Strong's, Mercer's and Smith's companies 
cross the Ohio from their encampment opposite Louisville, 
march down and encamp at the landing below the Falls. 

3d. — Finney's and Ziegier's companies crossed and 
encamped with the others. This evening Ferguson, 
with his company of artillery, from M'Intosh, and Dan- 
iel Britt, with a cargo of provisions on account of late 
contractors, arrived. 

6th. — Captain Ziegler, with a command of a lieuten- 
ant, one sergeant, one corporal and sixty-two privates, 
embarked with all the cattle and horses and a quantity 
of flour, on board eight Kentucky boats and two keel 
boats, with orders to proceed down to Pigeon creek, eight 
miles above Green river, and there wait for the arrival 
of the troops, 

8t7i. — Troops embarked for Pigeon creek, one hundred 
and eighty miles below the Rapids. 

10th. — Arrived in the evening' at Pigeon creek, where 



304 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

we found Captain Ziegler, who had arrived the evening 
before. 

11th. — The cattle, horses and necessary "baggage, with 
fifteen days flour, taken out of the boats, and the boats, 
with artillery, stores and heavy baggage, under com- 
mand of Major Hamtramck, proceeded down the Ohio 
to mouth of Wabash, with orders to ascend that river and 
meet the troops as soon as* possible at Vincennes. Troops 
took up the following order of march, {see Plan,) and 
proceeded by the most direct route for Vincennes, agree- 
abl}" to the advice of a pilot. Columns regulated in their 
march by signals from the drum. Weather exceedingly 
warm and woods close. With heavy packs and not late- 
ly used to marching, the troops were hard put to. We 
encamped on a branch of Pigeon creek. 

12th. — Marched at daylight. Woods not so thick. 
Crossed Pigeon creek twice, and encamped on its bank. 

13^^. — The troops march with more ease — pass through 
a level open country. Buffalo numerous in these woods. 
Several seen standing and gazing at the men, appearing 
to hearken to the drums. Encamped on the head waters 
of Pigeon creek. 

14^/^. — ^larched at the usual time. Pine open country 
until about twelve o'clock, intercepted by a thicket of 
plum and rose bushes, which our pilot said reached to a 
great distance on the right and left. Opened our way 
through. Some delay and disorder. Columns unable to 
keep their proper distances. Cattle scattered. Halted 
until the cattle were collected. Moved on and encamped 
on bank of Patoka. 



304 MILITAEY JOUENAL OF 

we found Captain Ziegler, wlio had arrived the evening 
before. 

11th. — The cattle, horses and necessary baggage, with 
fifteen days flour, taken out of the boats, and the boats., 
with artillery, stores and heavy baggage, under com- 
mand of Major Hamtramck, proceeded down the Ohio 
to mouth of Wabash, with orders to ascend that river and 
meet the troops as soon as* possible at Yincennes. Troops 
took up the following order of march, {see Plan,) and 
proceeded by the most direct route for Vincennes, agree- 
ably to the advice of a pilot. Columns regulated in their 
march by signals from the drum. Weather exceedingly 
warm and woods close. With heavy packs and not late- 
ly used to marching, the troops were hard put to. We 
encamped on a branch of Pigeon creek. 

12th. — Marched at daylight. Woods not so thick. 
Crossed Pigeon creek twice, and encamped on its bank. 

13th. — The troops march with more ease — pass through 
a level open country. Buffalo numerous in these woods. 
Several seen standing and gazing at the men, appearing 
to hearken to the drums. Encamped on the head waters 
of Pigeon creek. 

14:th. — Marched at the usual time. Fine open country 
until about twelve o'clock, intercepted by a thicket of 
plum and rose bushes, which our pilot said reached to a 
great distance on the right and left. Opened our way 
through. Some delay and disorder. Columns unable to 
keep their proper distances. Cattle scattered. Halted 
until the cattle were collected. Moved on and encamped 
on bank of Patoka. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 305 

15th. — Heavy rain over night. Waited till twelve 
o'clock. Got on tolerably well considering our tents be- 
ing very heavy w4th the rain. Encamped on high ground 
near a branch of Patoka. 

16?^^. — Marched at daylight. Passed through a very 
fine rich open country, and arrived at White river about 
twelve : forded, breast high upon the men. Proceeded 
to the river De Shay, and encamped. 

17t7i. — Took up the order of march, not until nine 
o'clock ; moved on near to Vincennes. Met by some of 
the inhabitants. Halted and formed battalion, marched 
into the village with colors, &c., and encamped close to 
the American fort, Clark's block-house. 

ISth. — Moved our encampment about a quarter of a 
mile up the Wabash, for the sake of good water. Here 
we found a number of Cherokee Indians, who had fled 
to the French for refuge. The people on Cumberland, 
joined by the Chickasaws, had lately made an exj^edi- 
tion to their towns and totally defeated them. The 
Cherokees were very shy of us, but being told by the 
French that we intended no hostilities, they rejoiced; 
were thankful and claimed protection. 

21sf. — The French inhabitants prepared and treated 
the officers to a very pretty entertainment. 

25th. — This day Major Hamtramck, with the boats 
and baggage, arrived safe, excepting some few articles 
which could not be brought on, owing to the water being 
so shoal, and were left at the mouth of Wabash, guarded 
by Ensign Sedam and a small party of troops. This 
was a pleasant sight to us, as on leaving the boats we 
20 



306 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

had divested ourselves of everything not indispensably 
necessary. The six companies having now all assembled, 
they made a handsome parade. Men well clothed and 
well disciplined. The order and regularity observed, 
gave the people of Yincennes a very favorable opinion of 
us. Our little camp, formed agreeably, in every respect, 
to the regulations, with the company of artillery divided 
on. the right and left ; tents new, &c., made no indifferent 
show. The inhabitants of Yincennes all French, except 
a few Americans, who found their way here since the 
war ; but few speak English. Had on several occasions 
been visited by militia from Kentucky, who rather 
served to alienate and estrange them. They viewed us 
as belonging to another nation ; called us the real Amer- 
icans. 

2Wi. — Lieutenant Armstrong and forty- five privates 
were detached with craft, to join Ensign Sedam, and as- 
sist in bringing up the whole of the stores from the 
mouth of the Wabash. 

21tli. — Several persons came in who had been with a 
party that were defeated coming up the Wabash. They 
informed us that the day before, just at the Grand 
Raj^ids, a party of Indians, about fifteen in number, at- 
tacked three perogues, killed three men and took four 
prisoners, two of whom were French, who were liberated 
immediately. Among the killed was a soldier of Cap- 
tain Ziegler's company. One of those who made their es- 
cape, informed us that Daniel Britt, with whom we had 
left six soldiers at the Falls (to help him on, expecting 
he would overtake our fleet before it would get to the 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 307 

Wabasli), had passed the Wabash unknowingly, and was 
as low down as Cherokee river; that two of the sol- 
diers had come up from the boat in a canoe, and being 
satisfied of the mistake, returned. Craft has been sent 
for Britt's cargo, and is supposed will proceed until they 
find him. 

2^1. — Two large canoes bearing white flags, appeared 
coming down the Wabash ; they proved to be Pianke- 
shaws, who inhabit the upper w^aters. Had been invited 
by Colonel Le Gras to come and see their friends the 
true Americans. Mr. Le Gras appears to be the chief 
magistrate here ; sort of little governor among the 
French ; is looked up to, and has great influence among 
the neighboring Indians. The Piankeshaws Avere timor- 
ous, having considered the Americans as their enemies. 
Indeed it was but last year that a formidable expedition 
went from Kentucky against their towns (but the princi- 
pal oflicers, jealous of Clark, who had the command, 
excited a dissatisfaction among the corps, and when 
w^ithin a day or two's march of the Indians, broke up 
their camp and returned home). Some pains taken to 
conciliate and dispel their fear. They seemed to rejoice 
at their reception, expressed great satisfaction ; said we 
w^ere different Americans from any they had seen. They 
presented Colonel Harmar with an elegant calumet, and 
departed, intending to return and bring with them all 
the chiefs of the Wabash nation. 

Aug. 4:tli. — A Mr. Vigo, a gentleman of Post Yin- 
ccnnes, gave the oflicers of our corps an entertainment. 
In the evening three Indian men came in, who had 



308 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

been down the Wabash with Lieutenant Armstrong. 
They brought information that forty Piankeshaws were 
lying in wait, at the Grand Rapids, for Lieutenant 
Armstrong's fleet; in consequence of which informa- 
tion, Major Hamtramck, with a captain, one subaltern 
and fifty-eight men, set out in three keel boats to meet 
the fleet. 

^tli. — The whole of our boat stores arrived. 

YixCENNES, Wi. — Colonel Harmar had informed us 
of his intention to visit Kaskaskia and the settlements 
on the Mississippi, and had directed me to detail a sub- 
altern and twenty- eight men to accompany him. I felt 
a desire to see the Mississippi, and ofl'ered myself for the 
command. This the first time I solicited any service ; 
others might do it, but this soliciting service was a busi- 
ness I disapproved. Was living with the Colonel at the 
time. However, he chose that I should not go. Ensign 
M'Dowell was ordered in his turn for this pleasant tour. 
They set out early this morning, accompanied by a very 
accomplished Frenchman, a Mr. Tardiveau. Major 
Wyllys, the senior officer, left to command. A Mr. Ma- 
son, with a small party, left us this day for the Falls. 
By him sent several letters, under cover, to Mr. Kings- 
bury, at the head of the Rapids, addressed to my friends 
in Pennsylvania. One for P. F., Philadelphia ; another 
for Mr. Lyon, Carlisle, and one for Doctor M'Dowell, at 
Muskingum, all respecting my rank, &c. I likewise 
sent per Mr. Bradford, a letter to my friend Parker, at 
Lexington. 

20^/^. — A gentleman from Kaskaskia arrived, but did 



MAJOK EBENEZER DEXNY. 309 

not meet tlie Colonel's party. Must have been upon dif- 
ferent traces. Tells of two hundred Shawanees and 
Delawares having left their villages on the Miami and 
settled across the Mississippi, under protection of the 
Spaniards. That more were expected, as the Spaniards 
had given them pressing invitations. 

21st. — An express arrived from the Rapids, with dis- 
patches for Colonel Harmar from the War Office. By 
this op2)ortunity I received a letter from Mr. Kingsbury, 
telling me that he had forwarded my letter for P. F. and 
the one to Carlisle, per Mr. Abner Dunn, through the 
wildnerness. 

Se_pt. 2d. — A runner from the Piankeshaws informed 
Major Wyllys that the chiefs of the tribes invited down 
had agreed to come, and that he might expect them 
daily. 

3d. — The Colonel and his party returned from the 
Illinois. 

dth. — One hundred of the Piankeshaws and Wyohto- 
mas appeared in great style ; all in canoes, but twelve 
horsemen who guarded the shore. The chiefs' canoes' 
carried white flags. On their approach they gave us 
three fires. We were prepared for this, and had in 
readiness tw^enty men, who returned the salute with 
three rounds. They all came ashore — exj)ressed much 
gladness at seeing us as friends. Taking a little milk 
for nourishment, they set out for town to see their French 
brothers, giving another fire as they went ofi^. 

7th. — Colonel Harmar made a speech to the Indians, 
the purport of which was, informing them of the peace- 



310 MILITARY JOUEXAL OF 

able disposition of the United States ; that lie was di- 
rected by the principal chief to take by the hand every 
tribe of Indians desirous of peace, and authorized to 
destroy those otherwise inclined. He told them that 
everything should be done to make them glad ; that the 
road should be kept clear and smooth between them and 
us, that traders might pass freely and with safety, &c. 
As a pledge of remembrance of the thirteen great fires 
(the thirteen United States) , he presented each tribe with 
thirteen strings of white wampum. 

8//^. — Five of the Indian chiefs each made a rej)ly to 
the Colonel's speech, expressing their gladness at being 
taken by the hand by their fathers the Bostonians. Pro- 
fessed great friendship ; said that they had been misled, 
vrere now sensible of their error; hoped their fathers 
would let all the blood which has been spilt be washed 
down with the river, never to be seen or thought of 
more. That they would stand upon fresh ground, keep 
the road and the stumps between them and their fathers 
quite smooth; and as a proof and remembrance, each 
presented the Colonel with a calumet and a string of 
wampum. 

10^//. — The old chiefs attended, expecting, as was cus- 
tomary, some presents. The Colonel told them that we 
were warriors, that we did not come to purchase their 
friendship with trinkets, but barely to take them by the 
hand if they chose to give it ; if they did not, it was a 
matter of indiiference. But, however, since things had 
been so well settled, ho told them his warriors had a few 
articles, which they would give to the old men only. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 311 

The sachems returned thanks. Pleased to take what 
they coLild get. The greatest beggars I have seen yet 
among all the savages. 

11th. — Two men out of fifteen who had set out on the 
9th for the Rapids, returned, having been fired on near 
the forks of White river, by a party of Indians. From 
their report it is likely the greater number of their com- 
pany fell a sacrifice. This story circulating through the 
town had like to have frightened ofi" all the Indians who 
had been invited. 

13th. — The Indians took their departure. 

15fh, — Lieutenant Armstrong, with a party of soldiers 
and militia, set out to meet a drove of cattle which Mr. 
Bradshaw, with some hands, was bringing on. Fortu- 
nately the two parties met about seven miles ofi", and came 
in the same evening. This day Captain Mercer and Mr. 
Britt arrived from Kaskaskia. 

Yincennes, or Post Yincennes, as it is called, is said to 
be the most capital village in the western country. 
There are about five hundred souls, French, and about 
half as many Americans. It is handsomely situated on 
the left bank of the Wabash, out of danger of the floods. 
The village is built in the centre of a large prairie, the 
greater part of which is at present cultivated, but under 
no inclosure. A sufficiency only is inclosed for their 
cattle, and is in common. Their houses are chiefly frame 
w^ork, and many of them covered wdth bark, Five or six 
families live on the opposite side and have little farms. 
The land is excellent and the country generally fine for 
growing. It was first settled by a Monsieur Yincennes, 



312 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

near seventy years ago, from whom it takes its name 
It is allowed to be one hundred and seventy miles from 
Post Yincennes to Kaskaskia. The i^rairies between 
these two places are remarkable. One, in particular, I 
am told, is thirty miles in width, and near one hundred 
miles in length. They run north and south. They are 
grown up with long grass, free from brush and under- 
wood ; here and there a small copse of handsome young 
trees. The country abounds in buffalo, deer, elk and 
bear. 

Kaskaskia, though more ancient than the Post, is not so 
extensive a village. Opposite is a settlement called Mi- 
sere, Avhere a lieutenant and five or six regular soldiers 
are stationed. About sixty miles above Kaskaskia is 
Cahokia, and opposite it, on the Spanish side, is St. 
Louis, where the commandant (a lieutenant-colonel) 
r^ides, with about twenty soldiers. Between Kaskas- 
kia and Cahokia there are several small villages, some 
of them inhabited by Americans only, who have emi- 
grated to that country chiefly since the late war. 

Post VixcEXXES, SOtJi. — Orders issued for Ziegler's 
and Strong's companies to march next day, with the 
commandant, for the Rapids of the Ohio. Finney's and 
Mercer's companies to embark on the 3d October, under 
command of ]Major AVyllys, for the same place. Major 
Hamtramck, with Ferguson's and Smith's companies, to 
continue at the Post. 

Qcf^ l^s'^. — Set out with the commandant and the two 
companies ; marched to a branch of the river De Shay, 
supposed to be nine miles. 



MAJOK EBENEZER DENNY. 313 

2d. — Crossed the west fork of White river and 

encamped on a branch, 20 

3d. — Crossed and encamped on north fork of 

White river, 24 

4:th. — Reached the Great Lick, - - - 18 

5tJi. — Branch of Patoka, - - - - 16 

6th. — Branch of Blue river, - - - 25 

7 th. — Rapids, 18 

130 

In this route we pursued General Clark's trace, made 
a twelvemonth ago, on his way against the Wabash In- 
dians. First and second day passed through tolerable 
land ; third day very indifferent, owing to the path keep- 
ing about three and four miles distant, for thirty miles 
up the north fork of White river, which led us through 
neither rich nor level land, but just across the heads of 
gullies leading into White river. Fourth day's march, 
passed over a great deal of good land, particularly near 
the Great Lick, which is not far distant from the road. 
When within a few miles of the Lick, our hunters had 
leave to go ahead. Presently heard the report of both 
oueir guns, and in a few minutes five buffaloes made 
their appearance, bearing furiously toward the head of 
the column. When within fifty paces, the men in front 
were permitted to fire ; this turned the heads of the ani- 
mals; they passed along and received the fire of the 
whole line. Three only were shot down, near the rear, 
where they approached within twenty paces. Fifth day's 
march, through pretty good land. Sixth, barren. Sev- 



314 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

entli, broken with knobs and small mountains, until we 
got within seven or eight miles of the Rapids, when the 
land became level and of the first quality. 

9/7^. _ :Mi.. AVells set out for Fort Pitt, with two light 
boats, by whom I sent several letters ; one to Esquire 
Lyon, and inclosed a duplicate of a letter sent from the 
Post to G. F., and likewise two small letters inclosed to 
my friends in Carlisle. 

21st. — Major Wyllys, with our fleet, consisting of 
eleven boats, arrived at the foot of the Raj^ids. 

22 J. — Baggage brought round the Falls in wagons. 
The troops marched up to the fort and took quarters 
with us. 

23d and 2Wl — The men employed in dragging the 
boats up through the Falls. 

Fort Fixxey, Bajnds of Ohio, 28th. — Colonel Harmar 
received brevet commission, with pay and emoluments of 
Brigadier-General. He sets out for Fort Harmar. Quar- 
ter-master Pratt and myself accompany in a barge, with 
sergeant and fourteen men. Orders left for Captains 
Zicgler and Strong with their companies to follow on to- 
morrow. Major AVyllys, with Finney's and Piercer's 
companies, to continue at Fort Finney at the head of the 
Rapids. Got to the eighteen mile Island. 

29th, to Kentucky river. 

SOth, Big Bone creek. 

Slst, Great Miami. 

i\"oy. Is^, to the Little Miami. 

2d, about half way between Little Miami and Lime- 
stone. 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 315 

Sdj to Limestone. 

4th, lay still. 

5tJi, twenty-two miles up. 

6th, just below Scioto. 

7th, thirty miles up. 

8//^, just below Guyandot. 

9th, within eighteen miles of the Great Kanahwa. 

10th, six miles above the Great Kanahwa. 

11th, got five miles above the Little Falls. 

12th, to the Scioto settlement. 

13^/^, arrived at Muskingum, Fort Harmar, after a 
passage of sixteen days — one other day we spent at Lime- 
stone. 

20th. — Lieutenant Beatty arrived from New York, 
with some pay for the regiment. 

21st. — Ziegler's and Strong's companies arrive and 
take quarters for the wdnter. Doughty's company wo 
had left here. M'Curdy's, which had been employed 
through the summer escorting the United States survey- 
ors, was here also. 

24:th. — Alexander Parker and Mr. Dunn arrived on 
their way to Kentucky, by wdiom I received several let- 
ters from my friends at Carlisle and a box of linen. 
Parker and Dunn left us the same day, not wishing to 
lose good weather and high water. 

Dec. 6th. — Captain Ashton, who had come to this place 
with Parker and Dunn, set out for the Falls. 

10^^. — Lieutenant Beatty set out again for IN'ew York 
for more cash. 

12th. — Mr. Jacob Melcher, a candidate for the vacant 



olG MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

ensigncy in the Pennsylvania quota arrived ; with whom 
came John Siddon, a man enlisted for one year to serve as 
a ranger, and who had been taken prisoner on the Wa- 
bash the 26th July last. At the time he was taken, he 
received a slight wound on the hip. The Indians carried 
him to their farthermost town on the Wabash and adopt- 
ed him in a family, where he continued to live peaceably. 
^^^hen an opportunity offered for his escape, he left them 
and passed through several Delaware towns without any 
interruption, and arrived safe at Pittsburgh. 

2bi]i. — The river Ohio bound fast with ice. 

Jan. Ist^ 1788. — The weather continues exceedingly cold. 

bth. — The thermometer sixteen degrees below zero. 
Horses, &c., crossed the river on the ice. 

20tli. — The river broke up — much ice floating. 

Feb. 4:tlL — The weather intensely cold ; the mercury 
down to fourteen degrees below zero. A messenger 
arrived from Captain Pipe, with a fi'iendly talk, request- 
ing that the roads might be kept smooth and clear for 
the Delawares to pass and repass. 

24:tli. — The navigation had been shut or interrupted 
by ice since 20th December last. To-day we had the first 
arrival. Colonel Blaine, his son James, and Mr. C. Wil- 
kins, all old acquaintances of the oflicers, came just fi'om 
Fort Pitt. Very glad to see them. Mr. Wilkins con- 
tinues here, with a store of goods suitable for the troops. 

March 1th. — Colonel Plain aind his son left us and set 
out with Mr. Spear, who was ordered to the Rapids to 
bring up the commissioners' goods, to be in readiness for 
the intended grand treaty. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 317 

8^^. — Captain Pipe and liis tribe came in. 

9f7i. — Although the time, for whicli the men now in 
service were enlisted, does not expire until midsummer, 
yet, to provide recruits and to have them out in season, 
it was thought advisable that a few officers should go to 
their respective States for that purpose. Accordingly 
Captains Ziegler and Bradford (the latter in place of 
Dought}^, promoted,) and Lieutenant Pratt, the Quarter- 
master, all volunteering this service, set out. 

VI til. — Mr. Schuyler pursued the recruiting officer 
with some dispatches whicli had been forgotten. 

April Qth. — Left Fort Harmar, in company with the 
General and Daniel Britt, the contractor, on board a 
barge with twelve oars. 

7t7i. — Rained all day. Got to the fourth island on the 
reach. 

Sth. — Fine day, with wind. Lay just below Fish creek. 

9th. — The river still continues to rise. Had the Avater 
remarkably hard. Got to Grave creek. 

10^/l — The water began to lower. Arrived at Wheel- 
ing about eleven o'clock, when Mr. Britt took horse to 
go by land to Pitt. 

11th. — The river falling fast. Got to Edgington's. 

I2th. — A fine wind. Lay half mile above Beckar's 
Fort. 

ISth. — Got to M'Intosh early in the evening, where we 
tarried all night. 

14:th. — With extreme hard work we got to Fort Pitt. 

15th. — A rainy morning ; the water began to rise. 

IQth.—A. fine day. 17th, the same. 18th, cold rain. 



318 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

19^^. — Blustering rainy weather. 

20tli. — A considerable quantity of snow fell. The 
rivers up to a considerable height ; the weather exceed- 
ingly cold. 

21st. — The weather moderate and the water falls. 

22d. — Some rain, and windy. 23d, fine day. Water 
falls sloAvly. 

24iJi. — Rained in the morning. Cloudy. 

2bt]i. — Wet and disagreeable day. 26th, rain all day. 

Sunclai/, 27th. — It was the Greneral's intention to spend 
a day or two here, and proceed up the Allegheny river 
to Fort Franklin (formerly Venango), but a continuation 
of heavy rains and consequent high water, induced him 
to delay for a more favorable time; but unwilling to be 
absent too long, we set out with high water, and rising. 
This day we passed seven islands, and gained fifteen 
miles. 

28th. — Had severe thunder, with rain. Passed eight 
islands and several lodges of Indians near Kisldminitis. 
Lay five miles above the mouth of that river. 

29th. — Clear and cold. River still rising. Passed 
seven islands, and encamped a mile above Mahoning. 

SOth. — Last night the contractor's boat, from Yenango, 
passed down on its way back to Pitt ; had a passage of 
fifteen days up. Yery hard water to-day. Passed two 
islands ; gained twenty miles. 

Ma^ 1st. — Current this day very rapid. Passed Stump 
creek and six islands ; made about twenty miles. 

2d. — Passed a creek on the east side about nine o'clock. 
Eleven o'clock passed another, and about half after three 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 319 

another of considerable size, on the west side, supposed 
to be Sandy. Five isLands this day, and rain from 
mornino- till nio-ht. 

3^. — About eight o'clock this morning, after passing 
one island, we entered the mouth of French creek. The 
fort stands half a mile up. Several miles below we were 
discovered by some Indians, who cut across and gave 
notice to Captain Heart of our approach. The arrival 
of General Harmar was announced with seven rounds 
of a six-pounder from the fort. Yery kindly received 
by the Captain and Lieutenant Frothingham, at the 
head of their command. The company reviewed and 
dismissed. Spent the day in examining Captain Heart's 
work, viewing the adjacent country and the old fortifica- 
tions of the French and British. There is a fine flat of 
good land here, altogether on the lower side of French 
creek, sufiicient for several farms. The only flat land 
from Mahoning or Mohelboteetam, up. The hills come 
in close on the opposite sides, both of French creek and 
the Allegheny river, and I am informed that the coun- 
try for at least five miles in all directions, is very much 
broken with hills and rocks. Captain Heart's Fort, or 
Fort Franklin, as it is called, is built precisely after the 
one which had been erected by the British, called "Ve- 
nango. It is a square redoubt, with a block-house three 
stories high, in the centre ; stands better than half a 
mile up French creek, upon very good ground ; but the 
situation, in my opinion, by no means so eligible as that 
of old Venango built by the English. This last work 
stood upon commanding ground pretty close to the bank 



320 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

of the Alleglicny, half a mile below French creek, and 
a mile from Fort Franklin. The cellar wall and huge 
stack of chimneys of the block-house, are of stone, and 
yet quite entire. The parapet and some other parts re- 
main perfect, and the whole work might have been re- 
built with half the labor and expense of that built by 
Heart. The only reason the captain could otfer for 
taking new ground, was the convenience of timber. The 
French, who made the first establishment here, chose the 
ground several hundred yards below where the British 
built. They had a small stockade fort; some remains 
of it are yet to be seen. But around the British work 
there is everything to be seen which was not consum- 
ed by the fire — ditches and j^arapets, stone walls, &c. 
vSoveral handsomely disposed gardens, walks, &c., very 
visible, and a few fruit trees remaining still ; some gar- 
den roots, &c., particularly the parsnip, in considerable 
abundance. 

We see a number of the Senecas here. The Sene- 
cas, who inhabit the banks of the Allegheny, some 
three or four day's journey above this, are frequently 
here. They bring their peltry and exchange it with the 
traders for such articles as suit them. We saw several 
families of them ; all appeared indolent, dirty, inanimate 
creatures ; most so of any Indians I had seen. 

Wi. — Left Fort Franklin at five o'clock. Allegheny 
river flowing brim full ; current not less perhaps than 
six miles an hour. We worked twelve oars steadily. 
Had two extra hands that afforded some relief; and 
except about an hour, which Avas taken up in whole in 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 321 

eating, and a little time spent on an island, we lost no 
time. Arrived and landed at the fort on the Mononga- 
liela side precisely at eight o'clock — fifteen hours passage. 
After leaving the mouth of French creek, there appeared 
little else than hills and rocks and rugged looking ridges 
until as low as Mahoning, or what was originally called 
Mohelboteetam ; from thence the bottoms increased on 
one side or the other until we reached Pitt. Some very 
beautiful situations and tracts of land, indeed ; old Kit- 
tanning a delightful one. 

^th. — Accompanied General Harmar on horseback on 
a visit to his lands in Westmoreland county. Made 
nearly the same tour I had done last winter was a year. 
Returned to Pitt on Sunday, the 11th. 

IWi. — Visited my uncle John M'Clure's family, nine 
miles above Pitt, on the Monongahela ; spent a very 
pleasant day. Two or three gentle acquaintances were 
along; they were formerly from Carlisle. A very re- 
spectable portion of the society of Pittsburgh are fi'om 
that place, and this circumstance, no doubt, tends to at- 
tract and to create the social intercourse and very great 
harmony which prevails among them. 

\^t]i, — A Mr. White, member of Congress, and some 
gentlemen of Pittsburgh, accompanied the General in 
the barge, on a visit up the Monongahela to Braddock's 
Field. We viewed the battle ground. Saw several 
small heaps of bones which had been collected, with a 
'little brushwood thrown over them. The bones of the 
poor soldiers are still lying scattered through the woods, 
21 



322 MILITARY J U E X A L OF 

but the ground where the heaviest of the action was is 
now under cultiA'ation. 

17//^ — Lieutenant Beatty, our pay-master, arrived 
from Xew York with cash for the troops. 

20th. — He set out for Yenango by h^nd, escorted by 
five soldiers. After paying that post, he will return to 
Pitt to proceed with us in the barge to Fort Harmar. 

23^. — General Arthur St. Clair, lately appointed Gov- 
ernor of the AYestern Territory, arrived at Pitt. He has 
been expected for some time. Had disj^atched messen- 
gers to the Indian towns to invite them to another treaty. 
Accompanied by the Governor we took another road to 
Braddock's Field, and visited the remains of poor Brad- 
dock's soldiers. On our return I saw my uncle's family. 

^Tttli. — The messengers returned from the Indian 
towns, inform us that no assemblage of them can be had 
for two or three months. The Governor returns to Lig- 
onier, where his family reside. 

28^^. — General Harmar, Mr. White and myself em- 
barked for Fort Harmar, at Avhich place we arrived 
about twelve o'clock on the night of the 29th. Here we 
found Spear and Melcher, two subalterns of the regiment, 
and ^Ir. Ephraim Blaine. They had landed a few hours 
before us. Spear and Melcher, on their way from Yin- 
cennes, below the Falls, were fired upon by a party of 
savages in ambush on the bank, close up which the oth- 
ers were rowing. Two men only were killed. It is a 
matter of astonishment, that when the Indians do attack 
our boats in this dastardly way, from the very great ad- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 323 

vantage they have, that the men in the boats are not all 
destroyed. There have been too many instances this 
spring of our people being fired on, but the loss incon- 
siderable to what it might have been. Preparations are 
making for another grand treaty. Government have 
directed it. Our commandant thinks it all idle business. 
One-half will come in, sign articles and receive presents, 
while the others are killing, scalping and doing us every 
possible damage they can. 

An association of persons in the ]N"ew England States, 
having made a purchase from the United States of a 
tract of country extending along the Ohio about one 
hundred and fifty miles, and back perhaps thirty, had 
formed themselves into a company known by the name 
of the Ohio Company. A number of the proprietors and 
directors elected had come on and fixed upon the ground 
at the confluence of the Muskingum and Ohio rivers, as 
a central situation from which they could extend their 
operations, and at the same time be protected by the 
garrison of Fort Harmar, which was situate on the other 
side of the Muskingum. These men from N^ew England, 
many of whom were of the first respectability, old Revo- 
lutionary officers, had erected and were now living in huts 
immediately opposite us. A considerable number of in- 
dustrious farmers had purchased shares in the company, 
and more or less arrive every week. A spacious city is 
laid out here, called Marietta, in honor of the Queen of 
France. About half a mile up the Muskingum, upon 
very commanding ground, the site of a very ancient and 
very extraordinary fortification, was erected a place of 



324 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

arms and security,, called Campus Martius. Building 
put up of hewn timber, two stories high, forming an ob- 
long square, with strong block-houses in each angle, leav- 
ing a considerable area; here their stores, &c., were 
lodged, and some families perhaps more timid than others, 
reside, but generally both men and women appear en- 
terprising. Generals Parsons and Varum, two of the 
company's directors, were also territorial judges. Mr. 
Symmes, the other judge, was the principal agent in the 
purchase of another tract of country, including the Mi- 
amis. 

8tk. — Jane Beatty arrived from Fort Pitt. 

9th. — Armstrong embarked for Fort Pitt. 

ISth. — Ensign M'Dowell, with a party of soldiers, set 
out to escort Mr. Duncan, the provisions and stores in- 
tended for a treaty, to the Falls of Muskingum. 

June 15th. — Major Doughty embarked in the barge 
for Fort Pitt. Ilis design is to accompany Governor St. 
Clair to this post. 

Jul^ 4th. — The officers of Fort Harmar were enter- 
tained on the point (Marietta side) by the Ohio Com- 
pany. Heard a very suitable oration delivered by Judge 
Varum. 

8(h. — Captain Bradford and Lieutenant Ernest ar- 
rived from IS'ew York, where they had been sent to re- 
cruit. Their Legisla,ture not having taken up the re- 
quisition of Congress for raising the regiment, these 
gentlemen were obliged to return without effecting their 
object. 

9ih. — The arrival of the Governor of the Western Ter- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENXY. 325 

ritory (General St. Clair) was announced by the dis- 
charge of thirteen rounds from a six-pounder. The 
garrison turned out, and troops received him with pre- 
sented arms. 

ISth. — About a month since, Ensign M'Dowell, with 
a command of thirty men, escorted boats with provisions, 
&c., to the Falls of Muskingum, about seventy-five miles 
up, where the intended treaty was to be held. We are 
informed by express that his party were attacked in their 
camp yesterday by a party of Tawas; that his picket 
guard was routed ; two soldiers only were killed and one 
missing. A black servant of Mr. Duncan was killed. 
The Indians w^ere repulsed with the loss of one killed 
and left behind. 

14:tlL — This evening a party with a craft was sent up 
the Muskingum to bring off Ensign M'Dowell, command, 
&c. The treaty, if any, determined to be held at Fort 
Harmar. 

15tJi. — Winthrop Sargent, Secretary of the Territory, 
and one of the directors of the Ohio Company, had 
reached this with the ordinance of Congress respecting 
the government, and with the commissions for the sever- 
al officers. The people convened on the point ; military 
officers invited over. When assembled, the Secretary 
read the law and the appointments. Those people ap- 
pear the most happy folks in the world ; greatly satisfied 
with their new purchase. But they certainly are the 
best informed, most courteous and civil to strangers of 
any people I have yet met with. The order and regu- 
larity observed by all, their sober deportment and perfect 



326 :\I I L I T A R Y J U E X A L OF 

submission to the constituted authorities, &c., must tend 
much to 23romote their settlements. 

16/^. — Lieutenant Ford, who had been stationed at 
Fort M'Intosh, arrived with his party. He is to proceed 
to Post Yincennes to join his company. 

Vith. — Lieutenant Beatty embarked with part of 
Ford's command for the Rapids. 

20//^. — Ensign M'Dowell returned. By his address be- 
fore he left his camp, had managed to get hold of six of 
the fellows who had made the attack upon him. They 
were brought down bound, and confined under the garri- 
son guard. They called themselves Tav»'as and Chippewas. 

28^/^ — Two of our Indian prisoners made their escape 
from the guard. Four of the soldiers had been conduct- 
ing them, as was usual, to the necessary which stands 
outside the fort. Those within are used only after night. 
A corn patch adjoining the necessary. The Indians had 
previously found that the irons on their hands and feet 
could be slipped otf ; when close to the corn, and at a 
moment when the attention of the guard was taken off, 
they slipped their shackles, leaped into the corn field, 
which sheltered them from the view of the sentries, and 
were soon out of reach. 

Aug.7tk. — Ensign Thom^Dson sent express to Fort 
Pitt with orders for Captain Ziegler, who we hear has 
arrived there with his company. 

Sth. — Lieutenant Ford set out for the Rapids of the 
Ohio ; from thence he is to proceed with the pay-master 
to Post Yincennes. 

17th. — Captain Heart arrived from Yenango, and Cap- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 327 

tain Strong set off for Connecticut, by whom I wrote to 
my friend J. C. 

21th. — Judge Symmes, with several boats and families, 
arrived on their way to his new purchase at the Miami. 
Has a daughter (Polly) along. They lodge with the 
General and Mrs. Harmar. Stay three days and depart. 
If not greatly mistaken. Miss Symmes will make a fine 
woman. An amiable disposition and highly cultivated 
mind, about to be buried in the wilderness. 

dlst. — Captain Smith arrived from T^ew York on his 
way to the Post to join his company. With him came 
Ensign Thompson, Mr. Melcher and Mr. Brown, a 
member of Congress from Kentucky. 

Sept. 1st. — Mr. Brown proceeded down the river. 

2d. — Caj^tain Heart and Major Doughty set out for 
Venango. The latter to muster the troops at that post. 

Qth. — General Richard Butler, commissioner on the 
part of Penns^dvania, and Captain James O'Hara, the 
contractor, with Cornplanter and about fifty Senecas, 
arrive. They were escorted from Pitt by Captain Zieg- 
ler's company of recruits. They were received with a 
salute of three rounds of cannon and the music. Zieg- 
ler is a German, had been in Saxon service previous to 
our late war with England. Takes pride in having the 
handsomest company in the regiment ; and to do him jus- 
tice, his company has been always considered the first in 
point of discipline and appearance. Four-fifths of his 
company have been Germans. Majority of the present 
are men who served in Germany. 

Fort Harmar, llth — Mitchell arrived express from 



328 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

the Falls, by whom we learn that Lieutenant Peters 
with a command of thirty men, had been defeated near 
the mouth of the Wabash. Eight of his men were 
killed and ten wounded. That one boat loaded with 
provisions fell into the hands of the enemy. That Mr. 
Peters retreated down the Ohio, and was making for 
Kaskaskia. By the same express are told that Captain 
Hardin, from Kentucky, had conducted thirty active 
woodsmen (militia) into the Indian country about the 
mouth of the Wabash, and it was supposed had fallen 
in with the Indians wdio defeated Peters ; that he had 
returned to the Falls with thirty horses taken and ten 
scalps. Messengers arrive from the Indian towns. Say 
the nations in grand council had agreed to attend the 
treaty. Saw the young men return daily with scalps. 

\2tli. — A singular occurrence took place to-day in sight 
of the fort, between two of the Seneca Indians. Both 
among the best looking men, and duly sober, met, drew 
their knives and fought until both sank under their 
wounds. It seems that they had formerly lived together 
as brothers. One of them, a married man, was obliged 
to go on a mission to some distant nations, and unable 
to take along his wife, left her in charge of his fi'iend, 
who was to provide for and protect her. When the hus- 
band returned he found that his poor frail wife had been 
left in care of a savage. She w\as seduced and carried 
out of the nation. He bore this with manly fortitude, 
but resolved if they ever met, one of them must die. It 
seems that they had a knowledge of each other coming 
here, and were prepared for the meeting and for what 



MAJOR EBEXEZER DENNY. 329 

took place. The fellow who had eloped with the woman 
came last from the Shawanee towns, where it is said he 
lately killed a girl for refusing to comply with his wishes. 

14:th. — A messenger arrived from the Indian towns 
with speeches, &c. They report that all the nations 
will attend the grand treaty as soon as possible for them 
to arrive. That they had been counciling at the Miami 
town, where they had agreed on the above ; at the same 
time scalps were daily brought in by the young men. 

15^/i. — Mr. Ernest and Mr. Wilkins set out for Fort 
Pitt, the former with orders to relieve Lieutenant 
Schuyler, who is stationed there. By the latter I sent 
a letter to my sister N'ancy, and inclosed a bank note of 
twenty dollars. 

21st. — Lieutenant Armstrong arrived on his way to 
the Falls. 

22d. — Lieutenant Kersey, with forty-eight Jersey re- 
cruits, and Ensign Hartshorn, w^ith twenty-nine from 
Connecticut, arrived. 

2dtJL — Major Doughty arrived from A^enango, where 
he had been sent to muster Captain Heart's command. 
With him came Major Alexander and several other gen- 
tlemen. 

Oct. 4?;/^. — Captain M'Curdy, with Ensign Hartshorn 
and cadet Morgan, and about forty men, were detached 
to escort the geographer to the Scioto river. 

13th. — Doctor Knight joined the regiment in character 
of a substitute for Doctor Sumner, who had occasion to 
remain at home longer than his furlough specified. 

One of the two savaores mentioned on the 12th Sep- 



330 MILITARY J U K X A L OF 

tomber as having foiiglit respecting a woman, is found 
drowned in tlie Muskingum. It is said the tribe gener- 
ally wished for his exit, and that some of them must 
have been the instruments of his death. Every possible 
attention was paid by the Senecas, as well as by the sur- 
geon of the garrison, to the husband. His life was 
despaired of. The other totally neglected, an outcast^ 
left to shift for himself, to dress himself; a small portion 
of victuals sent daily from the fort, and left in his reach 
where he lay near the bank. !N'otwithstanding, and con- 
trary to the expectation and wishes, was recovering and 
able to crawl about, when now, a month after the fight, 
and all hopes of his death having ceased, he is found 
drowned in the Muskingum. Some one or two of his 
nation had in the night dragged him down the bank and 
put him in the river. From the appearance of the 
ground being torn up where he lay and along to the 
water's edge, he must have made considerable resistance. 

19///. — General Gibson, a commissioner on the part of 
the State of Pennsylvania, arrived from Fort Pitt. He 
and General Butler are appointed by the State to treat 
with the Indians, particularly the Senecas, and to make 
them compensation for a tract of country lying on Lake 
Erie, and including Presqu' Isle, which the State has 
purchased of Congress, 

2Wi. — ]S"ot\Wfchstanding the treaty was solicited by the 
savages, it is doubtful whether the chiefs will come in or 
not. A late message from them says, that they have 
been informed by good authority, that we have poisoned 
the whiskey which we intend for them ; and infection for 



MAJOR EEENEZER DENNY, 331 

the small pox has been put in the blankets to be present- 
ed them. This message, with the daily accounts of mis- 
chief doing in some quarter or other, seem to indicate as 
if they had no mind to treat. Three canoes arrived last 
night from Limestone, brought accounts that Lieutenant 
Armstrong's boat was fired on near the Scioto ; that one 
of his men was shot through the cheek. The Indians 
have lately killed a soldier in the vicinity of the fort at 
the Rapids, and not content with scalping him, cut him 
in four quarters and hung them up on the bushes. 

2Sth. — G. W., a trusty Indian messenger who had 
been sent to the towns, arrived with an account that 
the chiefs were prej^aring to attend the treaty, and might 
be expected in twelve or fifteen days. 

JS^ov. 1st — Captain M'Curdy, with his command, and 
the geographer, arrived. 

"jtJi, — Messengers Wilson and Rankin return from the 
Indian towns. With them came Captain Davie, of the 
Six Nations, and several others. These last are from 
Grand river, on the British side of Lake Erie. Brant 
is expected in a few days. 

J)ec. ISth. — About two hundred Indians arrive — con- 
sist of Delawares, Wyandots, Senecas, Tawas, Pottowat- 
tamies, Chippewas and Socks. No Shawanees. 

I4,th. — Meeting in council house to Avelcome each oth- 
er, &c. 

15^.— Met in council. Treaty opened. This evening 
Captains Ferguson and Beatty set out, and Ensign M'- 
Dowell arrived, who had been escorting ^Ir. Marten sur- 
veying up the Scioto. 



332 MILITARY JOUEXAL OF 

20tk. — The weather extremely cold. The river cli'i\*ing 
with ice. The Grovernor and Indians have had frequent 
meetings in the council house, but nothing conclusive vet. 

29tJi. — A grand council was held. The old Wyandot 
chief, Shandotto, addressed the Governor in behalf of all 
the nations present. He began by telling their origin 
and how the thirteen fires had gotten possession of their 
country; how we had in two instances cheated them. 
The first, he said, was in a bargain made with them for 
just as much ground as an ox's hide would cover, merely 
to build one fire upon. The Americans cut the hide into 
strings and claimed all the ground they could encompass 
therewith. The second case was a bargain for such an 
extent of country, in a certain direction, as a white man 
v.'oiild travel to and back in one day. A surprising 
walker was found, who went as far and back again the 
same day as any of their swiftest men could do in two. 
These, said he, were submitted to, as you were strangers 
in our country, and professed to be our friends, but you 
have gone on from one stejo to another, so that we don't 
know when you will stop. At a treaty concluded to the 
northward, before the late war, he said, they had given 
up all the country south of the Ohio river. That boun- 
dary was a very plain one. It was such as could not be 
altered or mistaken; there could be no dispute about 
it. Concluded by saying that all the nations present had 
determined to grant no more of the countiy, but were 
willing to abide by the treaty which established the river 
Ohio as the boundary line. He presented a large belt 
of wampum with a black strij)e running through the 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 333 

middle of it, reiDrcsenting the Ohio river dividing, &c. 
The Grovernor replied, and told them that he could not 
possibly make the least deviation from the treaties which 
had been concluded at Fort Stanwix, at Fort M'Intosh 
and at the Miami river. That at these treaties the sev- 
eral boundaries had been fixed, and were unalterable. 
Council adjourned. Several days pass over. Indians 
pow-wowing. The Ohio rising and driving with ice. 

Jan. 6tk, 1789. — All hands assemble again. The Gov- 
ernor made a speech to the Indians. Exj^lained to them 
by a simile how they had forfeited their country. He 
supposed the Wyandots and some distant nation at war 
with each other. The Shawanees living between, were 
desired by the Wyandots to lie still, which was agreed 
to, but the Shawanees being of a restless disposition, and 
easy persuaded, took up the hatchet against their neigh- 
bors the Wyandots ; notwithstanding, the Wyandots con- 
quered their enemies, and obliged them to sue for peace, 
and the Shawanees' lands were given as a price for the 
same. Now, whether had not tJie Wyandots a good 
claim to the lands? They all agreed it was but just; 
then, said he, this is exactly your case, you took up the 
hatchet against the United States, and joined the English 
in the late war. The English, to obtain peace, ceded to 
the United States all the country south of the great 
lakes. He told them that they had been all summer en- 
deavoring to meet, but it seemed to be to no purpose. 
The United States, he said, were much inclined to be at 
peace with all the Indians, but if the Indians wanted 
war they should have war. He told them that if they 



334 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

Tvoiild renew the articles which had been agreed to and 
signed at M'Intosh and at the other treaties, he would 
add another article, and allow them the privilege of hunt- 
ing an}^ where in the United States' territory, and would 
deliver over to them a certain quantity of goods, such as 
might be agreed on. Adjourned. 

8^//. — Lieutenant Pratt joined us, fi*om Connecticut, 
with about seventy recruits. 

9//^ — In council once more. The old Wyandot chief, 
Shandotto, who spoke for all the nations jDresent, said he 
was sorry the Governor talked of war. It was not long 
since both had felt the eifects of it. For their part, they 
wished for no more. He said they all had a great re- 
gard for the thirteen fires, and would do everything in 
their power to accommodate them for the sake of peace, 
only hoped the line would be removed a little way. 

llth. — This was the last act of the farce. The articles 
were signed. 

13th. — The goods were given out to the different na- 
tions of Indians. The death of General Vernum, one 
of the judges of the territory, who was buried this after- 
noon, is generally lamented. The officers of the fort at- 
tended his funeral. 

22d. — The Indians mostly dispersed. Mr. Thompson, 
Luce and Schuyler, embarked for the Rapids. 

28tlL — The Governor, Pennsylvania commissioners, 
and sundry other gentlemen attending the grand treaty, 
left us for Fort Pitt. 

Feb. loth. — Captain Bradford, with his company, em- 
barked for the Rapids. Dr. Carmichael proceeded with 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 335 

him as far as the Great Miami, there to join Lieutenant 
Kersey. 

22d. — Married this evening, Captain David Ziegler, of 
the first regiment, to Miss Sheffiekl, only single daughter 
of Mrs. Sheffield, of Campus Martins, city of Marietta. 
On this occasion I played the captain's aid, and at his 
request, the memorandums made. I exhibited a charac- 
ter not more awkward than strange, at the celebration 
of Captain Ziegler's nuptials, the first of the kind I had 
been a witness to. 

March ISth. — Lieutenant Kingsbury was sent to con- 
duct a number of M' Curdy 's discharged men to Fort 
Pitt. 

Aioril Vi)th. — Ensign Hartshorn detached with a party 
for Wheeling, where he expected to meet Mr. Ludlow, 
Avith wdiom he was to proceed to run the northern boun- 
dary of the Ohio Company purchase. 

May 1st. — The Indians attack and kill a Mr. King, a 
proprietor in the Ohio Company, just below the Little 
Kanahwa, where a settlement is forming. The directors 
apply to General Harmar for a few soldiers for the pro- 
tection of the place. A sergeant, corporal and fifteen 
men, detached to protect the settlement below, called 
Belpre, and a corporal and eight sent up the Mus- 
kingum to Wolf creek, where the people are making 
another settlement. 

bth. — The commission of first Lieutenant, which ought 
to have been sent me last year, was received but to-day. 
It is dated 28th of March last ; the detention occasioned 
by a claim, of Mr. Spear for the same appointment. 



336 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

Spear had filled a vacant ensigncy twelve months after 
our appointments, but having been an older subaltern in 
the Revolutionary war, thought he was still entitled to 
the right. Our State, where the appointments originate, 
decided against him. This evening Lieutenant Ford, 
with Captain Mercer's company, arrived from Yincen- 
nes. Captain Mercer and Lieutenant Peters came also, 
on their way home 

28/^. — Two parties of a corporal and nine men each 
were detached to escort the surveyors of the Ohio Com- 
pany in running out certain ranges upon the river, and 
to the extension of the purchase westward. They took 
two men and provisions. 

June 4:ih. — Lieutenant Kingsbury, Mr. Tupper and 
myself set out in a small boat with four men, to visit 
the settlements made by the 'Ne^y England peoj^le on 
donation lands, called Belpre settlement. We got 
down about one o'clock — found ever}i;hing appeared as 
well as industry could make. 

5fh. — We embarked and returned uj) within seven 
miles of the garrison. Landed and struck off on a west 
line, and at the distance of one mile, got upon Mr. 
Kingsbury's one hundred and sixty acre lot, and mine, 
which adjoins his. We found mine to be tolerably good 
land, having a branch of the Little Hockhocking run- 
ning directly through it. A great deal of poj^lar, walnut, 
locust, cherry, shellbark hickory and black oak. Re- 
turned to the boat and got home about dark. 

9th. — Ensign Hartshorn and his party returned from 
escorting Mr. Ludlow, the surveyor, who was running 



MAJOR EBENEZER DEXNY. 337 

the northern boundary of the Ohio Company purchase. 
They completed the business without the least molestation. 

2tTi. — Major Wyllys, Ensign Sedam and Dr. Allison, 
arrived from the Rapids on their way to IS'ew York. 

2Sth. — A young Delaware came in with information 
that Greorge Washington was wounded by some person 
in ambush, on the Tuscarawas branch of the Mus- 
kingum. They are willing to lay it to Brant's people, 
but at the same time think the mischief done by militia 
from Wheeling. 

July 1th. — Major Doughty joined us from ISTew York. 

14dh. — Captain M'Curdy and Ensign M'Dowell came 
with forty-four recruits — good looking fellows. 

Aug. 9th. — Captain Strong, with his two subalterns. 
Lieutenant Kingsbury and Ensign Hartshorn, and a 
complete company of seventy men, embark for the Mi- 
ami. 

llih. — Captain Ferguson joined us with his recruits. 
Major Doughty follows Captain Strong for the purpose 
of choosing ground and laying out a new work intended 
for the protection of persons who have settled within the 
limits of Judge Symme's purchase. 

21st. — A corporal and six men escorting surveyors of 
the Ohio Company, attacked by the Indians. The cor- 
poral only escaped. 

Sejpt. 4cth. — Ferguson with his company ordered to join 
Strong in erecting a fort near the ^liami. Lieutenant 
Pratt, the quarter-master, ordered to the same place. 

14:th. — At a meeting of the agents of the Ohio Land 
Company, a tract of land lying at or near the mouth of 
99 



338 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

Tyger's or Kyger's creek, on the Ohio, about four or five 
miles above the Great Kanahwa, was granted to an as- 
sociation of tliirty-five proprietors, formed for settling 
the same ; each to have one hundred acres at least. The 
1st September, 1790, is the time allowed for commencing 
the settlement. Captain Beatty and myself are of the 
association. 

22d. — Captain Heart, with his company from Fort 
Franklin, arrive here. 

Nov. 10th. — The General intends removing to head- 
quarters very shortly, to the new fort building by Ma- 
jor Doughty, opposite the mouth of Licking creek. Had 
hinted that a short furlough would be very desirable 
before I went lower down, and if I could be excused 
fi'om the regiment, would proceed to Philadelphia, and 
complete some business of his and of the officers of the 
Pennsylvania quota. I had, in the absence of quarter- 
master, performed both duties of adjutant and quarter- 
master. Mr. Pratt I always found ready and willing. 
On this occasion he volunteered, and I obtained a fur- 
lough until 1st i\Iay. Embarked in a twelve oar boat 
with Doctor Scott. 

11//^ — Lay near the uj^per end of the Long Reach. 

12fh. — ;Met a rise of water, and got one mile above 
Sunfish. 

13?'/^ — Rainy weather. Lay all night at Mr.Mahan's, 
seven miles below Wheeling. 

14tli. — Deposited with Esquire Zeens sundry articles 
found with Rogers (drowned), to be sent to his wife at 
Marietta. Got to Carj)enter's at Short creek. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DEXNY. 339 

15!'^. — High water. Lay one mile above Ilolliday's 
Cove. 

16th. — The river continued to rise. With hard work 
wo made Dawson's, opposite the mouth of Little Beaver, 
about eight o'clock at night. 

17th. — As we turned up Beaver creek, to go to the 
block-house two miles up, where an officer and party is 
stationed, we met General Parson's canoe, with some 
property, floating down. Found the old gentleman, in 
attempting to pass the Falls, about five miles uj), was 
cast out and drowned, with one man who accompanied 
him. Judge Parsons was esteemed a useful, enterjmsing 
citizen. He had an interest in Salt Spring tract, on the 
Mahoning, and anxious to prove the navigation of the 
Falls practicable, the experiment cost him his life. It is 
said that his life was insured in I^ew York. 

ISth. — Set out after breakfast and got as high as the 
lower end of Montour's Island. 

19^^. — Arrived at Pittsburgh about two o'clock, P. M., 
when to our great satisfaction we found Major Wyllys, 
Captain Mercer, Captain Beatty, Lieutenant Peters, En- 
sign Sedam and Doctor Allison, all on their way to join 
the regiment. 

Pittsburgh, Dec. 4:th. — ^With Beatty, the pay-master, 
I had business which detained me here longer than was 
intended. My boat and crew were taken back by these 
officers. Got upon the road this afternoon. 

12th. — Reached Carlisle. 

Jan. 9th, 1790. — Left Carlisle in company with Mr. 



340 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

^esbit. That evening readied the Susquehanna on my 
way to Philadelphia. 

13^^. — Arrived in the cit}^ after a cold and tedious ride. 

26th. — Having settled all my business fully, took leave 
of the pleasing amusements of the city and got back to 
my friends at Carlisle on the 29th. Had been here but 
a few days, when a strange indisposition came on me, 
altogether unaccountable. Few persons have been favor- 
ed with better health than I have enjoyed all my life ; 
once only, in South Carolina was I laid up for a while. 
Temperance and an active life may have contributed to 
exempt when few escaped, but never was without a grate- 
ful sense of the favor of Divine Providence. In the 
present case endeavored for several days to keep up, 
when it was discovered that I had taken the measles, a 
disease very prevalent here at this time, and which it 
was supposed I had had. This sickness could not have 
taken me at a more convenient or happy time — was in 
the house with my mother and sisters. In the space of 
a couple of weeks was again about, and as soon as it was 
prudent to be exposed to the roads and weather, left my 
kind and affectionate relations, and arrived at Pittsburgh 
on the 22d. March. 

Ajml 11th. — IN'o place appears to me more inviting 
than this ; could willingly remain here awhile, but my 
furlough draws to a close, nor would I go over it one day, 
for a week of pleasure any^vhere. Besides, I know that 
nothing short of unavoidable delay would do in my case. 
The only conveyance for one down the river is a Ken- 



MAJOE EBENEZER DEXNY. 341 

tucky boat loaded with flour for liead-quartcrs. Tlic 
boat and hands are put under my charge, and with three 
soldiers, making seven of us, we set sail. 

12^;/^.— Buffalo creek. 

14:tL — Land at Fort Harmar, mouth of Muskingum, 
a place where I had spent most part of the last tAvo years 
with much satisfaction. It was now in a manner desert- 
ed. Head- quarters had been removed to Fort Washing- 
ton, opposite the mouth of Licking. Spent one day with 
some old friends of the Ohio Company. Accounts from 
below that Indians are in force on the river near Scioto. 

17 th. — Reached the Great Kanahwa, where were sev- 
eral boats waiting to increase their force. An express 
had arrived from Limestone to Colonel Lewis, with ac- 
counts that the savages had attacked and taken several 
boats at the mouth of Scioto. 

ISth. — While waiting to enlarge our fleet, Mr. Kings- 
bury arrived from the Miami, by whom I received a let- 
ter from the General, but too late for me to execute his 
business. 

WtJi. — Having examined the several boats and the 
people on board, the arms, &c., and made such disposi- 
tion of the whole as was thought most judicious, sailed 
at the head of sixteen Ken tuck boats and two keels. 
The Kentucky boats were lashed three together and kept 
in one line. Women, children and stock all put into 
the middle boats. Outside boats only manned and 
worked. The men belonging to each block of boats had 
their own commanding officer, and the whole could re- 
pair to either side as necessity might require. The keels 



342 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

kept on each flank. The river is in good navigable or- 
der, and weather pleasant. The boats were enabled to 
keep their stations. Passed the Scioto about daylight. 

20th. — About eight o'clock in the morning a storm of 
wind and rain met us. Such a one I had never before 
seen on the river. The boats had to be cut loose, and 
even when single were in danger of filling every instant. 
At this time were supposed to be about five miles below 
Scioto and close upon the Indian shore. Any apprehen- 
sion from the Indians by me was forgotten : I was clear 
for making the nearest land, headed my boat for shore, 
and made the signal for the others to follow. One only 
obeyed the signal and landed along side of me. The 
rest passed and made for the Kentucky side, at the 
hazard of their lives. They, however, got safe, with no 
other damage than shipping large quantities of water. 
In this situation we were obliged to remain the whole 
day. As the sun went down the storm ceased. I fired 
a gun and put oif — the boats all followed, and next 
morning reached Limestone. 

LiMESTOXE, 21st. — Upon landing here was informed 
that an officer of the regiment, with soldiers, was on the 
opposite shore. Procured a light boat and crossed the 
river, where I found Lieutenant Pratt with a small party 
of men. He informed me that General Ilarmar, with 
about three hundred regulars and volunteers, had 
marched the morning before for Paint creek, which 
empties into the Scioto about sixty miles up, at which 
place it was expected the Indians who had been on the 
Ohio, would be found with their plunder. Here I found 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 343 

that the General had calculated my time, for expecting 
that Mr. Pratt would see me, he had left instructions for 
me to proceed to Fort Washington. Parted with Pratt 
in the evening. 

22d. — Arrivedat Fort Washington about twelve o'clock. 

Fort Washington, Mai/ 2d. — The troops returned 
from Paint creek, under command of Captain Ferguson. 
General Harmar parted with them at mouth of Scioto, 
and j)roceeded in his barge for Muskingum. 

Juli/ IWi. — Governor St. Clair arrived at Fort Wash- 
ington from the Illinois, where he had spent part of the 
winter and spring in organizing the several counties in 
that quarter of the territor}^, and establishing a system 
of government. General Harmar had returned to head- 
quarters some weeks since. The Governor remained 
Avith us but three days. In the mean time it Avas agreed 
and determined that General Harmar should conduct 
an expedition against the Maumee towns, the residence 
of all the renegade Indians, from whence issued all the 
parties who infest our frontiers. One thousand militia 
were ordered from Kentucky, and the Governor on his 
way to IN'ew York, the seat of the general government, 
was to order five hundred from the back counties of 
Pennsylvania. 15th September was the time appointed 
for the militia to assemble at Fort Washington. 

15th. — The General commenced his preparations; cal- 
culations of provisions, horses, stores, &c., were imme- 
diately made out and ordered accordingly. Every day 
employed in the most industrious manner. Captain 
Ferguson, with his company, engaged in getting in com- 



344 M I L I T A E Y J U R X A L OF 

plcte order the 'artillery and military stores. Indeed 
ever}' officer was busily employed in something or other 
necessary for the expedition, but particularly the quarter- 
master, Pratt. T^o time was lost. 

Sept. ISth. — The Kentucky militia began to come in, 
but not such as we had been accustomed to see on the 
frontiers. They appear to be raw and unused to the 
gun or the woods ; indeed many are without guns, and 
many of those they have want rej)airing. Our artificers 
employed in putting to right the militia arms. General 
much disheartened at the kind of people from Kentucky. 
One- half certainly serve no other purpose than to swell 
their number. If the leading iKitriots of Kentucky don't 
turn out rascals, then some men that I know are greatly 
mistaken. 

19^7^. — A battalion of Pennsylvania militia arrived. 

22(7. — Governor St. Clair returned fi*om Ts'ew York. 

2bth. — ^lajor Doughty, with two companies of the first 
regiment, brought from Fort Harmar, joined, and also 
the residue of the Pennsylvania militia. These last are 
similar to the Kentuckians ; too many substitutes. Much 
difficulty in regulating and organizing the militia. Colo- 
nels dispute about the command. The General, after 
much trouble, effects a compromise and reconciliation. 
Kentuckians compose three battalions under Majors 
Hall, M'^Iillen and Kay, and Lieutenant-Colonel com- 
mandant Trotter. Pennsjdvania militia into one bat- 
talion, under Lieutenant-Colonel Trulw and Major Paul. 
The whole to be commanded by Colonel John Hardin 
from Kentucky, subject to the orders of General Harmar 



344 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

pi etc order the 'artillery and military stores. Indeed 
every officer was busily employed in something or other 
necessary for the expedition, but particularly the quarter- 
master, Pratt. 'No time was lost. 

Sept. ISth. — The Kentucky militia began to come in, 
but not such as we had been accustomed to see on the 
frontiers. They appear to be raw and unused to the 
gun or the woods ; indeed many are without guns, and 
many of those they have want repairing. Our artiticers 
employed in putting to right the militia arms. General 
much disheartened at the kind of people from Kentucky. 
One-half certainly serve no other purpose than to swell 
their number. If the leading iKitriots of Kentucky don't 
turn out rascals, then some men that I know are greatly 
mistaken. 

19//^. — A battalion of Pennsylvania militia arrived. 

22(1. — Grovernor St. Clair returned fi'om New York. 

2oth. — Major Doughty, with two companies of the first 
regiment, brought from Fort Harmar, joined, and also 
the residue of the Pennsylvania militia. These last are 
similar to the Kentuckians ; too many substitutes. Much 
difficulty in regulating and organizing the militia. Colo- 
nels dispute about the command. The General, after 
much trouble, effects a compromise and reconciliation. 
Kentuckians compose three battalions under Majors 
Hall, M'Millen and Ray, and Lieutenant-Colonel com- 
mandant Trotter. Penns^dvania militia into one bat- 
talion, under Lieutenant-Colonel Truby and Major Paul. 
The whole to be commanded by Colonel John Hardin 
from Kentucky, subject to the orders of General Harmar 



rianl>- 



n-n \ B.i/ •■/ .Vi/'> 



K5\\\^s\\g^ ^« 



'"i'/'A'„ '""./'/""./'"rr /" 






Gnai'd 






Illlllll lllllll 



Illlllll Illlllll 



Illlllll ^r^i 



Illlllll Illlllll iijiiiii lllllll 



^i'Tr^ 



l(..I..ifin.. j|.,uii\- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 345 

2Qt]i. — The whole of the militia took the field under 
the direction of Colonel Hardin, an old continental offi- 
cer, amounting to one thousand one hundred and thirty- 
three. They marched on the direct route to the Indian 
towns. 

2^th. — General Harmar moved out with the federal 
troops and joined the militia. 

30^/^. — The General having got forward the supplies, 
moved on with the federal trooj)s, formed into two small 
battalions under the immediate command of Majors 
Wyllys and Doughty, together with Captain Ferguson's 
company of artillery, who took along three light brass 
pieces. 

Oct. 2d. — Their number three hundred and twenty. 
Total, one thousand four hundred and fifty-three. 

M. — Joined the advance troops early in the morning. 
Spent this day in forming the line of march, encamp- 
ment and battle, and explaining the same to the militia 
officers. Major James Fontaine appointed volunteer 
aid-de-camp to the General. Mr. Stephen Ormsby 
brigade-major to the militia, and Mr. John Bellie quar- 
rer-master. Doctor Slater surgeon to Colonel Trotter's 
tegiment. Encamped on waters of Little Miami, thirty- 
one miles from Fort Washington. 

4it]i. — The army took up the line of march and gained 
eleven miles. Encamped on branch of the Little Miami, 
forty-two miles from Fort Washington. 

bth. — Joined by a small reinforcement of horsemen 
and mounted infantry. The horse formed into two troops, 
and with the company of mounted infantry, put under 



346 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

the command of Major Fontaine. The army now con- 
sists of 

3 battalions Kentucky militia, ] 

1 do. Penns^dvania militia, J 1,133 

1 do. light troops mounted, 1 

2 do. of regular troops, - 320 



Total, - - 1,453 

Much trouble in keeping the officers, with their com- 
mands, in their proper order, and the i:»aclv horses, &c., 
comj^act. Encamped this evening on Grlade creek, a 
branch of Little Miami, about fifty-two miles from Fort 
Washington. 

(jth. — Passed through a beautiful open country. En- 
camped three miles north of old Chillicothe, sixty-two 
fi'om Fort Washington. 

1th. — Ox^en country. Encamped on Mad river on 
Pickaway fork of Great Miami, seventy-one miles from 
Fort Washington. 

^th. — Gained about nine miles. Encamped on waters 
of Great ^Miami, about eighty miles advance. 

dth. — ^larched at usual hour and gained ten miles. 
Encamped on waters of Great Miami, about ninety 
miles from Fort AVashington. 

10th. — Same waters. Encamp about one hundred 
miles from Fort Washington. 

nth. — Encamp five miles north-Avest of a place called 
the French Store, about one hundred and twelve miles 
from Fort Washington. 

12th. — Encamp about seven miles north-west of new 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENXY. 347 

Chillicotlie, on Grave creek, a branch of the Miami or 
Omee, which empties into Lake Erie, and about one 
hundred and twenty-five miles from Fort Washington. 
Half pound powder and one pound lead served out to 
each rifleman, and twenty-four rounds cartridges to the 
musquetry. Commanding officers of battalions to see 
that their men's arms are in good order and loaded. 

13^^. — Early this morning a patrol of horsemen cap- 
tured a Shawanee Indian. Marched through a thick 
brushy country. Encamped on great branch of the Mi- 
ami or Omee river, near the ruins of La Source's old 
house, about one hundred and thirty-five miles from Fort 
Washington. 

14ilL — Colonel Hardin detached early this morning 
with six hundred light troops, to push for the Miami vil- 
lage. This detachment sent forward in consequence of 
intelligence gained of the prisoner, wdiich was that the 
Indians were clearing out as fast as possible, and that 
the towns would be evacuated before our arrival. As it 
was impossible for the army to hasten their march much, 
the Greneral thought proper to send on Colonel Hardin 
in hope of doing something before they would all be able 
to clear out. Marched this day about ten miles. Beech 
and white oak land generally, and no running water. 
Country very flat, and appears as if at particular seasons 
it was altogether under water. Encamped about one 
hundred and forty-five miles fi'om Fort AYashing-tou. 
This night the horses were ordered to be tied up, that 
the army might start by daylight, with a view of keep- 
ing as near to Colonel LLardin as possible. The distance 



348 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

to the Indian towns tins morning, when the detachment 
went ahead, supj^osed to be abont thirty-five miles. 

15^/^. — Every exertion made to get forward the main 
body. Difficult march this day over beech roots and 
brush. Encamped on the waters of the Omee about one 
hundred and fifty-three miles from Fort Washington. 
Horses were again tied, grass cut and brought to them 
that the army might not be detained next morning, 
as had frequently been the case ; for although repeat- 
ed orders were given to the horse-masters to hopple 
well their horses, and directions to the officers and men 
not to suffer them to pass through the lines, many of 
them, owing to the scarcity of food, broke loose and 
passed the chain of sentries and w^ere lost. Patrols of 
horsemen are ordered out every morning at daylight to 
scour the neighboring woods and bring in any horses 
that might have passed the lines ; and the pickets turned 
out small parties for the same purpose. The cattle, also, 
every pains taken to secure them. At evening, Avhen the 
army halts, the cattle guard, which is composed of an 
officer and thirty men, build a yard always within the 
chain of sentries, sometimes in the square of the en- 
campment, and place themselves round the inclosure, 
which secures them. 

IGth. — March through beech and swamp oak land. 
]Met an express from Colonel Ilardin, who informed us 
that the enemy had aljandoned every place. Encamped 
within seven miles of the Miami village, and about one 
hundred and sixty-three from Fort "Washington. Horses 
tied up again and grass brought them. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. -349 

^ 11 th. — About noon the army arriycd at the Miami 
viHage, or Mauraee towns, on the Omee river, distant from 
Fort Washington about one hundred and seventy miles. 
Two very considerable branches meet here, the St. Joseph 
from the north-west, and the St. Mary from the south- 
west, which form the Miami or Omee, emptying into 
Lake Erie. Several little towns on both branches, but 
the principal one is below the confluence on the north 
side. Several tolerable good log houses, said to have 
been occupied by British traders ; a few pretty good gar- 
dens with some fruit trees, and vast fields of corn in al- 
most every direction. The militia picked up as much 
plunder as loaded some of them home. A great deal is 
found hidden and buried about, and many things left as 
if the enemy went off in a hurry. 

I'^tli. — Colonel Trotter was ordered out with three 
hundred men, militia and regulars, to reconnoitre the 
country and to make some discovery of the enemy. He 
marched a few miles, when his advance horsemen over- 
took and killed two of the savages — one of the militia 
slightly wounded. The Colonel proceeded no farther, 
marched back to camp the same evening. Colonel 
Hardin, commanding officer of the militia, showed dis- 
pleasure at Trotter's return without executing the orders 
he had received, and desired the General to give him the 
command of the detachment. The men were furnished 
with two days provisions, and Hardin marched on the 
morning of the 19th. I saw that the men moved off 
with great reluctance, and am satisfied that when three 
miles from camp he had not more than two-thirds of his 



350 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

command ; they dropped out of the ranks and returned 
to camp. Hardin proceeded, and about ten miles from 
camp, not expecting to be near the enemy, he suddenly 
came upon a party suj^posed to be about one hundred 
only, and owing to the bad order of his men, and their 
dastardly conduct, was entirely defeated. The Indians 
made the first discovery, and commenced a fire at the 
distance of one hundred and fift}^ yards, and advanced. 
The greatest number of the militia tied without firing a 
shot; some few, with thirty regulars that were of the de- 
tachment, stood and were cut to pieces. Of the militia 
forty are missing, but it is well known that very few of 
these were forward in the fight. The conjecture is, that 
most of them ran back from the rear and have pushed 
for the Ohio. Twenty-five of the regulars are missing. 
The army moved from the Miami village this morning; 
encamj)ed at Chillicothe (a Shawanee town), two miles 
east, for the convenience of burning and destroying the 
houses and corn. Last night, a Captain M'Clure and 
M'Quircy of the militia, took a notion to trap some of 
of the Indians, who we suspected lurked about after night 
and carried off straQ:2:lin2: horses. A short distance out- 
side the sentries they close hojopled a horse with a bell 
on, and took their station in a hazel thicket but a few 
yards otf. It was not long until an Indian stalked up 
and seized the horse. The captains rushed upon him, 
cut off his head and brought it into camp, and claimed 
at least the price of a wolf's scalp. Detachments em- 
ployed collecting and burning corn, &c. 

2Qth. — The army all engaged burning and destroying 



350 MILITAEY JOUENAL OF 

command ; they dropped out of the ranks and returned 
to camp. Hardin proceeded, and about ten miles from 
camp, not expecting to be near the enemy, he suddenly 
came upon a party supposed to be about one hundred 
only, and owing to the bad order of his men, and their 
dastardly conduct, was entirely defeated. The Indians 
made the first discovery, and commenced a fire at the 
distance of one hundred and fifty yards, and advanced. 
The greatest number of the militia filed without firing a 
shot ; some few, with thirty regulars that were of the de- 
tachment, stood and were cut to pieces. Of the militia 
forty are missing, but it is well known that very few of 
these were forward in the fight. The conjecture is, that 
most of them ran back from the rear and have pushed 
for the Ohio. Twenty-five of the regulars are missing. 
The army moved from the Miami village this morning; 
encamped at Chillicothe (a Shawanee town), two miles 
east, for the convenience of burning and destroying the 
houses and corn. Last night, a Captain M'Clure and 
M'Quircy of the militia, took a notion to trap some of 
of the Indians, who we suspected lurked about after night 
and carried off straggling horses. A short distance out- 
side the sentries they close hoppled a horse with a bell 
on, and took their station in a hazel thicket but a few 
yards off. It was not long until an Indian stalked up 
and seized the horse. The captains rushed upon him, 
cut off his head and brought it into camp, and claimed 
at least the price of a wolf's scalp. Detachments em- 
ployed collecting and burning corn, &c. 

20tJi. — The army all engaged burning and destroying 




I 

n 









#1 



Y J £ v/ / -/ j-j £ jyj A u jyj £ £ -r o >y i 






-V-t A 



A-^.\'^4 



■=r.r*--SHAWANEES__--.---.C^ DEL A WARES ^ 

f^:^ AA^AAA^'c^ii AAA A X 1. "i 
.^A", A^-A-AA -liX.". A^^ A A A /r 







/ 



MAJOR EBENEZER D E N X Y. 351 

everything that could be of use : corn, beans, pumpkins, 
stacks of hay, fencing and cabins, &c. Twelve or fifteen 
of the savages made their appearance this day near to 
one of our burning parties. Some of Major Fontaine's 
corps got on their flank undiscovered. A few shots were 
exchanged, and two of the Indians were killed, without 
any loss on our side. 

21st. — The army having burned five villages, besides 
the capital town, and consumed and destroyed twenty 
thousand bushels of corn in ears, took up their line of 
march back to Fort Washington, and encamped eight 
miles from the ruins. 

^ine o'clock at night. — The Greneral ordered out four 
hundred choice men, militia and regulars, to be under 
the command of Major Wyllys, to return to the towns, 
intending to surprise any parties that might be assem- 
bled there, expecting the Indians would collect to see 
how things were left. The Major marched about mid- 
night in three divisions, at the distance of a few hundred 
yards apart, intending to cross the Omee as day broke, 
and come upon the principal ruins all at the same in- 
stant, but at different quarters. The wings commanded 
by Majors Hall and M'Millen came upon a few Indians 
immediately after crossing the Omee, put them to flight, 
and contrary to orders, pursued up the St. Joseph for 
several miles. The centre division, composed chiefly of 
the regular troops, Avere left unsupported. It would 
seem as if the enemy designed to draw the principal part 
of the force after a few of their j^eople, while their main 
body attacked Major Wjdlys. The centre division sus- 



352 MILITAET JOURNAL OF 

tained a very unequal figlit for some time; tliey were 
obliged at length to give way. The few that escaped tied 
in the direction to where the militia had gone, and met 
them returning from the pursuit of the scattering In- 
dians. The enemy follovred and were met by the militia 
several miles up the St. Joseph ; this narrow creek was 
between the parties; a smart fire commenced and was 
kept up. The Indians attempted to force their way across 
but were repulsed, and at length withdrew. Our parties 
collected their Avounded, and returned slowty to camp. 
One of ^lajor Fontaine's corps, who was attached to the 
centre division, immediately after the defeat of Wyllys, 
escaped to camp, and gives a very imj^erfect account of 
the business. He got in about eleven o'clock, A. M. 
Major Ray with his battalion was immediately dispatch- 
ed to support the parties, but met Colonel Hardin re- 
turning to camp with his wounded. Hardin had been 
an officer in the Revolutionary war ; on this expedition 
under Wyllys, he had volunteered his services, with a 
view of retrieving his affiiir of the 19th, and had as- 
sumed the command of the militia. He declares, as well 
as other officers, whose veracity cannot be doubted, that 
the enemy must have lost one hundred killed, besides a 
number who were seen carried off wounded. The fede- 
rals lost forty-eight men and two officers (Major Wyllys 
and Lieutenant Frothingham,) in the business of this 
day ; the militia not so many. The whole of the killed 
and missing of the army amounts to one hundred and 
eighty-three, but it is verily believed that a number of 
the militia who are missing have deserted, and are on 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 3-33 

their way to Kentucky. Major Fontaine, who com- 
manded the cavalry and was with the centre division, 
charged the enemy, but was not supported — his men 
faltered; himself far in front, was singled out and fell. 
The design of sending back Major Wyllys with his com- 
mand, was evident to all the army, and would have an- 
swered the fullest expectations, provided due obedience 
had been observed on the part of the militia, but owing 
to their ungovernable disposition, an excellent laid plan 
has in some measure been defeated, and our loss is equal 
if not greater than the savages'. The General advised 
with his principal officers about returning to the towns. 
It was agreed not to return. 

22d. — Continued in our encampment, fixing up biers 
for the wounded and making repairs, &c. The frost had 
destroyed the food early on our march out, and the horses 
of the army were now very much reduced, so much so 
that it was utterly impossible for the main body to per- 
form anything rapidly, and to get back upon the road 
which we had so lately passed was attended with difficulty. 

23d. — The army took up the line of march ; proceeded 
slowly. Every attention paid to keep the men compact. 
Vigilance was the order of the day. 
i Ifov. Sd. — Grot back to Fort Washington. 

4:th. — At Fort Washington. The militia mustered 
this afternoon in their camp on the south side of the 
Ohio, and discharged by a general order; those from 
Kentucky to receive pay and rations up to the 10th in- 
stant. 

5tJi and Qth. — The militia began to move off in small 
23 



354 MILITARY JOUKXAL OF 

parties for their homes. It was an arduous task to keep 
the militia in order or within reasonable bounds, at any 
time, but when we had gotten so far on our way home as 
to consider ourselves in some measure out of the enemy's 
country, they broke out and became altogether ungovern- 
able. The General was under the necessity of punishing 
one of them for discharging his piece in presence of sev- 
eral of&cers, contrary to a special order. This felloAV,it 
seems, is the son of a Baptist preacher in Kentucky. 
His officers and many of his men would have opposed 
the punishment, and although there was much forbear- 
ance on the part of the General through the whole cam- 
paign, I have no doubt but a hue and cry will be raised 
against him in Kentucky as soon as those fellows get home. 
If he is blamable, it is only for being too indulgent to the 
militia. I feel conscious of having acted my part. As 
the adjutant of the General, I had not only my regimen- 
tal duties to attend to, but the duty of adjutant to the 
army, brigade-major, &c., and in most instances, when 
militia field officers were upon duty, had, at the request 
of the General, to station the guards and go the rounds. 
The general detail of all guards and detachments kept 
and made out by myself; their examination on the 
grand parade daily, was also my duty ; regulating the 
march, keeping the columns in their proper places, as- 
sisting the quarter-master in keeping up the baggage, 
looking after and correcting accidents and delays, was 
no trifling employment ; and every morning half an hour 
before daylight, agreeably to orders, it was my particular 
duty to see the army all under arms. However, I feel 



MAJOR EBENEZER DEXNY. 355 

amply reAvarded. I know that I have the approbation 
of my commanding officer, and that is enough ; but hope 
never to be employed in a similar situation with such 
materials. 

Itli. — Left head-quarters for the seat of government; 
passed through Lexington, the crab orchard and wilder- 
ness, and after a most inclement ride, arrived at Philadel- 
phia the 12th December. High water and very bad 
roads, 

Philadelphia, April 1st, 1791. — It was expected 
when I left head-quarters that I would return across the 
mountains in time to descend the Ohio with the first 
spring flood. I frequently pressed for my departure, but 
was delayed. Congress having added a second regiment 
to the establishment, and at the close of the session 
passed a law for raising two thousand levies, or six 
months men, for another expedition against the Indians. 
Governor St. Clair appointed major-general, and to con- 
duct the campaign himself. Captain Beatty, our late 
pay-master, had spent the winter in the city settling up 
his accomits. He and myself the only officers of the re- 
giment at this time in Philadelphia. Beatty ordered to 
^ew Brunswick on the recruiting service. He Avas de- 
sirous that I should accompany him, and prevailed on 
the Secretary of War, who rather requested that I Avould 
assist in raising the company, after which I am at liber- 
ty to return to the regiment in any manner I please. 
Took the stage at three o'clock ; lay by awhile at Prince- 
ton, and reached Brunswick early next day. Remained 
here a few days with Beatty and proceeded to JN'ew York. 



350 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

Made arrangements and commenced recruiting. An ex- 
cellent sergeant and corporal did the business for me. 
We were very successful. Recruits sent to New Bruns- 
Avick weekly by the packet. Beatty ordered to march. 
1 repair to J^few Brunswick ; accomiDany him to IN'ewton, 
in Bucks county, file off myself to Philadelphia ; detain- 
ed there three days ; from thence to Carlisle, where I 
met Beatty, who had been joined by a new raised com- 
pany from Lancaster, commanded by Captain Doyle. 

J all/ 4th. — Spent the 4th of July together. 

BtJi. — The two companies took up their march for Fort 
Pitt. Stayed with my friends till ^he 10th. 

lOtJi. — I set out and arrived in Fort Pitt on the 15th ; 
companies arrived a few days after. Found two bat- 
talions of the levies here ; two other battalions from Vir- 
ginia had sailed. Several companies of the second regi- 
ment had also gone on. 

Pittsburgh, August 1th. — Beatty's and Dojde's com- 
panies embark ; took passage with them, but owing to the 
very low state of the river, did not reach Fort Washing- 
ton until the last of the month. Camp formed at jNIill 
creek, three miles out ; the artillery only doing duty in 
the fort. Business obliged me to remain here with Gen- 
eral Harmar, who had his family in the fort. 

Fort Washixgtox, Sept. 1st. — General St. Clair ap- 
pears exceedingly impatient at the delay or detention of 
some of the corps. The quarter-master general, Hodg- 
den, not yet come on, and General Butler, the second in 
command, is also back. Preparations for the campaign 
very backward. General Harmar seems determined to 



MAJOE EEENEZEK DENNY. 357 

quit the service; has positively refused going on the 
campaign, and takes no command. 

"Jth. — General Butler, and Hodgden, the quarter-mas- 
ter general, with Captain Newman's company of the sec- 
ond regiment, arrive. General Ilarmar solicits a court 
of inquiry to examine into his conduct on the last cam- 
paign. The court is ordered — General Richard Butler 
the president. Several days spent in examining the 
testimony. The court make a report to the commander- 
in-chief, highly honorable to General Ilarmar. It was 
impossible for me not to be affected by the determination 
of General Harmar. I knew that he only waited for the 
march of the army, when he would ascend the river 
M^th his family and retire to civil life. My secret wish 
was to accompany him ; he discovered it, and informed me 
that he would apply for an officer's command to escort 
and work his boat to Pittsburgh, and had no doubt but 
that General St. Clair, upon being asked, would order me 
on that service. I made the request in writing. Was 
answered that it could not be granted. I stayed with 
General Harmar and his family until the last moment. 
He conversed frequently and freely with a few of his 
friends on the probable result of the campaign — predict- 
ed a defeat. He suspected a disposition in me to resign ; 
discouraged the idea. " You must," said he, " go on the 
campaign ; some w^ill escape, and you may be among the 
number." 

2Qth. — Left Fort Washington and proceeded to join 
my regiment. Arrived at the army next day. Found a 
pleasant encampment twenty -three miles from Fort 



358 MILITAEY JOUKXAL OF 

Washington, on the Great Miami. The principal part 
of the troops have been at this phice since the loth, 
building a stockade fort with four bastions. Barracks 
to accommodate one hundred men. 

2Wl — Commenced my duty as adjutant, Major Ham- 
tramck the commanding officer of the regiment. We 
are informed that upward of one hundred horses have 
been stolen, supposed by the enemy, from the vicinity 
of Fort Washington, some of them cut from their fasten- 
ino-s under the walls of the fort. 

30^^. — Appointed aid-de-camp to the commander-in- 
chief. With much difficulty finished and handed in a 
set of monthly returns. 

Oct. 1st. — Joined the General's family, found to consist 
of Colonel Sargent, the adjutant-general. Count Malartie, 
a young Frenchman fi'om Gallipolis, in character of 
volunteer aid, and the General. 

2d. — Accompany commander-in-chief to Fort Wash- 
ington. Three hundred militia had just reached that 
place from Kentucky. 

3(7. — A number of the militia are reported to have de- 
serted already. 

Uh. — A sergeant and nine of the militia deserted last 
night. 

bth. — An officer from the army arrives in pursuit of 
deserters. A sergeant and twenty-five deserted on the 
night of the 3d. 

Qth. — After some difficulty in getting the militia equip- 
ped, they march to join the army. Public dispatches 
forwarded to seat of government by way of Lexington. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 359 

1th. — Set out about nine o'clock ; arrive at Fort Ham- 
ilton in the afternoon. The army had marched on the 4th. 

Sth. — We cross the Miami twenty-five miles from Fort 
Washington, and follow the army; their course north 
sixteen degrees. Passed four encampments and the 
militia on their march. Joined in the evening as troops 
were encamping. Distance from Fort Washington forty- 
four and one-fourth miles. The army is five days from 
Fort Hamilton, at the fording of the Miami, to this 
place (not four miles a day). 

^th. — The army marched this morning at ten o'clock, 
and encamped about three ; gained only five miles. The 
country, thus far from the ^liami, level, rich and exceed- 
ingly well watered with small branches. 

lOth. — Army in motion at eight o'clock. Country 
more fiat. Crossed a number of small rivulets running 
east. Timber chiefly beech. Gained about eight miles 
and encamped at four o'clock. The horses had been all 
tied up last night, which enabled an early start this 
morning. 

11th. — Ten o'clock this morning before the troops took 
up the line of march. Horses missing, which occasioned 
the delay. About twelve arrived at a pretty little creek 
running west, supposed to be a branch of White river. 
Fresh trails of Indians discovered. Two o'clock came 
directly upon an extensive wet prairie; army obliged 
to halt and encamp. Marched this day not more than 
six miles. Country very level, well watered and timbered. 

12th. — This morning spent in searching the prairie and 
examining for a passage across. General Butler with a 



360 MILITAKY JOUENAL OF 

party set out early toward the east ; myself, with a cap- 
tain and fifty riflemen, to examine westerly. After pro- 
ceeding about three miles we made out to cross the 
prairie, but with difficulty got my horse through. From 
this place we had a view for several miles west; the 
prairie rather appearing to increase. On the north side 
came upon a deep beaten Indian path, which we followed 
about two miles, turned and recrossed the prairie, exam- 
ined further, could find no jilace possible for the army 
to cross without bridging at least three hundred j^ards. 
Greneral Butler's report favorable. He found a j^retty 
good v;ay by going three miles round. Twelve o'clock 
the army marched, altering their course to north-east 
thirty-five degrees. Passed several small prairies, all of 
them swampy. Fell in with an Indian path, leading 
through and avoiding the wet land. March this day 
five and one-half miles over excellent country, watered 
with pretty, small runs winding about in every direction. 

13th. — The General, with a few attendants, reconnoitres 
the country. Makes choice of ground to erect another 
fort for purpose of a deposit. The army moved about 
one o'clock, one mile, near to this ground and encamped. 

14M. — Two hundred men employed, under direction of 
Major Ferguson, at the new fort. It is to be a square 
work, curtains thirty-five yards ; regular bastions in each 
angle. The whole raised with logs laid horizontally ; 
the face of the curtains forming the rear of the barracks. 

15f7i. — Cold and w^et. Heavy rain last night and con- 
tinues all the day. 

16//^. — Rain all last night. Express from Fort Wash- 



MAJOR E.BENEZER DENNY. 3G1 

ington with information of the mountain leader and 
twenty Indians of the Chickasaw nation on their way 
from Fort Washington, and also of sixty horse loads of 
flour. 

11th. — The new fort goes on but slowly. Weather 
very bad ; constant rain night and day. A rifleman of 
the militia, a few miles from camp wdth leave to hunt, 
fired upon by a single Indian and wounded through the 
hip, but made his escape into camp. Men desert ; four 
of the first regiment went off since our arrival here. 

l^tli. — A continuation of wet, disagreeable Aveather. 
The army would have been without bread after to-day, 
had not a small supply of forty-eight horse loads arrived. 

l^th. — All the horses of the army, quarter-master's as 
well as contractors, sent back for a supply of flour. Un- 
pardonable mismanagement in the provision department. 
Troops put on half allowance of flour. Colonel Oldham, 
commanding officer of militia, directed to furnish an es- 
cort to go back with the horses. His men declare if they 
are sent on that duty they will not return. Falconer's 
company of levies escort the horses back. 

2^tJi. — The time for which the levies were enlisted be- 
gins to expire. Ten were discharged this morning; sev- 
eral a few days ago. The levies from Virginia claim 
their discharge. All of Captain Hanah's company from 
Alexandria, discharged. An express this day from Fort 
Washington. Captain Buel's company of the second 
regiment had arrived there from the eastward. 

2\st. — Very severe frost last night ; ice upon the waters 
near a half inch thick. The food of our horses and cat- 



362 MILITARY JOURXAL OF 

tie had been injured by slight fi'osts as early as the 4th. 
A strong guard escort the cattle and horses to the best 
pasture, and every afternoon one-half the army off duty 
turn out and bring grass from the jirairie to serve them 
over night. 

22d. — For want of sufficiency of flour, the General 
has been under the necessity of keeping the troops upon 
half a pound of that article daily, but the ration is made 
up of beef. This, however, would not satisfy militia ; 
twenty of them deserted last night, and some more this 
morning. An officer near Lexington, who joined us this 
da}^ with about sixty men, happened to meet those who 
went off this morning, and brought them back. He in- 
formed us that a number of the militia who had deserted 
from Fort Washington, and on the march, had been ap- 
prehended in Kentucky and were confined in the jails. 
Two brigades of horses loaded with flour arrived this 
day, estimated at one thousand eight hundred pounds; 
also a small drove of cattle. The quarter-master general 
is ordered to Fort Washington to make some more cer- 
tain arrangement with regard to supj)lies of provisions — 
the contractor not to be depended on. 

2M. — Two artillery men attempted to desert to the 
enemy, were taken, tried and sentenced to suffer death; 
were hanged along with one of the levies for shooting 
his comrade. The country for ten miles round has been 
well explored. Many large wet prairies, esj)ecially to 
the west. Upland thin, covered chiefly with white oak. 
Fine springs Avhich feed the prairies. Any quantity of 
meadow ground — natural meadow. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 3G3 

24:th. — The army took up their line of marcli about 
nine o'clock. Pursued the old Indian path leading north 
through a fine open woods. The soil and timber of a 
superior quality. Gained six miles and encamped along 
the bank of a handsome creek running east ; a large 
]^rairie on our left.^ A captain's command left at the 
new fort, called Fort Jefferson, with all the men unable 
to march. The commander-in-chief has been unwell for 
some time past, but to-day scarcely able to accompany 
the army. 

2bth. — Rain almost all last night. Troops continued 
encamped. 

2Wi. — Remain encamped. A party of fifty militia 
sent to reconnoitre the country north-west, fell in with 
five of the enemy about fifteen miles from camp, but 
owing to mismanagement, the Indians made their escape, 
leaving behind in their camp, blankets, tomahawks, 
paint, &c., to the value of twenty-two dollars. An ex- 
press iTom the quarter-master general, respecting provi- 
sions. The commander-in-chief very ill. 

2'Jih. — The army wait for a supply of flour to enable 
them to proceed. The last pound served out this day, 
and should none arrive, on to-morrow the men will be 
without bread. Much dissatisfaction among the militia 
and levies; the latter claim their discharge; say they 
have served longer than the term for which they ha^-e 
enlisted. The enlistments are indeed somewhat extraor- 
dinary; they specify six months after assembling at the 
rendezvous on the frontier, but there has been no uni- 



This camp called afterward by "Wayae, 



''Greenville." 



364 MILITAEY JOUEXAL OF 

formity observed; some corps have inserted Winchester, 
some Fort Pitt, and others Fort Washington, but the 
bulk of the men say and declare that they engaged to 
serve but for six months from the date of their enlist- 
ment. These circumstances have been made a cause of 
complaint to the General, who has had much trouble. 
Piamingo and nineteen Chickasaws join the camj). The 
season so far advanced it will be impracticable to con- 
tinue the campaign. Forage entirely destroyed ; horses 
failing and cannot be kept up ; provisions from hand to 
mouth. A party of men engaged in throwing a bridge 
over the creek in front of the camp. Some hail and 
snow to-day. 

28^/i. — Seventy-four horses loaded with flour arrive ; 
about twelve thousand pounds. This supply will afford 
four days' allowance to the army. A few horses came 
loaded with clothing for the first regiment, the officers of 
which were directed to fill up their companies, if possible, 
from the levies. The new clothing has a good effect; 
near forty have already enlisted. Two privates of Ma- 
jor Butler's battalion were fired upon about three miles 
from camp, one of them killed, the other wounded, but 
made his escape to camp. Two of the militia some miles 
out, were pursued by four Indians ; one only got in, it is 
sux:)posed the other is a prisoner, as the savages endeav- 
ored to catch him when they might have shot with cer- 
tainty. In the general orders of this day the troops di- 
rected to be under arms at the first tap of the drum, 
which is to be given at daylight, and to continue paraded 
until dismissed. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 3G5 

• 2Wi. — One of the sentries wliicli form the chain round 
the encampment, alarmed the troops last night about 
nine o'clock, and put them all under arms. He imag- 
ined that he saw an Indian, and fired three times at some 
object. The first and second regiment of regulars com- 
pose about one-third the army, and although chiefly re- 
cruits, are tolerably well disciplined, but the remainder 
(excepting the few militia,) being levies and raised 
but for six months, and their times expiring daily, they 
take great liberties. This morning there was a constant 
firing kept up round the camp, notwithstanding it is 
known there is a general order against it; in fact, at 
present they are more troublesome and far inferior to the 
militia. A bridge thrown across the creek. One hun- 
dred and twenty men, properly officered, were ordered 
forward to open the road for the army. Two hundred 
militia go as a covering party. Piamingo and his nine- 
teen warriors, accompanied by Captain Sj^arks of the 
levies, with four riflemen, set out on a scout ; their object 
to take a prisoner. The battalion of levies from the 
territory south-east of the Ohio being so small, it was 
blended with the one from Virginia. Supernumerary 
officers went home. Three days flour issued to the troops 
in order that horses may be had to carry the baggage ; 
most of the baggage horses having been sent with the 
quarter-master general for provisions. 

^Oth. — The army took up the line of march about nine 
o'clock, crossed the creek upon the bridge, and left a very 
handsome encampment. The creek which runs along in 
front of this ground, twenty-five yards wide, is said to 



366 MILITARY JOUR^^AL OF 

be a principal brancli of the ^liami. Gained seven* 
miles this day; course north-west twenty-five degrees. 
The soil and timber of a superior quality. The General 
has been so yery ill since we left Fort Jetferson, that it 
was supposed he would not be able to proceed. 

Slst. — A very unpleasant camj) in the woods ; soil rich 
and timber thick and heavy. Last evening had a gust 
with severe lightning and thunder ; directly after night 
the wind rose and blew violently until daj^break. The 
trees and limbs falling around and in the midst of us, 
with the darkness of the night and in an enemy's coun- 
try, occasioned some concern. About twelve o'clock at 
night, for the first time, at the request of the General, I 
visited all the guards. 

Army continued encamped, waiting for several brig- 
ades of pack horses loaded with flour, which had reached 
Fort Jetferson last night. The troops are supplied for 
to-day and to-morrow, and the contractor has enough for 
one other day ; but should we move, the supph^ behind 
would be too late or lost ; besides it was found 3'esterday 
that the horses with the army were not sufficient to carry 
the baggage, part of which had to be left on the road. 
The tents and other baggage sent back for and brought up. 
Militia show great impatience ; their officers appear to have 
little influence. One-third turn out with a determination 
to go back, a few are prevailed on to stay ; between sixty 
and seventy, however, march oif in despite of everything, 
and swear they will stop the pack horses with provisions. 
The first regiment dispatched after them, not with an 
expectation of bringing them back, but with that idea and 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 367 

to prevent future desertions, and principally to protect the 
convoys. This evening two hundred and twelve horses, 
loaded with flour, arrived ; one hundred and fifty pounds 
the average weight. 

^ov. 1st. — The army remain encamped. A party ad- 
vanced to open the road. Prepare for marching to-mor- 
row. A deposit made here of heavy articles and such as 
could be dispensed with, to lighten the horses. 

2d. — The army marched at nine o'clock ; about twelve 
o'clock crossed a creek fifteen yards wide, running east. 
The country very flat and marshy. Joined this after- 
noon by another Indian path much frequented. Gained 
eight miles and encamped. Course north twenty-five 
degrees east this day, and total distance from Fort 
Washington eighty-nine miles. A scout sent out yes- 
terday fell in with an Indian camp, got some plunder 
and seven horses branded United States, supposed to have 
been stolen from Fort Washington. We had a light 
snow all this day. 

Sd. — Marched at nine o'clock. The first four miles 
very flat and wet. About twelve passed over dry ground 
and descended gradually for three miles to a small creek, 
supposed to be a branch of the \vaters emptying into 
Lake Erie ; proceeded two miles farther, and encamped 
on pleasant dry ground, on bank of a creek about twen- 
ty yards wide, said to be the Pickaway fork of the Omee.^ 
Distance this day about nine miles ; general course north- 
west thirty degrees. Fresh signs of the savages appeared 
to-day in several places; parties of riflemen detached 

* Known since to be a branch of the Wabash. 



368 MILITARY JOUEXAL OF 

after them, but without success. It was later than usual 
when the army reached the ground this CA'ening, and the 
men much fatigued prevented the General from having 
some works of defense immediatel}' erected. Major Fer- 
guson, commanding officer of artillery, sent for, and a 
plan agreed on intended to be commenced early on to- 
morrow. The high dry ground barely sufficient to en- 
camp the army ; lines rather contracted. Parallel with 
the front line runs the creek, about twenty yards wide. 
On both flanks low wet ground, and along most part of 
the rear. ^lilitia advanced across the creek about three 
hundred yards. Had accompanied the quarter-master 
in the afternoon, on to this ground ; it was farther than 
could have been wished, but no place short of it appeared 
so suitable. I was much pleased with it ; returned and 
made report ; found the army halted and about to en- 
camp on flat land, and with no good water ; although it 
was late, the march was continued till just dark, when 
we reached the creek. 

4ih. — Camp on a creek twenty yards wdde, supposed 
to be the Pickaway fork of the Omee, ninety-eight miles 
from Fort Washington. The frequent firing of the 
sentinels through the night had disturbed tlie camp, and 
excited some concern among the officers. The guards 
had reported the Indians to lie skulking about in con- 
siderable numbers. About ten o'clock at night General 
Butler, who commanded the right wing, was desired to 
send out an intelligent officer and party to make dis- 
coveries. Captain Slough, with two subalterns and thirty 
men, I saw parade at General Butler's tent for this pur- 



368 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

after tlicm, but without success. It was later than usual 
when the army reached the ground this evening, and the 
men much fatigued prevented the General from having 
some works of defense immediately erected. Major Fer- 
guson, commanding officer of artillery, sent for, and a 
plan agreed on intended to be commenced early on to- 
morrow\ The high dry ground barely sufficient to en- 
camp the army ; lines rather contracted. Parallel with 
the front line runs the creek, about twenty yards wide. 
On both flanks low wet ground, and along most part of 
the rear. Militia advanced across the creek about three 
hundred yards. Had accompanied the quarter-master 
in the afternoon, on to this ground ; it was farther than 
could have been washed, but no place short of it appeared 
so suitable. I was much pleased with it ; returned and 
made report ; found the army halted and about to en- 
camp on flat land, and with no good water ; although it 
was late, the march was continued till just dark, when 
we reached the creek. 

4:tli. — Camp on a creek twenty yards wide, supposed 
to be the Pickaway fork of the Omee, ninety-eight miles 
from Port Washington. The frequent tiring of the 
sentinels through the night had disturbed the camp, and 
excited some concern among the officers. The guards 
had reported the Indians to lie skulking about in con- 
siderable numbers. About ten o'clock at night General 
Butler, who commanded the right wing, was desired to 
send out an intelligent officer and party to make dis- 
coveries. Captain Slough, Avith two subalterns and thirty 
men, I saw parade at General Butler's tent for this j)ur- 






^3l 



y J £ W Of T J-J £ £ 1^1 C >\ l)J y )'/J £ ]■>! T 



•I 

^ r, •' y ti f i 




l^># ^ # ^^ ^^^ p-* 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 369 

}>jse, and heard the General give Captain Slough veiy 
particular verbal orders how to proceed. Myself and 
two or three officers staid with the General until late, 
when I returned to the comuiander-in-chief, whose tent 
was at some distance on the left, and who was unable to 
be up. 

The troops paraded this morning at the usual time, 
and had been dismissed from the lines but a few min- 
utes, the sun not yet up, when the woods in front 
rung with the yells and fire of the savages. The poor 
militia, who were but three hundred yards in front, had 
scarcely time to return a shot — they fled into our camp. 
The troops were under arms in an instant, and a smart 
fire from the front line met the enemy. It was but a few 
minutes, however, until the men were engaged in every 
quarter. The enemy from the front filed oflp to the right 
and left, and completely surrounded the camp, killed 
and cut off nearly all the guards, and approached close 
to the lines. They advanced from one tree, log, or 
stump to another, under cover of the smoke of our fire. 
The artillery and musketry made a tremendous noise, 
but did little execution. The Indians seemed to brave 
everything, and when fairly fixed around us they made 
no noise other than their fire, which they kept up very 
constant and which seldom failed to tell, although scarce- 
ly heard. Our left flank, probably from the nature of 
^the ground, gave way first; the enemy got possession of 
that part of the encampment, but it being pretty clear 
ground, they were too much exposed and were soon re- 
pulsed. Was at this time with the General engaged to- 
24 



370 MILITAEY JOUENAL OF 

ward the right ; he was on foot and led the party himself 
that drove the enemy and regained our ground on the 
left. The battalions in the rear charged several times 
and forced the savages from their shelter, but they al- 
ways turned with the battalions and fired upon them 
back ; indeed they seemed not to fear anything we could 
do. They could skip out of reach of the bayonet and 
return, as they pleased. They were visible only when 
raised by a charge. The ground was literally covered 
with the dead. The wounded were taken to the centre, 
where it was thought most safe, and where a great many 
Avho had quit their posts unhurt, had crowded together. 
The General, with other officers, endeavored to rally these 
men, and twice they were taken out to the lines. It ap- 
peared as if the officers had been singled out ; a very 
great proportion fell, or were wounded and obliged to 
retire from the lines early in the action. General But- 
ler was among the latter, as well as several other of the 
most experienced officers. The men being thus left with 
few officers, became fearful, despaired of success, gave up 
the fight, and to save themselves for the moment, aban- 
doned entirely their duty and ground, and crowded in 
toward the centre of the field, and no exertions could put 
them in any order even for defense ; perfectly ungovern- 
able. The enemy at length got possession of the artil- 
lery, though not until the officers were all killed but one, 
and he badly wounded, and the men almost all cut off, 
and not until the pieces were spiked. As our lines were 
deserted the Indians contracted theirs until their shot 
centred from all points, and now meeting with little op- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 371 

position, took more deliberate aim and did great execu- 
tion. Exposed to a cross fire, men and officers were seen 
falling in every direction ; the distress too of the wound- 
ed made the scene such as can scarcely be conceived; a 
few minutes longer, and a retreat would have been im- 
practicable. The only hope left was, that perhaps the 
savages would be so taken up with the camp as not to 
follow. Delay was death ; no prej)aration could be made ; 
numbers of brave men must be left a sacrifice, there was 
no alternative. It was past nine o'clock, when repeated 
orders were given to charge toward the road. The ac- 
tion had continued between two and three hours. Both 
officers and men seemed confounded, incapable of doing 
anything ; they could not move until it was told that a 
retreat was intended. A few officers put themselves in 
front, the men followed, the enemy gave way, and per- 
haps not being aware of the design, we were for a few 
minutes left undisturbed. The stoutest and most active 
now took the lead, and those who were foremost in break- 
ing the enemy's line, were soon left behind. At the mo- 
ment of the retreat, one of the few horses salved had 
been procured for the General ; he was on foot until then ; 
I kept by him, and he delayed to see the rear. The ene- 
my soon discovered the movement and pursued, though 
not more than four or five miles, and but few so far ; 
they turned to share the spoil. Soon after the firing 
ceased, I was directed to endeavor to gain the front, and 
if possible, to cause a short halt that the rear might get 
up. I had been on horseback from the first alarm, and 
well mounted ; pushed forward, but met with so many 



372 MILITARY JOUEXAL OF 

difficulties and interruptions from the people, that I was 
two hours at least laboring to reach the front. With 
the assistance of two or three officers I caused a short 
halt, but the men grew impatient and would move on. 
I got Lieutenants Sedam and Morgan, with half a dozen 
stout men, to fill up the road and to move slowly, I halt- 
ed myself until the General came up. By this time the 
remains of the army had got somewhat compact, but in 
the most miserable and defenseless state. The Avounded 
who came off left their arms in the field, and one-half 
of the others threw theirs away on the retreat. The road 
for miles was covered with firelocks, cartridge boxes and 
regimentals. How fortunate that the pursuit was discon- 
tinued ; a single Indian might have followed with safety 
upon either flank. Such a panic had seized the men, that 
I believe it would not have been possible to have brought 
any of them to engage again. In the afternoon Lieuten- 
ant Kersey, with a detachment of the first regiment, met 
us. This regiment, the only complete and best discip- 
lined portion of the army, had been ordered back upon 
the road on the 31st of October. They were thirty miles 
from the battle ground when they heard distinctly the 
firing of the cannon, were hastening forward and had 
marched about nine miles when met by some of the mi- 
litia, who informed !Major Hamtramck, the commanding- 
officer, that the army was totally destroyed. The Major 
judged it best to send on a subaltern to obtain some 
knowledge of things, and to return himself with the regi- 
ment to Fort Jetferson, eight miles back, and to secure at 
all events that post. He had made some arrangements. 



MAJOR EBEIs^EZER DENXY. 373 

and as we arrived in the evening, found him preparing 
again to meet us. Stragglers continued to come in for 
hours after we reached the fort. 

The remnant of the army, with the first regiment, were 
now at Fort Jeiferson, twenty-nine miles from the field 
of action, without provisions, and the former Avithout 
having eaten anything for twenty-four hours. A convoy 
was known to be upon the road, and within a day's march. 
The General determined to move with the first regiment 
and all the levies able to march. Those of the wounded 
and others unable to go on, were lodged as comfortably 
as possible within the fort. Accordingly we set out a 
little after ten and continued our route until within an 
hour of daylight, then halted and waited for day and 
until the rear came up. Moved on again about nine 
o'clock ; the morning of the 5th we met the convoy. 
Stopped a sufficiency to subsist us to Fort Hamilton ; 
sent the remainder on to Jefferson under an additional 
escort of a captain and sixty men ; proceeded, and at the 
first water halted, partly cooked and eat for the first time 
since the night preceding the action. At one o'clock 
moved on, and continued our route until nine at night, 
when we halted and made fires within fifteen miles 
of Fort Hamilton. Marched again just before day, the 
General soon after rode on to the fort. Troops reached 
in the afternoon. 

Itli. — Fort Hamilton command was ordered off with 
a small supply for the wounded, &c. About twelve same 
day continued our march, and halted before night within 



374 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

fifteen miles of Fort Washington, which place we reach- 
ed the afternoon of the 8th. 

The prediction of General Harmar, before the army 
set out on the campaign, was founded upon his ex- 
perience and particular knowledge of things. He saw 
with what material the bulk of the army w\as composed ; 
men collected from the streets and prisons of the cities, 
hurried out into the enemy's country, and with the otfi- 
cers commanding them, totally unacquainted with the 
business in which they were engaged, it w^as utterly im- 
possible they could be otherwise. Besides, not any one 
department was sufficiently prepared ; both quarter-mas- 
ter and contractors extremely deficient. It was a matter 
of astonishment to him that the commanding general, 
who was acknowledged to be perfectly comj^etent, should 
think of hazarding, with such people, and under such 
circumstances, his reputation and life, and the lives of 
so many others, knowing, too, as both did, the enemy 
with whom he was going to contend ; an enemy brought 
up from infancy to war, and perhaps superior to an equal 
number of the best men that could be taken against 
them. It is a truth, I had hopes that the noise and show^ 
which the army made on their march might possibly de- 
ter the enemy from attempting a serious and general 
attack. It was unfortunate that both the general officers 
were, and had been disabled by sickness ; in such situa- 
tion it is possible that some essential matters might be 
overlooked. The adjutant-general, Colonel Sargent, an 
old Revolutionary officer, was, however, constantly on 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 375 

tlic alert; he took upon himself the burden of every- 
thing, and a very serious and troublesome task he had. 
But one most important object was wanting, can't say 
neglected, but more might have been done toward ob- 
taining it; this was, a knowledge of the collected force 
and situation of the enemy ; of this we were 'perfectly ig. 
norant. Some few scouts out, but to no great distance. 
The one which left camp on the 29th of October, under 
direction of Captain Sparks, and composed chiefly of the 
friendly Indians, had missed the enemy altogether, and 
on their return to join the army, the morning after the 
defeat, met an Indian runner who had been in the en- 
gagement, of him they got the news which enabled them 
to escape. When the army advanced from Fort Jeffer- 
son, it did not exceed two thousand men ; discharges, 
desertions and the absence of the first regiment, reduced 
the effective strength on the day of action to about four- 
teen hundred. The second regiment had but one battal- 
ion with the army — it was well appointed, but young in 
service. The officers and men, however, did their duty ; 
they^ with the battalion of artillery, were nearly all cut 
off. The whole loss, as now ascertained by the different 
returns, is thirty-seven officers and five hundred and 
ninety-three privates killed and missing ; thirty-one offi- 
cers and two hundred and fifty-two privates wounded. 
378 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

Major General Butler, killed ; Colonel Sargent, adju- 
tant general, and Viscount Malartie, acting as aid-de- 
camp, Avounded. 

Fort Washington, Nov. IStk — The remains of our 
wretched and miserable army are encamped in front of 
the fort. Every necessary provision ordered to make the 
men as comfortable as possible, but the weather has been 
cold and wet, with snow, and a very considerable num- 
ber of officers and men are laid up. The General, too, 
has been much indisposed. On the 9th, the day after we 
reached this, he made out to forward to government, by 
way of Kentucky, a short dispatch, but has scarcely had 
his head off the pillow. 

On the 10th a detachment of fresh troops marched for 
Fort Jefferson, with a small supply for that post, and on 
the 11th the first regiment followed. Such of the officers 
in camp who are capable, have been engaged making re- 
turns, pay rolls, &c., and preparing for their men's dis- 
charge. All the wounded able to be moved from Fort 
Jefferson, reached here yesterday. The General has at 
length completed his particular dispatches, and on to- 
morrow I once again ascend the river for the seat of 
government. lie purposes, as soon as he is able to travel, 
to set out on horseback for the same j^lace. 

IdiJi. — In the evening take lefive of our friends at Fort 
Washington and embark on board a fourteen oar barge. 
The boat's company consists of Captain Edward Butler 
and twenty-two of his men, who were raised about Pitts- 
burgh, and for the sake of getting home have volunteer- 
ed this service. Passengers are Captain Buel, of the 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 379 

second regiment, who arrived at Fort Washington some 
short time after the army marched from thence, and 
where he chose to remain — he is now returning home ; 
and Adjutant Crawford and Quarter-master Semple, of 
the Pennsylvania levies. Crawford is an old Revolution- 
ary officer of some merit. He received a shot in the late 
action, which is lodged somewhere about the chest, but 
appears not at all disabled. Semple is a fine compan- 
ionable man, who has seen better times. We promise 
ourselves as pleasant a passage as circumstances and the 
lateness of the season will admit. 

JDec. 9th. — Arrive at Wheeling, after an extremely 
hard and tedious passage of twenty days ; the same 
journey have more than once made in fifteen — but the 
winter seemed to have set in earlier than usual. The 
river had swollen considerably before we started, and 
heavy rains and snow^s almost every day on our w\ay up, 
kept the water constantly on the rise. The last two 
nights covered the river with ice, and it was with diffi- 
culty the boat was worked to this place. 

10^;^. — Hired a boy and horses, took the road through 
Washington, and reached Pittsburgh on the night of the 
11th. 

13fh. — In the morning leave Pittsburgh, and arrive at 
Philadelphia late on the, 19th. 

19 fJi. — Waited immediately upon the Secretary of 
War. Since I left Fort Washington, have endeavored 
to banish from my mind, as much as possible, every idea 
of the slaughter and defeat of the army ; to talk at all 
on the subject is an unpleasant task to me, but there are 



380 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

certain persons to whom I must make a full communica- 
tions. My friends at Pittsburgh, and on to this place, 
seem to view me as escaped from the dead — astonish- 
ment takes place of pleasure ; and having in some de- 
e:ree 2:ot over those feelino-s mvself, am considered as 
little better than one of the savages — but all this will 
soon be forgotten. 

The morning after my arrival here, General Knox, the 
Secretary of War, called at my quarters and took me to 
the President's, where we breakfasted wdth the famil}^, 
and afterward had much talk on the subject of the cam- 
paign and defeat. With the Secretary, at his office, I 
have also endeavored to afford every possible satisfaction. 
It is a pleasing reflection to believe that I have fulfilled 
all that could be expected of me. The attention and 
kindness which I receive, is a flattering consolation and 
assurance of having done my duty. Among the friends 
I met at this place, I have found none who appeared 
more sincerely pleased to see me than General Harmar 
and his family. They left Fort Washington at the time 
the army marched out, and arrived here safe about three 
weeks since. The first business the General attended to 
was the settlement of his public accounts, which was 
soon done. Indeed there could be no difficulty, for in 
my opinion, there is not a better accountant than him- 
self; nor is it possible for any man to have been more 
exact or punctual than he was in all his transactions. 
He resigns his commission at the end of the present 
month. 

29tli. — This day I received the appointment of captain 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 381 

in the first regiment. Several other regular promotions 
made. Hamtramck will command the regiment ; Zieg- 
ler and Strong, majors. 

February^ 1792. — General St. Clair and several officers 
of the levies arrive at the city. My friend Captain Pratt, 
late quarter-master, with whom I lived and messed for 
five years while adjutant of the regiment, passed on his 
way home to Connecticut, to recruit a company for him- 
self. A new raised company now at this place, has been 
assigned to me ; but for the present, as it is a question 
with me whether I will continue in the service, have ex- 
cused myself from the command. I feel perfectly weary 
and sick of the noise and bustle of a military life, and 
long for a change for a domestic situation. 

March. — Greneral St. Clair is determined to have an in- 
vestigation into the causes of the defeat. He resigns the 
command of the army. As it will be some time before 
the investigation can commence, and having little now to 
do, I leave Philadelphia for Pittsburgh, by way of Car- 
lisle, with a view of making arrangements to retire from 
the army. The little horse that served me so well in the 
campaign and in the action, was brought round by the 
General, and carries me on this journey. Our good for- 
tune, I hope, will attend us. See my fi'iends at Carlisle. 
Proceeded to Pittsburgh, where I make some engage- 
ments, and determine upon quitting the service. Return 
to the city after an absence of four weeks. 

j;^^^?.— General Anthony Wayne appointed comman- 
der-in-chief, in place of General St. Clair, who had re- 
signed. The army is to be augmented to four regiments 



382 MILITAET JOURNAL OF 

of infantry, besides a corps of cavalry ; the whole, with 
artillery, to consist of five thousand men. The commit- 
tee of Congress commence their inquiry into the causes 
of the defeat. Several hours spent every day for a week 
past, examining officers and others examined on oath. 
They adjourn, and finally report to the House, 

" That, iu their opinion, the • failure of the late expedition can in no 
respect be imputed to the conduct of the commanding general, either at 
any time before or during the action." 

May 1st. — Resigned my commission ; next day left the 
city for Pittsburgh. 



In the winter of 1793-4 the western frontiers of Penn- 
sylvania lay much exposed to the inroads of the Indians ; 
frequent depredations were committed. Greneral Wayne 
had removed and taken with him down the Ohio, the 
whole of the troops of the United States, leaving at Fort 
Franklin only a subaltern and twenty men. I had oc- 
casion to be in Philadelphia about this time, when Grov- 
ernor Mifflin communicated to me a plan which he 
recommended to the Legislature for the protection of the 
western frontiers. This plan was adopted, and an act 
passed authorizing him to appoint and raise in Philadel- 
phia a company of artillery, and in the western counties 
three companies of riflemen. A very favorite object of 
the Governor, and which was approved by the Legisla- 
ture, was the establishment of a post at Presqu' Isle, on 
Lake Erie. The command intended for this favorite 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 383 

object was to be composed of detachments from each of 
the four companies, to consist of a captain, four subal- 
terns and one hundred and seven non-commissioned and 
privates. 

March 1st, 1794. — I was commissioned captain of the 
company to be raised in the county of Allegheny, and espe- 
cially appointed to the command of the Presqu' Isle detach- 
ment. It was expected that a post at Presqu' Isle would 
cut off the intercourse between the Six Nations, who had 
become wavering and suspicious, and the hostile Indians, 
and would favor General Wayne, who was preparing to 
march against the latter. Another important object was 
to afford protection to commissioners appointed to lay out 
towns at Le Boeuf and Presqu' Isle, and to force settle- 
ments at each of these places, under cover of the troops. 

20tli. — General Wilkins came from Philadelphia with 
the law for raising four companies of State troops, and 
the commission of captain for myself, with orders to 
command the detachment of one hundred and seven 
men, when raised, destined for Presqu' Isle. Samuel 
Murphy and James Patterson appointed the subalterns 
to the Allegheny company. 

Ajpril 4:th. — Mr. Patterson's commission did not come 
on until to-day. I went to his home and delivered it, 
with money and recruiting instructions. Lieutenant 
Murphy has been out since the 24th of March in Fayette. 

dth. — Set out to Westmoreland to recruit and to hurry 
on the quota of that county. Had written to the inspec- 
tors of Washington and Westmoreland, some days pre- 
vious, requesting that their men might be sent on as soon 



384 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

as possible, as a covering party was wanted to make a 
deposit somewhere near the head navigation of French 
creek. 

13th. — Finding that the detachments would not join 
us as soon as they were wanted, joined with General 
Wilkins in requesting a party of volunteers for covering 
the boats and stores. 

19//^.- — The volunteers assembled. Twenty men with 
Lieutenant Miller arrived from Washington. 

21st. — Ensign Mahaffy came in with his quota from 
Westmoreland. They marched along with Miller's men ; 
each with a sergeant, corporal and twenty men. They 
would join the volunteers next morning. Lieutenant 
Miller returned to Washington to recruit. 

The State troops under Mahaffy, - - 43 

Four sent with boats, 4 

47 

"Volunteers, 32 

Ma?/ 7th. — The detachment of artillery (thirty-two) 
under Lieutenant Hazlewood, arrived from Philadelphia. 
23d. — Received a letter from the Governor entreating 
that nothing might be omitted to have the law for lay- 
ing out the town at Presqu' Isle executed, and empower- 
ing us to order out militia if necessary. Mr. Ellicott 
and Mr. Wilkins, who was just from Fort Franklin, 
joined in requesting a company from the three counties. 
Accordingly the men were ordered out. 

30^^. — Orders came from the Governor for turning out 
one thousand militia to assist in making the establish- 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 385 

ment at Presqu' Isle, but left to the discretion of General 
Irvine, who was expected to be here. 

June 1st. — General Irvine came to town. He was of 
opinion that five hundred of the militia ordered out 
would answer the purpose, but not less. Two days ago 
the Indians attacked a canoe upon the Allegheny ; there 
were three men in it. They killed one and wounded the 
other two, but got nothing. The accident happened 
five miles above the Kiskiminetas. The Indians, disap- 
pointed in that attack, crossed to the Kiskiminetas and 
unfortunately fell in with a Kentucky boat full of women 
and children, with but four men, laying to feeding their 
cattle. The men were ashore, received a fire without 
much damage, got into the boat, all but one, who fled 
to a house not far distant. The Indians fired into the 
boat, killed two men and wounded the third. The boat 
had been set afloat and drifted down in that helpless 
condition, twenty-four women and children on board. 

2d. — Orders from the Governor suspending our expe- 
dition to Presqu' Isle, and directing me to remain with 
my detachment at Le Boeuf. Wrote to the inspectors to 
forward me the enlistments of the recruits from West- 
moreland and Washington counties. 

QtJi. — Wrote to the Governor. 

"jtJi^ — Lieutenant Hazlewood, with his detachment of 
artillery from Philadelphia, thirty-two, having joined us, 
we crossed the Allegheny with seventy men, the remain- 
ier of my command, and took up our march for Le Boeuf. 
Encamped one mile from Robinson's. 

8^^/^. — Detained until late in the day waiting for a 
25 



386 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

drove of cattle which we wished to hnve along. Twen- 
ty-two were brought over. We moved seven miles and 
halted. 

Wi. — Found that the cattle had returned in the night 
back to the river. We were obliged to send after them. 
It was two o'clock when they were brought up. We 
marched about fourteen miles, and encamped on a branch 
of Brush creek. 

lOtli. — Marched at seven o'clock ; crossed Conneke- 
ness; halted one hour; took the route again, and en- 
camped one mile beyond Muddy creek. This day's 
march twenty-three miles. 

nth. — Marched at eight o'clock. Passed over a rich 
level country. Stopped at Slippery Rock, where we saw 
one of the best natural mill seats and plenty of water. 
A fine situation for a village. Went on and encamped 
at a spring — twenty miles. 

12tli. — Marched at seven o'clock through thickets of 
brush — few trees — but the land good. Rain for two 
days past. Passed the graves of two men who were 
killed a few days ago, eighteen miles from Franklin. 
Halted awhile. Proceeded and got to the fort (mouth 
of French creek) between four and five o'clock in the 
afternoon — twenty miles — distance from Pittsburgh sev- 
enty miles. 

13//^. — Lay encamped drying, cleaning and putting our 
arms in order. 

IWi. — Mr. Ellicott made a request in writing for me 
to remain until the arrival of the Cornplanter — stating 
that he and General Wilkins had sent for him. Agreed. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 387 

Ibth. — Found Fort Franklin in a wretched state of dc 
fense. The men in the fort, about twenty, almost all 
invalids and unable to make any repairs. The officer 
and his command under great apprehension of an attack 
from the Indians, who were in considerable numbers 
about the place, and very insulting. There was good 
reason to fear mischief from the Six TsTations. Two men 
were murdered the day before we arrived, eighteen miles 
on the road to Pittsburgh. They had left the fort, and 
it was supposed had been followed by some of the rascals 
who are now here. Sensible of the importance of the 
post, and the connection which we must necessarily have 
with it, could not think of advancing and leaving it in 
such bad condition. The garrison for some time past 
had suffered every inconvenience of a close siege ; gates 
were kept locked day and night. But both gates and 
pickets served more to cover the enemy, than for any 
defense of the people within. Accordingly we set to 
work. A new set of pickets was brought from the 
w^oods, and in four days an entire new w^ork erected 
round the block-house, which we left in tolerable de- 
fensible order. Lieutenant Polhemus, wdio commands 
here, is of opinion that General Knox intends the fort 
shall go to w^reck — says he has often represented the con- 
dition of the place ; but no provision had been made for 
repairing it. The block-house cannot last more than an- 
other year or two, and then it will be easier building upon 
the old British work (which ought to have been done at 
first) than to repair the present one. 

21st. — Took up our march. Crossed French creek in 



388 MILITAKY JOURNAL OF 

canoes; the water high and rapid. Marched twelve 
miles over a fine country. Forded Big Sugar creek waist 
deep. Encamped on a fine piece of ground. 

22d. — Marched at seven. The road and land from 
Franklin to Cussewago excellent. Got to the settlement 
about three o'clock, where we found some people "forted," 
as it is called. This the only place where a settlement 
has been attempted this side of Pittsburgh. 

23d. — The cattle strayed. Did not get all until eleven 
o'clock. ^larched twelve miles. The country very level 
and rich. 

24,t]i. — Marched at eight through pine swamps and bad 
roads. Came upon French creek, seven miles below Le 
Boeuf; the country thence up beautiful, and the road 
good. Joined our people about four o'clock. The dis- 
tance from Fort Franklin to Le Boeuf, by way of Cusse- 
wago, about fifty-five miles. The first part may be made 
good, but the other will be very difficult until the coun- 
try is opened. A direct road north from Franklin to 
Le Boeuf, it is said, will not exceed forty-five miles ; but 
it is yet uncertain what kind of a road that route will 
afford. Ensign Mehaffy and his detachment we found 
fenced in. The quarters of the men who were here be- 
fore us, and the whole place, in the most abominable 
filthy condition, and one-third of the men ill with the 
flux. Boats had all been got up safe and unloaded. 
Stores of every kind dejoosited in a temj^orary warehouse. 
To our very great mortification, I received orders from 
the Governor suspending our march to Presqu' Isle, and 
to proceed for the present no farther. This circumstance 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 389 

he laments. The President of the United States has 
made a special request of it ; apprehensive of giving dis- 
gust to the Six Nations and extending the sphere of In- 
dian hostilities. Information communicated to the de- 
partment of war, by Israel Chapin, Indian Agent, 
stating the great probability of an immediate rupture 
with the Six Nations if we proceed to Presqu' Isle, has 
produced this interposition of the President. 

2Wi. — The evening of our arrival I received a letter 
from Israel Chapin, superintendent for the Six Nations, 
informing me that he had just landed at Presqu' Isle 
with William Johnson, a British agent, and sixteen chiefs 
and warriors — a deputation from the Buffalo council, and 
that they would be with us by two o'clock next day. 

2Qth. — Lay encamped under cover of two block-houses. 
Chapin with his party came in, and saluted us as they 
passed. We returned the salute with a discharge of the 
small arms out of the block-houses, and one six-pounder. 
The Indians encamped down on the river bank. 

21tli. — Met the Indians to hear their message. It was 
from the Buffalo council "to the armed people at Presqu' 
Isle and Le Bceuf," and amounted to nothing more or 
less than an order to remove back. That if we did, they 
would consider us as fi'iends, but if not, we would not be 
considered as such. I disliked the presence of Johnson, 
and felt a very strong disposition to take him into cus- 
tody. Abused Chapin for coming upon such business. 
He excused himself by declaring that he had been in 
a manner compelled. He is an old man. Johnson, the 
British and Indian agent, acted (slily) as prompter to 



390 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

their old chief who spoke. They denied having sold 
their land. Told us that the paper (deed) which they 
signed at Fort Harmar, was thought by them then to be 
no more than a treaty of peace, and that the goods which 
were given them they considered as presents. Money, 
they say they never received any. They were very in- 
quisitive — wished to know if any surveyors were out, and 
told us to stop every person from going forward. They 
were told that we were ordered here by our great coun- 
cil, and could not remove from hence until orders came 
for that purpose. 

28^/i. — Chapin and the deputation of Indians left us 
and returned to Presqu' Isle, where they had left their 
boats, and would proceed home to Buffalo by water, the 
way they came. 

29//^. — Wrote to the Governor ; inclosed the Indian 
message and a return of the troops. 

30//^. — Commenced our fatigue with as many hands as 
we dare venture abroad, getting pickets and block-house 
logs. 

July 1st. — Laid off ground on the old French and 
British site, and began a work sufficient for my com- 
mand. Four block-houses forming a square, fifty-four 
feet apart; lower story of house seventeen feet, upper 
story twenty feet, connected by stout pickets set two and 
a half feet in the ground and ten and a half out. The 
seam inside covered by a smaller picket six feet high. 
Sides of block-houses covered by an angle in the line of 
pickets extending from the centre of each curtain. Sides 
of the angles, eighteen feet. The ground handsomely 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 391 

elevated. Washed on the east by Le Booiif creek, fifteen 
and twenty yards wide. An extensive cleared plain all 
around. 

2d. — All hands at work. Erected another curtain. 

Sd. — Inclosed ourselves so as to secure us from any 
attempts the Indians could make. 

4th. — Block-houses up to the square pickets planted 
on three sides. Rested this day from labor. 

5t7i.—M.v. IX'esbitt, Mr. Tannehill and Mr. Gibson, left 
us to return home. Wrote to the Governor. Employed 
in getting in timber, leveling the fort, &c. 

6th. — Sunday. Rested from labor. 

7th, Sthj 9th and 10th. — Employed in raising two build- 
ings ; one for the contractor and one for quarter-master's 
and military stores. 

11th and 12th. — Pulled down some old buildings and 
got up our fourth line of pickets. Filled up two old 
French cellars that were within our work, and leveled 
the parade. An Indian express arrived from Franklin 
with a packet for Mr. Ellicott. 

13th.— No fatigue. 

17th. — Sent Lieutenant Murphy, the quarter-master, a 
sergeant and fifteen men, wdth a six ox team, to bring up 
our other twelve-pounder from where it was left, seven 
miles below on the creek. They returned in the after- 
noon. 

IStJi. — An express came from Franklin with the pro- 
ceedings of the Buffalo council, held the 4th instant; 
sent by General Chapin. 

19^/i.— Ensign Mehaffy, with six men, started for Pitts- 



392 MILITxS.EY JOURNAL OF 

burgh with dispatches, and with orders to bring us on a 
supply of provisions. 

2bth. — Obliged to stop our work for want of provisions. 

2Qth. — Discovered three Indians viewing the fort. 
Sent out a couple of men with a white flag, but the fel- 
lows cleared off. This evening received letters from Pitt 
and one fi'om the Governor, dated 13th of June. 

2101. — Heard the report of two cannon toward Presqu' 
Isle. Sent two men on there to observe if there were 
any people at that place. 

28^A. — The men sent to Presqu' Isle returned after 
being all over the place. Made no discoveries. 

Aug. 1st. — Dispatched Sergeant Holladay and two men 
to Pittsburgh, with letters and returns for the Governor. 
Sent along a draught of our fort, which is now nearly fin- 
ished. In the second story of each of the western block- 
houses is mounted a six-j)ounder ; and aloft on each of 
the eastern houses is a swivel. In the eastern angle, 
fronting the creek, constructed of heavy timber laid hor- 
izontally, we have a battery of two twelve-pounders. 
Around the curtains are erected banquettes of hewn tim- 
ber, for the men to mount on to fire through the ports. 
Men quarter in the block-houses. Officers have two 
small buildings, for quarter - master and contractor's 
stores, besides magazine and guard house. 

2d. — Served the troops with a half a ration of meat 
only, and a ration and a half of flour. The weather re- 
markably warm and dry ; no rain since the 20th of July. 

3f7. — Extreme sultry weather. The creek totally use- 
less. In the evening appearance of rain at a distance, 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENXY. 393 

all round ; only a few drops reached us. The wind has 
continued south-west during this dry spell. 

bth. — Cloudy, with Avind, but no rain. 

Qth. — Received a supply of cattle, thirteen head, but 
miserably poor. 

Ith. — Last night one of the sentries fired at an Indian 
very near the fort, about two o'clock in the morning. 
The garrison was alarmed and under arms. 

9^^. — The weather changed. Wind from the south-east. 

10th. — A steady rain all last evening and this morning. 
An appearance of more. 

lltli. — Dry warm weather. A young Indian came ex- 
press from Cussewago, with information that a Mr. Dick- 
enson had, the day before, been fired upon within one 
hundred perches of the town, and was wounded in three 
places, a fourth shot cut the crown of his hat. One of 
the balls lodged in his body, but there were hopes of his 
recovery. David Mead begged for some protection. 

12th. — Sent a trusty corporal and twelve men to Cusse- 
wago to remain there. A man of that place fired on 
within one hundred and fifty perches of the block-house, 
and wounded in three places, Nothing of the kind has 
yet occurred with us. Our sentries have twice in the 
night fired at objects which they took for Indians, and 
had us all at our stations. Have no doubt bat they were 
frequently near us. A few days since three fellows ap- 
peared on the edge of the plain ; I sent a sergeant with 
a flag toward them, but they made ofi^. 

11th. — Sherman Morrow, of the artillery, missing; 
supposed to have deserted. Our whiskey run out. 



394 MILITAEY JOURNAL OF 

\Stli. — Sent a party in search of Morrow ; found no 
trace of liim. 

\Wi. — A. further search made, but no trace or sign. 

20th. — Set in to rain very early, and continued all day. 
The creek rose considerably. Morrow came in about two 
o'clock. Says he was lost ; traveled to Lake Erie, was at 
Presqu' Isle. 

23(Z. — In the evening three canoes made out to bring 
us some flour from Cussewago. Each canoe had five 
barrels of flour. 

2Wi. — The people returned to Cussewago. 

2bt]i. — Last night a few of our fellows broke oj)en the 
commissary store, outside the garrison, where the com- 
missioners had a cask of brandy, and carried off* the 
barrel. The men were paraded early. George Depue, 
John Depue, Walker and Glenn, who were found drunk, 
"were confined. A canteen of the brandy was found in 
Walker's berth, and a number of the men appeared to 
have had a small share. Mitchel, of the artillery, called 
out, that it w^as damned wrong these men should be con- 
fined. I ordered him to be secured. He snatched up a 
musket, and swore he would shoot the first man who 
would attempt to lay hands on him. The guard was 
backward. I ad\'anced toward him ; he snapped the 
piece at me and called to the men to join him. Elliot, 
one of the prisoners, jumped up to his assistance, and 
hallooed, " N'ow's the time, my boys, let's join." Two of 
the other prisoners endeavored to escape out of the gate. 
In the mean time Mitchel was loading his piece, and had 
got it primed, but before it was charged Lieutenant 



MAJOE EBEJfEZEE DENNY. 395 

Murphy, seconded by Sergeant Smith, jumped upon him 
and disarmed him with considerable difficulty. Mr. El- 
licott, who was at the gate at the time, prevented Glenn 
and Depue from running off. Elliot was the only one 
who offered to assist Mitchel, and coming up at the time 
Lieutenant Murphy was engaged with Mitchel, Mr. Mur- 
2)hy settled his business. The troops about this time were 
under arms, and as soon as possible we had Mitchel in 
irons. He, however, was not settled, but damned him- 
self if he would not shoot both Murphy and myself. 
Knowing him to be a dangerous fellow, and having no 
authority to punish so capital a crime, and keeping him 
confined Avith us would have been attended with some 
risk, I dispatched him off under a corporal and three 
men, to Fort Franklin, with a request to Captain Heth to 
keep him secured. The same party of rascals broke down 
the oven some time in the night, with a view of putting 
a stop to any more bread being issued. 

Lieutenant Miller is blamed for encouraging the break- 
ing of the oven. He has been heard say that it was 
wrong not to let the men have flour, and went so far as 
to tell me the men ought to have flour. I mentioned at 
the time that if he would be answerable for any charge 
the contractor would bring against me, that his detach- 
ment should have flour ; but he would not agree to that. 
When the men have been talking to him of the hardness 
of the times, he would reply that "they were hard 
enough," and being exceedingly familiar with all ranks, 
eating and sleeping with his, sitting down and entering 
into social conversation with the meanest of them, and 



396 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

drinking with them uj^on all occasions, notwithstanding 
my repeated advice to him, this conduct led the other 
gentlemen to suspect him of being concerned. However, 
he was very quiet during our fray. About ten o'clock 
the barrel was found concealed under a heap of brush, 
with about half the liquor in it. 

Lieutenant Hazlewood informs me, that Lieutenant 
Miller told him he was not doing right in suffering a 
man of the artillery detachment to bake bread — that lie. 
Miller, would not allow one of Ids detachment to do so, 
if he had ever so many bakers ; and mentioned that the 
man who baked had the curses of all the garrison. 
Upon further inquiry, we find there were no less than 
seven concerned in robbing the store. 

21ih. — Ensign Mehaffy, with his party, arrived with 
thirteen head of very small cattle, and a few horse loads 
of flour and whiskey — ten in number. 

Sej^t. 3d. — Wrote to the Governor and inclosed re- 
turns, dated the 1st. Also wrote to General Harmar. 

QfJi. — Received a small supply of flour from Cussewa- 
go in two canoes. A few days past considerable rain fell. 
The waters risen five or six inches. 

7th. — Last night was very cold. 

8^/i.— Still colder. 

9//^. — In the morning the whole country white with 
frost. The officers of the fort have all expressed a desire 
to see Presqu' Isle, and they have receiA^ed some en- 
couragement, provided circumstances would allow it. A 
few daj^s since a letter was received by ]Mr. Ellicott from 
Mr. Adlum, w^ho had returned to Fort Franklin from the 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. d97 

Cornplanter. The letter informs us that a treaty was to 
be held at Buffalo, on the 15th of this month, by the Six 
Nations, and commissioners appointed by the United 
States ; recommending it to us, by all means, to have a 
stock of provisions laid in ; that if the treaty did not ter- 
minate as the Indians wished, that war was inevitable, 
and that the Cornplanter desired him to tell us not to 
carry much provision to Le Boeuf, for fear we would 
have to run of and leave it before long. Before this in- 
formation came, I had told Mr. Hazlewood we would 
endeavor to let him go to Presqu' Isle soon. But since, 
being obliged to employ more of the men in strengthen- 
ing the fort, and not thinking it i)rudent to let him select 
sixteen men to go just upon the day he pleased, he made 
a formal tender to me of his commission, telling me it 
was to see the country that he came out, and if he could 
not have that liberty, he did not choose to serve any 
longer ; he wished to resign his appointment, he would 
then go where he pleased. I informed him that it was 
not in my power to accept it ; but the next time that I 
wrote to the Grovernor, would mention it, and if he ap- 
proved of the resignation it would be well ; but that it 
was impossible for him to quit until an answer came 
from the Governor. He replied, that his time would be 
out against then, and took back the commission. 

Besides the information which has been mentioned as 
received fi-om John Adlum, he tells us also, that a num- 
ber of Indians had come across the lake to guard the 
frontiers of the Six N'ations. Now it is more than proba- 
ble that a party of these Indians are constantly about 



898 MILITAKY JOUENAL OF 

Presqii' Isle, that place being the grand point in question. 
And to suffer an officer and fifteen or twenty men to go 
there at this time, might precipitate a war, which is 
dreaded. The night after Lieutenant Hazlewood had 
shown me a list of sixteen men that he wanted to go to 
the lake with him, and before he wished to quit the ser- 
vice ; I took an opportunity of mentioning to him the 
impropriety of going at this time. Told him that I was 
as desirous of going as any person could be, but that I 
was determined never to do a thing that might disgrace 
me; that probably there was not much danger, but it 
was uncertain what would happen. That one or two 
men might not be discovered, but an officer and such a 
party as he wanted, would very likel}^ be seen and in- 
tercepted. Any accident w^ould injure me. He appear- 
ed satisfied with this ; but to my astonishment, next day ■ 
he wanted to resign. 

11^/^. — Received a letter from Ensign Vanhorn at Cus- 
sewago, complaining much of Mr. Wilkins having or- 
dered the two six-pounders from there to Franklin, and 
begging for some more men. Wrote by the two men to 
General Wilkins, and inclosed a letter to an inspector 
for fifty men to be kept at Cussewago ; mentioned the 
hostile determination of the Six N'ations, &c. 

The pack horses in the emj)loy of the contractor left 
us two or three days ago, with orders to load at Cusse- 
wago with flour, and return as soon as possible. I sent 
two men along with them, and ordered the corjDoral who 
is stationed there, to add four of his men to the party 
when they started for this place. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 399 

13ih. — No whiskey for the troops. 

IStli, — The pack horses not returned. Whiskey out. 
Beef very poor. Men comphiin. A board of officers 
inspect it, and judge a pound and a half to be no more 
than right. Sent a man to Cussewago to know what de- 
tains the horses. 

20th. — The express returned from Cussewago and says 
that the pack horses had arrived there from Franklin 
the day before yesterday; that the one-half of them 
w^ere lost ; that but five were coming on. By the siime 
express Mr. Mead informs us that on Sunday last he 
was at Franklin, where he learned that Governor Simco 
had marched with a party of British troops from Ni- 
agara to disx3ossess Captain Williamson of a handsome 
establishment which he had made on Lake Ontario, in 
the State of New York. Yesterday two spies were dis- 
covered viewing our fort. This evening the horses ar- 
rived. One lost on the road from Cussewago, and the 
load (salt) was left behind. Matthew Wilson, the ex- 
press from Cussewago to Pittsburgh, returned; only 
eight days gone. By him I received letters from the 
Governor and General Wilkins. 

21st. — Sent a boat off for corn to Cussewago, and for 
some more flour. We have had some rain almost every 
day for three weeks past, but not to affect the creek un- 
til now ; nor has there been any chance to employ boats 
since the 4th of July until the present time. 

28^5^. — On the morning of this day the meat was com- 
plained of. A court was ordered to inspect it. They 
reported it poor and unwholesome ; consequently not fit 



400 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

to be issued. Mr. Ellicott and m^'sclf looked at it, but 
could not agree with the court. The beef was put into 
store, the best meat picked out, and delivered without a 
murmur. Some of the officers who were on the court, 
particularly Lieutenant INIiller, scolded his sergeant, and 
forbid the men taking it, telling them it was all con- 
demned. This encouraged others, and they thinking 
that the contractor and quarter-master were imposing 
upon them meat which had not passed inspection, refused 
the second time. I desired the court to go and give their 
opinion of what the contractor had selected. They did ; 
and Lieutenant Hazlewood reported that they were of 
the same opinion as before, that the meat was unfit for 
use. I examined it, with some other gentlemen, but ex- 
cepting a few pieces which had been taken out the first 
time, the rest was as sweet as any meat could be. I 
waited upon the court, and told them there was no re- 
source (it was all we had) , that there might be a chance 
piece not so good, but that the commissary should pick 
it ; and as I had understood from the men that the poor- 
ness was what they complained of, that a pound was not 
sufficient for the ration, if they would look at it again 
and report what additional quantity might be allowed, 
that I would order it. Lieutenant Miller cursed himself 
and said he would report no more about it, that if they 
had done right they would have thrown it into the creek. 
Lieutenant Hazlewood and Ensign Mchafi'y were willing 
to make the report, Avhile they thought that the others 
refusing, would prevent them. But upon my telling 
them that any two would be sufficient, or that Lieutenant 



MAJOK EBENEZER DENNY. 401 

Murphy should be ordered in the room of Lieutenant 
Miller, Lieutenant Hazlewood replied that he or they 
could not have anything more to do with it ; that any 
other opinion now would be condemning the first report, 
and therefore declined. This was plain enough, that all 
the meat was looked upon by the court to be bad and 
unfit to be issued. 

29^/i. — Two canoes came with seven barrels of whiskey 
and six barrels of flour. Cold rains. The creek in fine 
condition for boating. 

30^;^. — Very cold for the season. 

Oct. Xst. — ^Wrote to the Governor and inclosed a return 
of the troops. My communications to the Governor 
have been once a month, and oftener when necessary. 
Men are all in fine health and exercised every day. Our 
numbers the same as when we set out; that is, four 
subalterns, a quarter-master, seven sergeants, six corpo- 
rals, one drummer and ninety-six privates. 

2d. — Cold raw east wind, with rain. The creek falls. 

3(Z. — Cold, and considerable rain. 

A.t%. — A light snow in the morning. The day clear 
and cold. 

^th. — Last night a cold rain ; cleared up and changed 
to snow. The country covered about four inches. The 
woods around have a beautiful appearance. The creek 
keeps in good boating order. Received a suj)ply of beef 
this afternoon in time to save the life of our milch cow. 

6^A. — Hard frost, clear and cold. 

^iih. — This morning woods white with frost. Consid- 
erable ice. The creek keeps up finely. 
26 



402 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

^th. — Clear and moderate. 

9^/i. — Cloudy and cold, with some rain. Received two 
messages lately from the Cornplanter. He pretends to 
be friendly, but says we must leave the place or we will 
be driven otf. The Senecas, of whom he is chief, are a 
tribe of the Six IS'ations ; they live high up the Allegheny 
river, and in case of hostilities are much exposed. John 
Adlum, a surveyor, who was lately at Cornplanter 's 
town, writes from Franklin, and says that a number of 
the Indians from the British side were with the Corn- 
planter, and threaten this j^ost. Our movements into 
this country no doubt have prevented these people fi'om 
joining the western Indians, and a continuance of peace 
Avith them will depend altogether upon the success of 
General Wayne. 

lOih. — Yer}' winter-like weather. A canoe with whis- 
key, flour and salt arrived this afternoon from Cussewa- 
go. About dark an express from Pitt, with letters from 
Mr. Wilkins and Governor Mifflin ; a copy of an act 
for maintaining my command, which is to be increased 
to one hundred and thirty men ; orders to re-enlist. 

lltli. — Fine day. 

I2i1i. — A canoe Avith twelve barrels flour. Answered 
Mr. Wilkins' letter by Matthew Wilson. 

VdiTi. — Pleasant weather. The Indian summer here. 
Frosty nights. The creek begins to fall. 

14:th, 15th, IQtk and 17th. — Remarkable fine days and 
clear, dry, frosty nights. 

18^^, — Set out with twelve men, accompanied by Mr. 
Ellicott, on a visit to Prcsqu' Isle. Went by what is 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 403 

called the grubbed road. It seems that after the French 
had opened the Indian path from Presqu' Isle to Le 
Boeuf, and wagoned considerably upon it, they found 
that it was some miles about, and that they had com- 
menced the road upon a wrong plan ; that it would take 
more labor to keep it in repair than would open one 
upon a straight line, notwithstanding, near five miles 
was cross-way'd, and no road can be had from the lake 
to French creek with less. However, the direct course 
was found, and they began with cutting it out forty feet 
in width, which was pursued from the ford on Mill creek 
all the way to Le Boeuf. They also erected several large 
bridges, thirty, forty, fifty feet in length, across hollow 
ways and deep runs, overlaid with puncheons about 
eighteen feet long. But there does not appear to have 
been any cross- way done. Though it will certainly want 
as much as the old road, yet there has been a vast deal 
of digging. The course being straight, the way una- 
voidably led up and down every little precipice that 
presented, but all these were leveled ; every point and 
sidling ground was made easy, and is still so. But the 
bridging has decayed and fallen down in the centre. 
But what appears the most extraordinary is the grub- 
bing. The country through is covered with a vast deal 
of heavy timber, notwithstanding every tree, from one 
end to the other, has been taken up by the roots and 
rolled out. However, it does not appear that ever they 
made use of this road ; for when the trees were taken ur 
the holes were j^et so deep as to make it bad for a horse. 
^0 doubt the road was intended for a grand way. It is 



404 MILITAKY JOURNAL OF 

now grown up with small wood, but tlie largest to be 
seen does not exceed six inches. It is supposed that 
eight men could cut out a mile in a day. After that 
there must be a cross-way for four or five miles, and 
some of the old bridges repaired, the root holes filled ; 
in places ditching would be very serviceable. The dis- 
tance is between ten and twelve miles. We left Le 
Boeuf about eight o'clock and were at Presqu' Isle about 
two. Spent the afternoon along the lake and looking 
round the old fort. The situation grand. A perfect sea- 
board prospect, and one of the most beautiful. The bank 
along the lake is high and dry, perhaps about forty feet. 
Six or eight feet of the bottom is a slate rock. For a 
mile and a half, the country round the fort has been 
cleared, but is now grown up with young chestnut timber. 
Even within the fort the brush is so thick that it is diffi- 
cult passing. There have been very fine gardens here ; 
parsnips, currant bushes and many other things growing 
wild. The old fort a regular pentagon ; about one thou- 
sand feet round the parapet, overlooking and command- 
ing the basin or harbor, and aifording a boundless view 
of the lake. It has been a handsome but light work ; 
neither ditch nor parapet are sufficiently large. Five 
feet is about the base and height. The ditch perhaps 
three feet, and four in width. There must have been 
some other defense, pickets or fraising. The walls of the 
magazine are yet good, and the well wants nothing but 
cleaning out. The chimneys of the houses, some brick, 
others stone, are still standing ; and the walls of a stone 
house, down by the old iiiill, are yet tolerably good. 



MAJOE EBENEZER DENNY. 405 

I9th.—Leit Presqu' Isle about seven o'clock. Return- 
ed by the old cart road. Grot back to Le Boeuf about 
two o'clock. The old road appears now to be dryer than 
the grubbed one. Indeed in many places where the 
cross-waying is, the ground does not appear to want it. 
The country upon both roads is wet; will make fine 
grazing farm. Many excellent plantations might be 
made. There is a variety of soil and timber. Some 
places and large bottoms, are as rich as any land that 
can be found ; the timber, walnut, sugar-tree and shell- 
bark hickory. But the greater part is but middling, ex- 
cept for pasture; the timber, hemlock or spruce pine, 
and beech. Along the lake, for two or three miles back, 
the country is high and dry, a light soil, chestnut and 
oak of a large growth. Although we had severe frosts 
at Le Boeuf since the middle of last month, and almost 
constant, we could not discover that there had been any 
at Presqu' Isle, at least nothing appeared touched, not 
even the pea vine. This temperature of the weather 
must be owing to the large body of water which had re- 
ceived in the summer a degree of heat not easily chilled; 
consequently until that warmth in the lake is overcome, 
the air around will be influenced and kept temperate. 
The same cause is operating now upon the air. On the 
contrary, in the spring, keeps back the season and all 
vegetation. It is from this cause, I suppose, that apple 
orchards and some other fruits are so certain upon the 
lakes. Letters from Pitt inform us that in August Gen- 
eral Wayne had given the western Indians a severe 



406 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

drubbing. This will be very apt to quiet the Six JN'a- 
tions, the instigations of the British to the contrary not- 
withstanding. 

20th. — The French creek fallen near three feet since 
the last rains. Two men from the landing, ten miles 
down, left their boat and canoes there. They came up 
for assistance. The creek too low for their boat. The 
weather changing. Considerable rain fell this afternoon. 

2lst. — Rain, off and on, all night, with a strong south 
wind. About daylight shifted to the north-west. Thick 
squalls of snow all day, with hail. 

'2'2d. — Cold and like for snow. The creek rose last night 
a few inches. The keel boat, after putting part of her load 
into canoes, made out to reach this place. 

23c?. — Mr. Ellicott set out in the Mohawk boat for 
Fort Pitt. 

2^th. — Set in to snow early in the morning ; continued 
all day, night, and the most part of next day. 

2bth. — In the afternoon changed to a light rain. Had 
the ground been frozen and the snow not so wet, we 
would hare had it twelve or fourteen inches deep. It 
was six inches this morning. 

2'dth. — Sunday. Very foggy, cold and wet. 

21th. — The snow all gone; weather moderate ; creek 
rising. Robert M'iS^ear, with a party of men, came on 
to open the road to Presqu' Isle. 

2^th. — Cloudy and raw weather. The creek in excel- 
lent boating order. 

29^/^. — Moderate rain all day and most part of the night. 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 407 

30^^. — Partly clear ; no rain to-day. 

31s^. — Rained last night and moderately all day. The 
creek higher than we have ever seen it before. 

Nov. 1st. — Cleared off pleasant. 

2d. — Fine day. 

M. — Hard rain all last night, and violent storms of 
wind and rain all day. The creek over its banks. 

4itli. — A constant rain all day and night. 

^th. — Cleared away — moderate. 

Qth. — Pleasant, dry day ; the creek beginning to fall. 

1th. — Dry. The creek not yet within its banks. 

8^^. — A light rain off and on all last night; wet 
drizzling rain all day. The creek fell within its banks. 

9^/^. — Sunday. Cloudy and raw. 

10^^. — Some snow and rain. This afternoon received in- 
structions from the Governor to re-enlist the detachment. 

lltli. — Read the Governor's letter to the men. 

12^/i. — Find that the men don't incline to enlist for six 
months. They are naked and dispirited, and no money 
among us to tempt them. Concluded upon engaging 
volunteers for a month. Cold and snow. 

13^/l — Snowed hard all day. Find a difficulty in per- 
suading any of the men to stay even for one month. 

I^dli. — Constant snow. Engaged as many as nineteen 
volunteers to stay and help the garrison until a relief 
comes on, which is promised before the 1st of January. 

Ibth. — Moderate, with some snow. The creek falling 
fast, owing to the frosty nights. 

IWi. — Sunday. Deep snow last night ; snowed hard 
all day. Preparing to start down the river. 



408 MILITARY JOURNAL OF 

17^7i. — Left Ensign Meliaffy, Quarter-master M'Cutch- 
eon, and nineteen men, and embarked with the rest of 
my command in boats for Pitt. Hard snow all day. 
The creek tolerably full of water and difficult to navi- 
gate, owing to the great number of trees which fill up the 
channel. Two of our canoes overset and a couple of rifles 
lost. The day very cold ; many of the men wet, being 
obliged frequently to jump into the water, and some 
thrown out. Halted six miles short of Cussewago. 

18^^. — Got under way very early, and was at Cussewa- 
go for breakfast ; remained all day fixing the craft and 
repairing a keel boat wdiich we found necessary to take 
along. 

\^t]i, — Fine day. Took the detachment that was at 
Cussewago on board the keel boat, with myself and a few- 
men out of the canoes, and left that place about nine 
o'clock ; got to Franklin about three without any diffi- 
culty. 

20tli. — Drew provisions at Franklin and cooked break- 
fast. The day very wet and cold. Got down within 
twelve or fifteen miles of Stump creek. 

21st. — Very cold snowy day. The Allegheny high. 
Lay this night a few miles below Green's. 

22rZ.— Reached Pittsburgh. 

24:tli. — The Governor had left this but a few days. I 
found a new arrangement of the detachment intended 
for my command ; that a Mr. Buchanan had been ap- 
pointed captain, and already recruiting; had raised a 
number of men for Le Boeuf. Doctor Kennedy appoint- 
ed surgeon to the detachment, and a flattering letter for 



MAJOR EBENEZER DENNY. 409 

me, with the appointment of Major. This was pleasing- 
information, as I had some doubts about getting recruits 
in time to relieve Ensign Mehaffy. Our leaving Le 
Boeuf so soon as we did, was that we might have the 
more time to enlist men, as we found it impossible to 
persuade any of them to engage there. No money to be 
had for the men. 

25th and 26th. — Discharged the men. 

Dec. 13th. — Started up Captain Buchanan for Le Boeuf 
with thirty-five recruits. The party lay four days on the 
opposite side of the river, waiting for pack horses ; four 
only were provided. Doctor Kennedy was obliged to 
remain behind for want of a conveyance for his baggage. 

Jan. 4ih, 1795. — Ensign Mehaffy and Ensign M'- 
Cutcheon, with the men left at Le Boeuf, arrived. 

bth. — Discharged the remains of our command. 

11^7^. — Lieutenant Hazlewood resigned his commission 
and took abrupt departure for Philadelphia. 

Have leave of absence, with liberty, if necessary, to 
visit Philadelphia. 

May 31st. — As every difficulty seems to have ceased, 
and my young family not in a situation to be left, have 
recommended the Governor to transfer the command 
and the duty of escorting the commissioners in laying 
out the towns, the only business now to be done, to 
Captain Buchanan, who appears well qualified for this 
service. 
